<--ALONE-->
Hasty climbers have sudden falls.
Italian Proverb

We are told never to cross a bridge until we come to it, but this world is owned by men who have crossed bridges in their imagination far ahead of the crowd.
Anon.

When ambition ends, happiness begins.
Proverb

Children, you must remember something. A man without ambition is dead. A man with ambition but no love is dead. A man with ambition and love for his blessings here on earth is ever so alive.
Pearl Bailey
Talking to Myself (1971)

Very few people are ambitious in the sense of having a specific image of what they want to achieve. Most peoples sights are only toward the next run, the next increment of money.
Judith M. Bardwick

Ambition -- it is the last infirmity of noble minds.
James Barrie

All ambitions are lawful except those that climb upward on the miseries or credulities of mankind.
Henry Ward Beecher

Ambition. An overmastering desire to be vilified by enemies while living and made ridiculous by friends when dead.
Ambrose Bierce

No bird soars too high if he soars with his own wings.
William Blake

Great ambition is the passion of a great character. Those endowed with it may perform very good or very bad acts. All depends on the principals which direct them.
Napoleon Bonaparte

Shoot for the moon. Even if you miss, youll land among the stars.
Les Brown

What I aspired to be and was not, comforts me.
Robert Browning

Tis not what man does which exalts him, but what man Would do!
Robert Browning

Ambition is not what man does... but what man would do.
Robert Browning

There are only two ways of getting on in the world: by ones own industry, or by the stupidity of others.
Jean De La Bruyere

The slave has but one master, the ambitious man has as many as there are persons whose aid may contribute to the advancement of his fortunes.
Jean De La Bruyere

Ambition can creep as well as soar.
Edmund Burke

Like dogs in a wheel, birds in a cage, or squirrels in a chain, ambitious men still climb and climb, with great labor, and incessant anxiety, but never reach the top.
Robert Burton

He who surpasses or subdues mankind, must look down on the hate of those below.
Lord (George Gordon) Byron

As falls the dew on quenchless sands, blood only serves to wash ambitions hands.
Lord (George Gordon) Byron

The men who succeed are the efficient few. They are the few who have the ambition and will power to develop themselves.
Herbert N. Casson

It is commonly supposed that the art of pleasing is a wonderful aid in the pursuit of fortune; but the art of being bored is infinitely more successful.
Sebastian Roch Nicolas Chamfort

Big results require big ambitions.
James Champy

When you are aspiring to the highest place, it is honorable to reach the second or even the third rank.
Marcus Tullius Cicero

<--ANGRY-->


If you are patient in one moment of anger, you will escape a hundred days of sorrow.
Chinese Proverb

Anger is not only inevitable, but it is necessary. For in its place is indifference, the worst of all human qualities.
Anon.

He who is slow to anger has great understanding, but he who has a hasty temper exalts folly.
Proverb

There are two things a person should never be angry at, what they can help, and what they cannot.
Proverb

No one is as angry as the person who is wrong.
Proverb

The wrath of brothers is fierce and devilish.
Proverb

Anger is as a stone cast into a wasps nest.
Proverb

Indulge not thyself in the passion of anger; it is whetting a sword to wound thine own breast, or murder thy friend.
Akhenaton

As the whirlwind in its fury teareth up trees, and deformeth the face of nature, or as an earthquake in its convulsions overturneth whole cities; so the rage of an angry man throweth mischief around him.
Akhenaton

Holding anger is a poison. It eats you from inside. We think that hating is a weapon that attacks the person who harmed us. But hatred is a curved blade. And the harms we do, we do to ourselves. Mitch Albom
The Five People You Meet in Heaven

It takes two flints to make a fire.
Louisa May Alcott

I used to store my anger and it affected my play. Now I get it out. Im never rude to my playing partner. Im very focused on the ball. Then its over.
Helen Alfredsson

Men often make up in wrath what they want in reason.
William R. Alger

I love to see a young girl go out and grab the world by the lapels. Lifes a bitch. Youve got to go out and kick ass.
Maya Angelou

Bitterness is like cancer. It eats upon the host. But anger is like fire. It burns it all clean.
Maya Angelou

Consider how much more you often suffer from your anger and grief, than from those very things for which you are angry and grieved.
Marcus Antonius

Angry men are blind and foolish, for reason at such a time takes flight and, in her absence, wrath plunders all the riches of the intellect, while the judgment remains the prisoner of its own pride.
Pietro Aretino

Anger is always concerned with individuals, whereas hatred is directed also against classes: we all hate any thief and any informer. Moreover, anger can be cured by time; but hatred cannot. The one aims at giving pain to its object, the other at doing him harm; the angry man wants his victim to feel; the hater does not mind whether they feel or not.
Aristotle

Anyone can become angry - that is easy. But to be angry with the right person, to the right degree, at the right time, for the right purpose, and in the right way; this is not easy.
Aristotle

We praise a man who feels angry on the right grounds and against the right persons and also in the right manner at the right moment and for the right length of time.
Aristotle

When thou art above measure angry, bethink thee how momentary is mans life.
Marcus Aurelius

How much more grievous are the consequences of anger than the causes of it.
Marcus Aurelius

Anger cannot be dishonest.
George R. Bach

Anger makes dull men witty but it keeps them poor.
Francis Bacon

Rage cannot be hidden, it can only be dissembled. This dissembling deludes the thoughtless, and strengthens rage and adds, to rage, contempt.
James Baldwi

<--Architecture-->

A structure becomes architectural, and not sculptural, when its elements no longer have their justification in nature.
Guillaume Apollinaire

In my experience, if you have to keep the lavatory door shut by extending your left leg, it s modern architecture.
Nancy Banks-Smith

When it comes to getting things done, we need fewer architects and more bricklayers.
Colleen C. Barrett

Where do architects and designers get their ideas? The answer, of course, is mainly from other architects and designers, so is it mere casuistry to distinguish between tradition and plagiarism?
Stephen Bayley

Architect. One who drafts a plan of your house, and plans a draft of your money.
Ambrose Bierce

Architecture is inhabited sculpture.
Constantin Brancusi

You have to give this much to the Luftwaffe: when it knocked down our buildings it did not replace them with anything more offensive than rubble. We did that.
Prince Of Wales Charles

All architecture is great architecture after sunset; perhaps architecture is really a nocturnal art, like the art of fireworks.
G. K. Chesterton

A building is akin to dogma; it is insolent, like dogma. Whether or no it is permanent, it claims permanence, like a dogma. People ask why we have no typical architecture of the modern world, like impressionism in painting. Surely it is obviously because we have not enough dogmas; we cannot bear to see anything in the sky that is solid and enduring, anything in the sky that does not change like the clouds of the sky.
G. K. Chesterton

The principle of the Gothic architecture is infinity made imaginable.
Samuel Taylor Coleridge

In short, the building becomes a theatrical demonstration of its functional ideal. In this romanticism, high-tech architecture is, of course, no different in spirit -- if totally different in form -- from all the romantic architecture of the past.
Dan Cruickshank

The terrifying and edible beauty of Art Nouveau architecture.
Salvador Dali

The job of buildings is to improve human relations: architecture must ease them, not make them worse.
Ralph Erskine

A bold architectural statement turns a public building into a landmark, but it is in the details where the architect becomes the real storyteller.
Curtis W. Fentress

People actually ask me why I bring in projects on budget and on time. It seems I am not living up to the fashionable genius role. I really enjoy when a project gets down to the wire, and through sheer force of will and faith in our process, we cross the goal line, when most people thought it impossible.
Curtis W. Fentress

There are many satisfactions in public architecture but one of the greatest is the moment when you unveil a project and suddenly a group of adults
Curtis W. Fentress

Some architects have a preconceived notion of what a building should be
Curtis W. Fentress

It takes a great client to create great architecture.
Curtis W. Fentress

Our work is really about taking the best of what is in a place and working that into a project. We d like to take your vision and goals and weave that into all the bricks and mortar and steel and glass put together, along with all the functional things that we need to make the airport work better.
Curtis W. Fentress

Don t fight forces, use them.
Richard Buckminster Fuller

Light, God s eldest daughter, is a principal beauty in a building.
Thomas Fuller

A modern, harmonic and lively architecture is the visible sign of an authentic democracy.
Walter Gropius

Architects, painters, and sculptors must recognize anew and learn to grasp the composite character of a building both as an entity and in its separate parts. Only then will their work be imbued with the architectonic spirit which it has lost as salon art. Together let us desire, conceive, and create the new structure of the future, which will embrace architecture and sculpture and painting in one unity and which will one day rise toward heaven from the hands of a million workers like the crystal symbol of a new faith.
Walter Gropius

The only legitimate artists in England are the architects.
Benjamin Haydon

Architecture is to make us know and remember who we are.
Sir Geoffrey Jellicoe

<--ART-->

Art is permitted to survive only if it renounces the right to be different, and integrates itself into the omnipotent realm of the profane.
 Theodor Wiesengrund Adorno
 Art is an experience, not the formulation of a problem.
 Lindsay Anderson
 Artists are, above all, men who want to become inhuman.
 Guillaume Apollinaire
 Without poets, without artists, men would soon weary of nature s monotony. The sublime idea men have of the universe would collapse with dizzying speed. The order which we find in nature, and which is only an effect of art, would at once vanish. Everything would break up in chaos. There would be no seasons, no civilization, no thought, no humanity; even life would give way, and the impotent void would reign everywhere.
 Guillaume Apollinaire
 Now the work of art also represents a state of final equilibrium, of accomplished order and maximum relative entropy, and there are those who resent it. But art is not meant to stop the stream of life. Within a narrow span of duration and space the work of art concentrates a view of the human condition; and sometimes it marks the steps of progression, just as a man climbing the dark stairs of a medieval tower assures himself by the changing sights glimpsed through its narrow windows that he is getting somewhere after all.
 Rudolph Arnheim
 Art is a fruit that grows in man, like a fruit on a plant, or a child in its mother s womb.
 Jean Arp
 Pictures and shapes are but secondary objects and please or displease only in the memory.
 Francis Bacon
 The primary distinction of the artist is that he must actively cultivate that state which most men, necessarily, must avoid: the state of being alone.
 James Baldwin
 All art is a kind of confession, more or less oblique. All artists, if they are to survive, are forced, at last, to tell the whole story; to vomit the anguish up.
 James Baldwin
 The man who can but sketch his purpose beforehand in words is regarded as a wonder, and every artist and writer possesses that faculty. But gestation, fruition, the laborious rearing of the offspring, putting it to bed every night full fed with milk, embracing it anew every morning with the inexhaustible affection of a mother s heart, licking it clean, dressing it a hundred times in the richest garb only to be instantly destroyed; then never to be cast down at the convulsions of this headlong life till the living masterpiece is perfected which in sculpture speaks to every eye, in literature to every intellect, in painting to every memory, in music to every heart! --this is the task of execution. The hand must be ready at every moment to work in obedience to the mind.
 Honore de Balzac
 If we could but paint with the hand what we see with the eye.
 Honore de Balzac
 The first mistake of Art is to assume that it s serious.
 Lester Bangs
 Every great work of art has two faces, one toward its own time and one toward the future, toward eternity.
 Daniel Barenboim
 The essence of all art is to have pleasure in giving pleasure
 Mikhail Baryshnikov
 Art distills sensations and embodies it with enhanced meaning.
 Jacques Barzun
 A frenzied passion for art is a canker that devours everything else.
 Charles Baudelaire
 The more a man cultivates the arts the less he fornicates. A more and more apparent cleavage occurs between the spirit and the brute.
 Charles Baudelaire
 In order for the artist to have a world to express he must first be situated in this world, oppressed or oppressing, resigned or rebellious, a man among men.
 Simone de Beauvoir
 Every artist dips his brush in his own soul, and paints his own nature into his pictures.
 Henry Ward Beecher
 Art! Who comprehends her? With whom can one consult concerning this great goddess?
 Ludwig van Beethoven
 No one should drive a hard bargain with an artist.
 Ludwig van Beethoven
 As for types like my own, obscurely motivated by the conviction that our existence was worthless if we didn t make a turning point of it, we were assigned to the humanities, to poetry, philosophy, painting -- the nursery games of humankind, which had to be left behind when the age of science began. The humanities would be called upon to choose a wallpaper for the crypt, as the end drew near.
 Saul Bellow
 Any artist should be grateful for a na?ve grace which puts him beyond the need to reason elaborately.
 Saul Bellow
 The greater the decrease in the social significance of an art form, the sharper the distinction between criticism and enjoyment by the public. The conventional is uncritically enjoyed, and the truly new is criticized with aversion.
 Walter Benjamin
 The strange power of art is sometimes it can show that what people have in common is more urgent than what differentiates them. It seems to me it s something that theatre can do, but it s rare; it s very rare.
 John Berger

 <ATTITUDE>

 Do not judge by appearances; a rich heart may be under a poor coat.
 Scottish Proverb
 Good nature is more agreeable in conversation than wit and gives a certain air to the countenance which is more amiable than beauty.
 Joseph Addison
 Sometimes Im so sweet even I cant stand it.
 Julie Andrews
 I got a simple rule about everybody. If you dont treat me right -- shame on you!
 Louis Armstrong
 Life would be a perpetual flea hunt if a man were obliged to run down all the innuendoes, inveracities, and insinuations and misrepresentations which are uttered against him.
 Henry Ward Beecher
 We are constantly being surprised that people did things well before we were born. We are constantly remarking on the fact that things are done well by people other than ourselves. The Japanese are a remarkable little people, we say, as if we were doing them a favor. He is an Arab, but you ought to hear him play the zither. Why but?
 Robert Benchley
 Isnt It Remarkable?
 While we are focusing on fear, worry, or hate, it is not possible for us to be experiencing happiness, enthusiasm or love.
 Bo Bennett
 There are no menial jobs, only menial attitudes.
 William John Bennett
 Whenever youre in conflict with someone, there is one factor that can make the difference between damaging your relationship and deepening it. That factor is attitude.
 Timothy Bentley
 Id rather be a could-be if I cannot be an are;because a could-be is a maybe who is reaching for a star.Id rather be a has-been than a might-have-been, by far;for a might have-been has never been, but a has was once an are.
 Milton Berle
 Life is 10 percent what you make it and 90 percent how you take it.
 Irving Berlin
 It is better to know nothing than to know what aint so.
 Josh Billings
 Our attitudes control our lives. Attitudes are a secret power working twenty-four hours a day, for good or bad. It is of paramount importance that we know how to harness and control this great force.
 Tom Blandi
 Feeling without judgement is a washy draught indeed; but judgement untempered by feeling is too bitter and husky a morsel for human deglutition.
 Charlotte Bronte
 I never expect to lose. Even when Im the underdog, I still prepare a victory speech.
 H. Jackson Brown, Jr.
 You are more likely to act yourself into feelings, than feel yourself into action.
 Jerome Bruner
 I dont wait for moods. You accomplish nothing if you do that. Your mind must know it has got to get down to earth.
 Pearl Buck
 There are two big forces at work, external and internal. We have very little control over external forces such as tornadoes, earthquakes, floods, disasters, illness and pain. What really matters is the internal force. How do I respond to those disasters? Over that I have complete control.
 Leo Buscaglia
 Attitudes are the forerunners of conditions.
 Eric Butterworth
 I would rather be first in a little Iberian village than second in Rome.
 Julius Caesar
 In the depths of winter I finally learned there was in me an invincible summer.
 Albert Camus
 In War: Resolution. In Defeat: Defiance. In Victory: Magnanimity. In Peace: Goodwill.
 Sir Winston Churchill
 If you wish to travel far and fast, travel light. Take off all your envies, jealousies, unforgiveness, selfishness and fears.
 Glenn Clark
 You got to sing like you dont need the money; Love like youll never get hurt; You got to dance like nobodys watchin; Its gotta come from the heart if you want it to work.
 Susanna Clark
 Its not the situation. Its your reaction to the situation.
 Robert Conklin
Life at any time can become difficult: life at any time can become easy. It all depends upon how one adjusts oneself to life.
Moraji R. Desai
It is not the position, but the disposition.
J. E. Dinger
The conduct of men depends upon the temperament, not upon a bunch of musty maxims.
Benjamin Disraeli
A man can believe a considerable deal of rubbish, and yet go about his daily work in a rational and cheerful manner.
Norman Douglas
To different minds, the same world is a hell, and a heaven.
Ralph Waldo Emerson
Its not what happens to you, but how you react to it that matters.
Epictetus
Win as if you were used to it, lose as if you enjoyed it for a change.
Golnik Eric
Events will take their course, it is no good of being angry at them; he is happiest who wisely turns them to the best account.
Euripides
If you can react the same way to winning and losing, thats a big accomplishment. That quality is important because it stays with you the rest of your life, and theres going to be a life after tennis thats a lot longer than your tennis life.
Chris Evert
Its how you deal with failure that determines how you achieve success.
David Feherty
Our attitude towards what has happened to us in life is the important thing to recognize. Once hopeless, my life is now hope-full, but it did not happen overnight. The last of human freedoms, to choose ones attitude in any given set of circumstances, is to choose ones own way.
Victor Frankl
Mans Search for Meaning
A positive attitude can really make dreams come true -- it did for me.
Zina Garrison
Zeal is a volcano, the peak of which the grass of indecisiveness does not grow.
Kahlil Gibran, "A Handful of Sand on the Shore"
The tears that you spill, the sorrowful, are sweeter than the laughter of snobs and the guffaws of scoffers.
Kahlil Gibran, "A Handful of Sand on the Shore"
Nothing in life is so hard that you cant make it easier by the way you take it.
Ellen Glasgow
What happens is not as important as how you react to what happens.
Thaddeus Golas
Lets not be narrow, nasty, and negative.
Vernon Grounds
People Some people are like wheelbarrows; useful only when pushed, and very easily upset. The time to stop talking is when the other person nods his head affirmatively but says nothing.
Henry S. Haskins
Each experience through which we pass operates ultimately for our good. This is a correct attitude to adopt and we must be able to see it in that light.
Raymond Holliwell
Ability is what youre capable of doing. Motivation determines what you do. Attitude determines how well you do it.
Lou Holtz
Life is ten percent what happens to you and ninety percent how you respond to it.
Lou Holtz
Its not the load that breaks you down, its the way you carry it.
Lena Horne
We awaken in others the same attitude of mind we hold toward them.
Elbert Hubbard
Those who believe that they are exclusively in the right are generally those who achieve something.
Aldous Huxley
An inexhaustible good nature is one of the most precious gifts of heaven, spreading itself like oil over the troubled sea of thought, and keeping the mind smooth and equable in the roughest weather.
Washington Irving
Human beings, by changing the inner attitudes of their minds, can change the outer aspects of their lives.
William James
The greatest discovery of my generation is that human beings can alter their lives by altering their attitudes of mind.
William James
It is our attitude at the beginning of a difficult task which, more than anything else, will affect its successful outcome.
William James
Nothing can stop the man with the right mental attitude from achieving his goal; nothing on earth can help the man with the wrong mental attitude.
Thomas Jefferson
Success or failure depends more upon attitude than upon capacity successful men act as though they have accomplished or are enjoying something. Soon it becomes a reality. Act, look, feel successful, conduct yourself accordingly, and you will be amazed at the positive results.
Dupree Jordan
My attitude is never to be satisfied, never enough, never.
Bela Karolyi
Up to a point a mans life is shaped by environment, heredity, and the movements and changes in the world around him. Then there comes a time when it lies within his grasp to shape the clay of his life into the sort of thing he wishes to be. Only the weak blame parents, their race, their times, lack of good fortune, or the quirks of fate. Everyone has it within his power to say, This I am today; that I will be tomorrow. The wish, however, must be implemented by deeds.
Louis LAmour
A pessimist and an optimist, so much the worse; so much the better.
Jean De La Fontaine
Dont introduce me to that man! I want to go on hating him, and I cant hate a man whom I know.
Charles Lamb
Two men look out the same prison bars; one sees mud and the other stars.
Frederick Langbridge
In the final analysis there is no other solution to mans progress but the days honest work, the days honest decision, the days generous utterances, and the days good deed.
Clare Boothe Luce
Keep your heart right, even when it is sorely wounded.
J. C. Macaulay
We would accomplish many more things if we did not think of them as impossible.
Chretien Malesherbes
We are injured and hurt emotionally, Not so much by other people or what they say and dont say, But by our own attitude and our own response.
Maxwell Maltz
Take the attitude of a student, Never be to big to ask questions, Never know to much to learn something new.
Og Mandino
What happens to a man is less significant than what happens within him.
Louis L. Mann
Could we change our attitude, we should not only see life differently, but life itself would come to be different. Life would undergo a change of appearance because we ourselves had undergone a change of attitude.
Katherine Mansfield
A will finds a way.
Orison Swett Marden
Morale is the state of mind. It is steadfastness and courage and hope. It is confidence and zeal and loyalty. It is elan, esprit de corps and determination.
General George Catlett Marshall
Attitudes are more important than facts.
Karl Menninger
Ones destination is never a place, but rather a new way of looking at things.
Henry Miller
Your living is determined not so much by what life brings to you as by the attitude you bring to life; not so much by what happens to you as by the way your mind looks at what happens.
John Homer Miller
If you will call your troubles experiences, and remember that every experience develops some latent force within you, you will grow vigorous and happy, however adverse your circumstances may seem to be.
John R. Miller
Our attitude toward life determines lifes attitude towards us.
Earl Nightingale
A great attitude does much more than turn on the lights in our worlds; it seems to magically connect us to all sorts of serendipitous opportunities that were somehow absent before the change.
Earl Nightingale
Any fact facing us is not as important as our attitude toward it, for that determines our success or failure. The way you think about a fact may defeat you before you ever do anything about it. You are overcome by the fact because you think you are.
Norman Vincent Peale
Never elated when someones oppressed, never dejected when another ones blessed.
Alexander Pope
Always keep that happy attitude. Pretend that you are holding a beautiful fragrant bouquet.
Candice M. Pope
There are, it has been said, two types of people in the world. There are those who, when presented with a glass that is exactly half-full, say: this glass is half full. And then there are those who say: this glass is half-empty. The world belongs, however, to those who can look at the glass and say: Whats up with this glass? Excuse me? Excuse me? This is my glass? I dont think so. My glass was full! And it was a bigger glass!
Terry Pratchett
You play the hand youre dealt. I think the games worthwhile.
Christopher Reeve
Great effort springs naturally from a great attitude.
Pat Riley
If you have a positive attitude and constantly strive to give your best effort, eventually you will overcome your immediate problems and find you are ready for greater challenges.
Pat Riley
We have unprecedented conditions to deal with and novel adjustments to make -- there can be no doubt of that. We also have a great stock of scientific knowledge unknown to our grandfathers with which to operate. So novel are the conditions, so copious the knowledge, that we must undertake the arduous task of reconsidering a great part of the opinions about man and his relations to his fellow men which have been handed down to us by previous generations who lived in far other conditions and possessed far less information about the world and themselves. We have, however, first to create an unprecedented attitude of mind to cope with unprecedented conditions, and to utilize unprecedented knowledge.
James H. Robinson
Ive always believed that you can think positive just as well as you can think negative.
Sugar Ray Robinson
Its easy to let life deteriorate into making a living instead of making a life. Its not the hours you put in, but what you out into the hours that count. Learn to express rather than impress. Expressing evokes a me too attitude while impressing evokes a so what attitude.
Jim Rohn
Attitude is your acceptance of the natural laws, or your rejection of the natural laws.
Jim Rohn
There are only 3 colors, 10 digits, and 7 notes; its what we do with them thats important.
Ruth Ross
There are times when you just get down, you feel like nobody likes you. Were in high school forever. Its just what we do with it.
Rene Russo
An optimist may see a light where there is none, but why must the pessimist always run to blow it out?
Michel De Saint-Pierre
Dont be against things so much as for things.
Colonel Harland Sanders
Dont spend time beating on a wall, hoping to transform it into a door.
Dr. Laura Schlessinger
An attitude to life which seeks fulfillment in the single-minded pursuit of wealth -- in short, materialism -- does not fit into this world, because it contains within itself no limiting principle, while the environment in which it is placed is strictly limited.
E. F. [Ernst Friedrich] Schumacher
Eagles come in all shapes and sizes, but you will recognize them chiefly by their attitudes.
Charles Prestwich Scott
Adopting the right attitude can convert a negative stress into a positive one.
Hans Selye
This is the precept by which I have lived: Prepare for the worst; expect the best; and take what comes.
Robert E. Speer
They say you cant do it, but sometimes it doesnt always work.
Casey (Charles Dillon) Stengel
She would rather light candles than curse the darkness and her glow has warmed the world.
Adlai Stevenson
There is little difference in people, but that little difference makes a big difference. That little difference is attitude. The big difference is whether it is positive or negative.
W. Clement Stone
Every exit is an entry somewhere.
Tom Stoppard
The longer I live, the more I realize the impact of attitude on life. Attitude, to me, is more important than facts. It is more important than the past, the education, the money, than circumstances, than failure, than successes, than what other people think or say or do. It is more important than appearance, giftedness or skill. It will make or break a company... a church... a home. The remarkable thing is we have a choice everyday regarding the attitude we will embrace for that day. We cannot change our past... we cannot change the fact that people will act in a certain way. We cannot change the inevitable. The only thing we can do is play on the one string we have, and that is our attitude. I am convinced that life is 10% what happens to me and 90% of how I react to it. And so it is with you... we are in charge of our Attitudes.
Charles Swindoll
I believe the single most significant decision I can make on a day-to-day basis is my choice of attitude. It is more important than my past, my education, my bankroll, my successes or failures, fame or pain, what other people think of me or say about me, my circumstances, or my position. Attitude keeps me going or cripples my progress. It alone fuels my fire or assaults my hope. When my attitudes are right, there is no barrier too high, no valley too deep, no dream too extreme, no challenge too great for me.
Charles Swindoll
Words can never adequately convey the incredible impact of our attitudes toward life. The longer I live the more convinced I become that life is 10 percent what happens to us and 90 percent how we respond to it.
Charles Swindoll
If you cant change your fate, change your attitude.
Amy Tan
The world is a looking glass and gives back to every man the reflection of his own face.
William Makepeace Thackeray
It started when I left Vegas that first time, skipping the hotel bill, driving off in that red convertible all alone, drunk and crazy, back to L.A. Thats exactly what I felt. Fear and loathing.
Hunter S. Thompson
He was always leaning forward, pushing something invisible ahead of him.
James Thurber
We lost because we told ourselves we lost.
Leo Tolstoy
Develop an attitude of gratitude, and give thanks for everything that happens to you, knowing that every step forward is a step toward achieving something bigger and better than your current situation.
Brian Tracy
Whenever a fellow tells me he is bipartisan, I know hes going to vote against me.
Harry S Truman
Ive never run into a guy who could win at the top level in anything today and didnt have the right attitude, didnt give it everything he had, at least while he was doing it; wasnt prepared and didnt have the whole program worked out.
Ted Turner
Take everything easy and quit dreaming and brooding and you will be well guarded from a thousand evils.
Uhland
Two-minute attitude drill: To everyone: You can trust me. Im committed to excellence. I care about you as a person. EVERY DAY: Do good. Do your best. Treat others as you would be treated. FOR TODAY: Nothing negative will escape my lips.
 Unknown
Whether a glass is half full or half empty depends on the attitude of the person looking at it.
 Unknown
The most vital thing in a mans life is his mental attitude.
 Unknown
Optimism is the cheerful frame of mind that enables a teakettle to sing, though in hot water up to its nose.
 Unknown
One man gets nothing but discord out of a piano; another gets harmony. No one claims the piano is at fault. Life is about the same. The discord is there, and the harmony is there. Study to play it correctly, and it will give forth the beauty; play it falsely, and it will give forth the ugliness. Life is not at fault.
 Unknown
Nothing else is needed to make you depressed, than to fancy you are so.
 Unknown
Irritation in the heart of a believer is always an invitation to the devil to stand by.
 Unknown
If you look for the positive things in life; you will find them.
 Unknown
Your attitude determines your altitude.
 Unknown
A healthy attitude is contagious but dont wait to catch it from others. Be a carrier.
 Unknown
Attitude is a little thing that makes a big difference.
 Unknown
Growl all day and youll feel dog tired all night.
 Unknown
I am an optimist, unrepentant and militant. After all, in order not to be a fool an optimist must know how sad a place the world can be. It is only the pessimist who finds this out anew every day.
Peter Ustinov
Our judgments judge us; and nothing reveals us or exposes our weaknesses more ingeniously than the attitude of pronouncing upon our fellows.
Paul Ambroise Valery
Life is the movie you see through your own eyes. It makes little difference whats happening out there. Its how you take it that counts.
Denis Waitley
There are things I cant force. I must adjust. There are times when the greatest change needed is a change of my viewpoint.
C. M. Ward
Generalists, people with moderately strong attachments to many ideas, should be hard to interrupt, and once interrupted, should have weaker, shorter negative reactions since they have alternative paths to realize their plans. Specialists, people with stronger attachments to fewer ideas, should be easier to interrupt, and once interrupted, should have stronger, more sustained negative reactions because they have fewer alternative pathways to realize their plans. Generalists should be the upbeat, positive people in the profession while specialists should be their grouchy, negative counterparts.
Karl Weick
Some men have thousands of reasons why they cannot do what they want to, when all they need is one reason why they can.
Willis Whitney
One ship drives east and other drives west by the same winds that blow. Its the set of the sails and not the gales that determines the way they go.
Ella Wheeler Wilcox
Seriousness is the only refuge of the shallow.
Oscar Wilde
The cynic knows the price of everything and the value of nothing.
Oscar Wilde
Between the optimist and the pessimist, the difference is droll. The optimist sees the doughnut; the pessimist the hole!
Mclandburgh Wilson
You can complain because roses have thorns, or you can rejoice because thorns have roses.
Tom Wilson
Nothing will work unless you do.
John Wooden
You cannot tailor make your situation in life, but you can tailor make your attitudes to fit those situations.
Zig Ziglar
You cannot climb the ladder of success dressed in the costume of failure.
Zig Ziglar
Positive thinking will let you do everything better than negative thinking will.
Zig Ziglar



<BEAUTY>


A poor beauty finds more lovers than husbands.
English Proverb
Beauty, unaccompanied by virtue, is as a flower without perfume.
Proverb
The loveliest faces are to be seen by moonlight, when one sees half with the eye and half with the fancy.
Proverb
Beauty is a good letter of introduction.
Proverb
There is nothing that makes its way more directly to the soul than beauty.
Joseph Addison
Let there be nothing within thee that is not very beautiful and very gentle, and there will be nothing without thee that is not beautiful and softened by the spell of thy presence.
James Allen
....Then he felt quite ashamed, and hid his head under his wing; for he did not know what to do, he was so happy, and yet not at all proud. He had been persecuted and despised for his ugliness, and now he heard them say he was the most beautiful of all the birds. Even the elder-tree bent down its bows into the water before him, and the sun shone warm and bright. He would never became vain or conceited, and would always remembered how it felt to be despised and teased, and he was very sorry for all the creatures who are so treated merely because they are different from those around them. Then he rustled his feathers, curved his slender neck, and cried joyfully, from the depths of his heart,
Hans Christian Andersen
What ever beauty may be, it has for its basis order, and for its essence unity.
Father Andre
Beauty is one of the rare things that do not lead to doubt of God.
Jean Anouilh
Things are beautiful if you love them.
Jean Anouilh
Beauty is one of the rare things that do not lead to doubt of God.
Jean Anouilh
Personal beauty is a greater recommendation than any letter of reference.
Aristotle
Beauty depends on size as well as symmetry. No very small animal can be beautiful, for looking at it takes so small a portion of time that the impression of it will be confused. Nor can any very large one, for a whole view of it cannot be had at once, and so there will be no unity and completeness.
Aristotle
Strange that the vanity which accompanies beauty --excusable, perhaps, when there is such great beauty, or at any rate understandable --should persist after the beauty was gone.
Mary Arnim
The best part of beauty is that which no picture can express.
Francis Bacon
There is no excellent beauty that hath not some strangeness in the proportion.
Francis Bacon
Beauty is but the sensible image of the Infinite. Like truth and justice it lives within us; like virtue and the moral law it is a companion of the soul.
George Bancroft
Beauty itself is but the sensible image of the infinite.
George Bancroft
Im not ugly, but my beauty is a total creation.
Tyra Banks
Beauty is desired in order that it may be befouled; not for its own sake, but for the joy brought by the certainty of profaning it.
Georges Bataille
All forms of beauty, like all possible phenomena, contain an element of the eternal and an element of the transitory -- of the absolute and of the particular. Absolute and eternal beauty does not exist, or rather it is only an abstraction creamed from the general surface of different beauties. The particular element in each manifestation comes from the emotions: and just as we have our own particular emotions, so we have our own beauty.
Charles Baudelaire
There are as many kinds of beauty as there are habitual ways of seeking happiness.
Charles Baudelaire
The loveliest face in all the world will not please you if you see it suddenly eye to eye, at a distance of half an inch from your own.
Max Beerbohm
The idea that happiness could have a share in beauty would be too much of a good thing.
Walter Benjamin
Beauty is in the heart of the beholder.
Al Bernstein

<Belief>24

For those who believe, no proof is necessary. For those who don't believe, no proof is possible.
Anon.

sickness is a thing of the spirit
Japanese Proverb

A sign inside the front door of Holy Cross Primary School, in north Belfast, reads: If we'd been born where they were born and taught what they were taught, we would believe what they believe.
Anon.
Chris Thornton - Time Magazine

I believe in the sun even if it isn't shining. I believe in love even when I am alone. I believe in God even when He is silent.
Anon.
(sometimes attributed to a World War II refugee)

To believe a thing is impossible is to make it so.
Proverb

And if we now cast our eyes over the nations of the earth, we shall find that, instead of possessing the pure religion of the Gospel, they may be divided either into infidels, who deny the truth; or politicians who make religion a stalking horse for their ambition; or professors, who walk in the trammels of orthodoxy, and are more attentive to traditions and ordinances of men than to the oracles of truth.
Samuel Adams

The will to do springs from the knowledge that we can do.
James Allen

Our systems, perhaps, are nothing more than an unconscious apology for our faults --a gigantic scaffolding whose object is to hide from us our favorite sin.
Henri Frederic Amiel

It doesn't matter how many say it cannot be done or how many people have tried it before; it's important to realize that whatever you're doing, it's your first attempt at it.
Wally Amos

I believe we are still so innocent. The species are still so innocent that a person who is apt to be murdered believes that the murderer, just before he puts the final wrench on his throat, will have enough compassion to give him one sweet cup of water.
Maya Angelou

If you don't change your beliefs, your life will be like this forever. Is that good news?
Dr. Robert Anthony

Light half-believers of our casual creeds, who never deeply felt, nor clearly will d, whose insight never has borne fruit in deeds, whose vague resolves never have been fulfilled.
Matthew Arnold

Sooner or later, those who win are those who think they can.
Richard Bach

Strong beliefs win strong men, and then make them stronger.
Walter Bagehot

I started out by believing God for a newer car than the one I was driving. I started out believing God for a nicer apartment than I had. Then I moved up.
Jim Bakker

Confronted with the impossibility of remaining faithful to one's beliefs, and the equal impossibility of becoming free of them, one can be driven to the most inhuman excesses.
James Baldwin

We have all had the experience of finding that our reactions and perhaps even our deeds have denied beliefs we thought were ours.
James Baldwin

Those who say it can't be done are usually interrupted by others doing it.
Joel A. Barker

More persons, on the whole, are humbugged by believing in nothing than by believing in too much.
P. T. (Phineas Taylor) Barnum

Every time a child says, I don't believe in fairies, there is a fairy somewhere that falls down dead.
James Barrie

Once you begin to believe there is help out there, you will know it to be true.
Saint Bartholomew

The essential element in personal magnetism is a consuming sincerity -- an overwhelming faith in the importance of the work one has to do.
Bruce Barton

When you think of the huge uninterrupted success of a book like Don Quixote, you're bound to realize that if humankind have not yet finished being revenged, by sheer laughter, for being let down in their greatest hope, it is because that hope was cherished so long and lay so deep!
Georges Bernanos

Everything is possible for him who believes.
Bible

<BIBLE>25

Men may not read the gospel in sealskin, or the gospel in morocco, or the gospel in cloth covers, but they can't get away from the gospel in shoe leather.
Donald Grey Barnhouse

The real truth is that while He came to preach the gospel, His chief object in coming was that there might be a gospel to preach.
R. W. Dale

Engrave this Quote
Clarence Darrow
commenting on The Holy Bible

Engrave this Quote
Clarence Darrow
commenting on The Holy Bible

One of my less pleasant chores when I was young was to read the Bible from one end to the other. Reading the Bible straight through is at least 70 percent discipline, like learning Latin. But the good parts are, of course, simply amazing. God is an extremely uneven writer, but when He's good, nobody can touch Him.
John W. Gardner

If they had a social gospel in the days of the prodigal son, somebody would have given him a bed and a sandwich and he never would have gone home.
Vance Havner

It is Christ Himself, not the Bible, who is the true word of God. The Bible, read in the right spirit and with the guidance of good teachers, will bring us to Him. We must not use the Bible as a sort of encyclopedia out of which texts can be taken for use as weapons.
C.S. Lewis
Letters

The glory of the gospel is that when the church is absolutely different from the world, she invariably attracts it.
David Martyn Lloyd-Jones

The gospel to me is simply irresistible.
Blaise Pascal

The gospel is neither a discussion or a debate. It is an announcement.
Paul S. Rees

Each generation of the church in each setting has the responsibility of communicating the gospel in understandable terms, considering the language and thought-forms of that setting.
Francis Schaeffer

Philosophical argument has sometimes shaken my reason for the faith that was in me; but my heart has always assured me that the Gospel of Jesus Christ must be reality.
Daniel Webster

<BOOKS>25

Books are the legacies that a great genius leaves to mankind, which are delivered down from generation to generation as presents to the posterity of those who are yet unborn.
Joseph Addison

Books that have become classics -- books that have had their day and now get more praise than perusal -- always remind me of retired colonels and majors and captains who, having reached the age limit, find themselves retired on half pay.
Thomas Bailey Aldrich

Literature is made upon any occasion that a challenge is put to the legal apparatus by conscience in touch with humanity.
Nelson Algren

The writer in western civilization has become not a voice of his tribe, but of his individuality. This is a very narrow-minded situation.
Aharon Appelfeld

If the most significant characteristic of man is the complex of biological needs he shares with all members of his species, then the best lives for the writer to observe are those in which the role of natural necessity is clearest, namely, the lives of the very poor.
W. H. Auden

Literary imagination is an aesthetic object offered by a writer to a lover of books.
Gaston Bachelard

Literature is without proofs. By which it must be understood that it cannot prove, not only what it says, but even that it is worth the trouble of saying it.
Roland Barthes

In the present age, alas! our pens are ravished by unlettered authors and unmannered critics, that make a havoc rather than a building, a wilderness rather than a garden. But, a lack! what boots it to drop tears upon the preterit?
Aubrey Beardsley

Do not worry about the incarnation of ideas. If you are a poet, your works will contain them without your knowledge -- they will be both moral and national if you follow your inspiration freely.
Vissarion Belinsky

Child! Do not throw this book about Refrain from the unholy pleasureOf cutting all the pictures out!Preserve it as your chiefest treasure.
Hilaire Belloc
dedication to The Bad Child's Book of Beasts (1896)

The naturalistic literature of this country has reached such a state that no family of characters is considered true to life which does not include at least two hypochondriacs, one sadist, and one old man who spills food down the front of his vest.
Robert Benchley

The book borrower...proves himself to be an inveterate collector of books not so much by the fervor with which he guards his borrowed treasures...as by his failure to read these books.
Walter Benjamin
Unpacking My Library, 1931

Definition of a classic: a book everyone is assumed to have read and often thinks they have.
Alan Bennett

The great standard of literature as to purity and exactness of style is the Bible.
Hugh Blair

There are certain books in the world which every searcher for truth must know: the Bible, the Critique of Pure Reason, the Origin of Species, and Karl Marx's Capital.
W. E. B. Du Bois

Literature is not exhaustible, for the sufficient and simple reason that a single book is not. A book is not an isolated entity: it is a narration, an axis of innumerable narrations. One literature differs from another, either before or after it, not so much because of the text as for the manner in which it is read.
Jorge Luis Borges

A losing trade, I assure you, sir: literature is a drug.
George Borrow

No one is fit to judge a book until he has rounded Cape Horn in a sailing vessel, until he has bumped into two or three icebergs, until he has been lost in the sands of the desert, until he has spent a few years in the House of the Dead.
Van Wyck Brooks
From a Writer's Notebook, 1958

All literature is political.
LeVar Burton

English literature is a kind of training in social ethics. English trains you to handle a body of information in a way that is conducive to action.
Marilyn Butler

The struggle of literature is in fact a struggle to escape from the confines of language; it stretches out from the utmost limits of what can be said; what stirs literature is the call and attraction of what is not in the dictionary.
Italo Calvino

When politicians and politically minded people pay too much attention to literature, it is a bad sign -- a bad sign mostly for literature. But it is also a bad sign when they don't want to hear the word mentioned.
Italo Calvino

A classic is a book that has never finished saying what it has to say.
Italo Calvino

There is a great discovery still to be made in literature, that of paying literary men by the quantity they do not write.
Thomas Carlyle

Alice was beginning to get very tired of sitting by her sister on the bank, and of having nothing to do: once or twice she had peeped into the book her sister was reading, but it had no pictures or conversations in it, and what is the use of a book thought Alice, without pictures or conversations?
Lewis Carroll

<BRAVERY>25

Some have been thought brave because they didn't have the courage to run away.
Proverb

Courage and perseverance have a magical talisman, before which difficulties disappear and obstacles vanish into air.
John Quincy Adams

Courage that grows from constitution often forsakes a man when he has occasion for it; courage which arises from a sense of duty acts ;in a uniform manner.
Joseph Addison

There is another side to chivalry. If it dispenses leniency, it may with equal justification invoke control.
Freda Adler

It is easy to be brave from a safe distance.
Aesop

As a rock on the seashore he standeth firm, and the dashing of the waves disturbeth him not. He raiseth his head like a tower on a hill, and the arrows of fortune drop at his feet. In the instant of danger, the courage of his heart here, and scorn to fly.
Akhenaton

Often the test of courage is not to die but to live.
Vittorio Alfieri

Whether you be man or woman you will never do anything in this world without courage. It is the greatest quality of the mind next to honor.
James Allen

It takes a certain courage and a certain greatness to be truly base.
Jean Anouilh

Until the day of his death, no man can be sure of his courage.
Jean Anouilh

The ideal man bears the accidents of life with dignity and grace, making the best of circumstances.
Aristotle

It is easy to fly into a passion... anybody can do that, but to be angry with the right person to the right extent and at the right time and in the right way that is not easy.
Aristotle

The beauty of the soul shines out when a man bears with composure one heavy mischance after another, not because he does not feel them, but because he is a man of high and heroic temper.
Aristotle

Boldness is ever blind, for it sees not dangers and inconveniences whence it is bad in council though good in execution.
Francis Bacon

The brave man is not he who feels no fear, For that were stupid and irrational; But he, whose noble soul its fears subdues, And bravely dares the danger nature shrinks from.
Joanna Baillie

Nothing splendid has ever been achieved except by those who dared believe that something inside them was superior to circumstance.
Bruce Barton

The scars you acquire while exercising courage will never make you feel inferior.
D.A. Battista

Be daring, be different, be impractical, be anything that will assert integrity of purpose and imaginative vision against the play-it-safers, the creatures of the commonplace, the slaves of the ordinary.
Sir Cecil Walter Hardy Beaton

Courage is a special kind of knowledge: the knowledge of how to fear what ought to be feared and how not to fear what ought no to be feared.
David Ben-Gurion

It is the perpetual dread of fear, the fear of fear, that shapes the face of a brave man.
Georges Bernanos

Courage is fear that has said its prayers.
Dorothy Bernard

If we have the courage and tenacity of our forebears, who stood firmly like a rock against the lash of slavery, we shall find a way to do for our day what they did for theirs.
Mary Mcleod Bethune

Do not fear, for those who are with us, are more than those who are with them. 2 Kings 6:16
Bible

Finally, be strong in the Lord, and in the strength of His might. Ephesians 6:10
Bible

I can do all things through him who strengthens me. Philippians 4:13
Bible


<Business>25

Don't open a shop unless you like to smile.
Chinese Proverb

The go-between wears out a thousand sandals.
Japanese Proverb

Instead of focusing on their individual agendas, collaborative partnerships establish common goals. In order to address problems that lie beyond any single agency's exclusive purview, but which concern them all, partners agree to pool resources, jointly plan, implement, and evaluate new services and procedures, and delegate individual responsibility for the outcomes of their joint efforts.
This quote comes from an oft-cited monograph by Atelia I. Melaville with Martin J. Blank called What It Takes: Structuring Interagency Partnerships to Connect Children and Families with Comprehensive Services (Washington DC: Education and Human Services Consortium, 1991).http://www.scottlondon.com/reports/ppcc.html
Anon.

Buying is cheaper than asking.
Proverb

Work is our business; it's success is God s.
Proverb

A miser and a liar bargain quickly.
Proverb

When two friends have a common bank account, one sings and the other weeps.
Proverb

Cut your losses and let your profits run.
Proverb

In business partnerships and marriage partnerships, oh, the cheating that goes on.
Proverb

It is the privilege of posterity to set matters right between those antagonists who, by their rivalry for greatness, divided a whole age.
Joseph Addison

There is nothing more requisite in business than dispatch.
Joseph Addison

The one sure way to conciliate a tiger is to allow oneself to be devoured.
Konrad Adenauer

The basic rule of free enterprise: You must give in order to get.
Scott Alexander

Treat employees like partners, and they act like partners.
Fred A. Allen

Anybody can cut prices, but it takes brains to produce a better article.
P. D. Armour

Frankly, I don't want to see a rapid upturn. I want it to hold until some of these idiotic competitors go bust.
Joe Bamford

Nobody ever lost money taking a profit.
Bernard Baruch

Forty for you, sixty for me And equal partners we will be
Gerald Barzan

I work in a strange business, and trust is a word that's not even in the vocabulary.
Kim Basinger

If you wish to prosper, let your customer prosper...
When people have learned this lesson, everyone will seek his individual welfare in the general welfare. Then jealousies between man and man, city and city, province and province, nation and nation, will no longer trouble the world.
Fr

The fellow who says he'll meet you halfway usually thinks he's standing on the dividing line.
Orlando A. Battista

For the merchant, even honesty is a financial speculation.
Charles Baudelaire

Executives are like joggers. If you stop a jogger, he goes on running on the spot. If you drag an executive away from his business, he goes on running on the spot, pawing the ground, talking business. He never stops hurtling onwards, making decisions and executing them.
Jean Baudrillard

No sale is really complete until the product is worn out, and the customer is satisfied.
L.L. Bean

Business is more exciting than any game.
Lord Beaverbrook




In a cat's eye, all things belong to cats.
English Proverb

One of the problems of taking things apart and seeing how they work - supposing you're trying to find out how a cat works--you take that cat apart to see how it works, what you've got in your hands is a non-working cat. The cat wasn't a sort of clunky mechanism that was susceptible to our available tools of analysis.
Douglas Adams

Cruel, but composed and bland,
Dumb, inscrutable and grand,
So Tiberius might have sat,
Had Tiberius been a cat.
Matthew Arnold

Both ardent lovers and austere scholars, when once they come to the years of discretion, love cats, so strong and gentle, the pride of the household, who like them are sensitive to the cold, and sedentary.
Charles Baudelaire

A lion, for instance, which in nature is not a very distinctive object, was portrayed, for greater distinction, with its leonine attributes, its fierce expression, frightful claws, lithe and ,lissom body all vastly exaggerated, so that indeed it looked more like a lion than did ever any lion of nature. In this wise, by turning away from true representation and adopting a character all its own, was the 'heraldic lion' born, and with it came also the manner of depictin all the other beasts and forms and patterns which is so peculiarly heraldic.
Sir George Bellew

If a cat spoke, it would say things like Hey, I don't see the problem here.
Roy Blount, Jr.

Dogs come when they are called; cats take a message and get back to you.
Mary Bly

One small cat changes coming home to an empty house to coming home.
Pam Brown

Cats don't like change without their consent.
Roger Caras

Cats can be cooperative when something feels good, which, to a cat, is the way everything is supposed to feel as much of the time as possible.
Roger Caras

It is a very inconvenient habit of kittens (Alice had once made the remark) that whatever you say to them, they always purr.
Lewis Carroll

I said something which gave you to think I hated cats. But gad, sir, I am one of the most fanatical cat lovers in the business. If you hate them, I may learn to hate you. If your allergies hate them, I will tolerate the situation to the best of my ability.
Raymond Chandler

Your rat tail is all the fashion now. I prefer a bushy plume, carried straight up. You are Siamese and your ancestors lived in trees. Mine lived in palaces. It has been suggested to me that I am a bit of a snob. How true! I prefer to be.
Raymond Chandler

Take a cat, nourish it well with milk
And tender meat, make it a couch of silk,
But let it see a mouse along the wall
And it abandones milk and meat and all.
Chaucer

I love my cats because I love my home, and little by little they become its visible soul.
Jean Cocteau

The appearance of a cat is not controlled by the color of it's skin but by the content of its hairacter.
Brian Michael Cote

One cat in a house is a sign of loneliness, two of barrenness, and three of sodomy.
Edward Dahlberg

Authors like cats because they are such quiet, lovable, wise creatures, and cats like authors for the same reasons.
Robertson Davies

The smallest feline is a masterpiece.
Leonardo DaVinci

Curiosity is the very basis of education and if you tell me that curiosity killed the cat, I say only the cat died nobly.
Arnold Edinborough

Never try to outstubborn a cat.
Robert A. Heinlein
Lazarus Long, Time Enough for Love (The Notebooks of Lazarus Long)

If you want to be a psychological novelist and write about human beings, the best thing you can do is keep a pair of cats.
Aldous Huxley

Cats are intended to teach us that not everything in nature has a function.
Garrison Keillor

Bragging is not an attractive trait, but let's be honest. A man who catches a big fish doesn't go home through an alley.
Ann Landers

If a fish is the movement of water embodied, given shape, then cat is a diagram and pattern of subtle air.
Doris Lessing



Accident counts for as much in companionship as in marriage.
Henry Adams

Circumstances do not make the man, they reveal him.
James Allen

Although our inattention can contribute to our lack of total well-being, we also have the power to choose positive behaviors and responses. In that choice we change our every experience of life!
Greg Anderson

Circumstances may cause interruptions and delays, but never lose sight of your goal. Prepare yourself in every way you can by increasing your knowledge and adding to your experience, so that you can make the most of opportunity when it occurs.
Mario Andretti

And as for you, you meant evil against me, but God meant it for good in order to bring about this present result, to preserve many people alive. Genesis 50:20
Bible

Chance is the providence of adventurers.
Napoleon Bonaparte

It is our relation to circumstances that determine their influence over us. The same wind that blows one ship into port may blow another off shore.
Christian Nevell Bovee

You are where you are today because you've chosen to be there.
Harry Browne

In practical life the wisest and soundest people avoid speculation.
George Earle Buckle

We are no longer puppets being manipulated by outside powerful forces: we become the powerful force ourselves.
Leo Buscaglia

Men are the sport of circumstances when it seems circumstances are the sport of men.
Lord (George Gordon) Byron

Do not let circumstances control you. You change your circumstances.
Jackie Chan

Chance can allow you to accomplish a goal every once in a while, but consistent achievement happens only if you love what you are doing.
Bart Conner

How things look on the outside of us depends on how things are on the inside of us.
Parks Cousins

If you're proactive, you don't have to wait for circumstances or other people to create perspective expanding experiences. You can consciously create your own.
Stephen Covey

A fool must now and then be right, by chance.
William Cowper

Chance makes our parents, but choice makes our friends.
Jacques Delille

Nobody owes anybody a living, but everybody is entitled to a chance.
Jack Dempsey

Circumstances are beyond human control, but our conduct is in our own power.
Benjamin Disraeli

Whether you're winning or losing, it is important to always be yourself. You can't change because of the circumstances around you.
Cotton Fitzsimmons

Chance does not speak essentially through words nor can it be seen in their convolution. It is the eruption of language, its sudden appearance. It's not a night twinkle with stars, an illuminated sleep, nor a drowsy vigil. It is the very edge of consciousness.
Michel Foucault

Do not always prove yourself to be the one in the right. The right will appear. You need only give it a chance.
C. H. Fowler

The pseudonym for God when He did not want to sign.
Anatole France

Chance is the pseudonym God uses when He does not want to sign His name.
Anatole France

A wise man turns chance into good fortune.
Thomas Fuller



Never swap horses crossing a stream.
Proverb

Don't change horses while crossing a stream.
Proverb

To change and change for the better are two different things
Proverb

Change yourself, change your fortunes.
Proverb

A wise man changes his mind, a fool never will.
Proverb

Change means movement. Movement means friction. Only in the frictionless vacuum of a nonexistent abstract world can movement or change occur without that abrasive friction of conflict.
Saul Alinsky

Who we are never changes. Who we think we are does.
Mary S. Almanac

That's the risk you take if you change: that people you've been involved with won't like the new you. But other people who do will come along.
Lisa Alther

So long as a person is capable of self-renewal they are a living being.
Henri Frederic Amiel

The need for change bulldozed road down the center of my mind.
Maya Angelou

If you don't like something, change it. If you can't change it, change your attitude. Don't complain.
Maya Angelou

It is change, continuing change, inevitable change, that is the dominant factor in society today. No sensible decision can be made any longer without taking into account not only the world as it is, but the world as it will be. This, in turn, means that our statesmen, our businessmen, our every man must take on a science fictional way of thinking.
Isaac Asimov

The main dangers in this life are the people who want to change everything or nothing.
Nancy Astor

Observe constantly that all things take place by change, and accustom thyself to consider that the nature of the Universe loves nothing so much as to change the things which are, and to make new things like them.
Marcus Aurelius

That things are changed, and that nothing really perishes, and that the sum of matter remains exactly the same, is sufficiently certain.
Francis Bacon

Everybody wants to do something to help, but nobody wants to be the first.
Pearl Bailey

Most of us are about as eager to be changed as we were to be born, and go through our changes in a similar state of shock.
James Baldwin

Not everything that is faced can be changed, but nothing can be changed until it is faced.
James Baldwin

People can cry much easier than they can change.
James Baldwin

The most useless are those who never change through the years.
James Barrie

When you're through changing, you're through.
Bruce Barton

The things that have come into being change continually. The man with a good memory remembers nothing because he forgets nothing.
Augusto Roa Bastos

The great person is ahead of their time, the smart make something out of it, and the blockhead, sets themselves against it.
Jean Baudrillard

Change your life today. Don't gamble on the future, act now, without delay.
Simone de Beauvoir


Wherever man goes to dwell his character goes with him.
African Proverb

If you stand straight, do not fear a crooked shadow.
Chinese Proverb

Clear conscience never fears midnight knocking.
Chinese Proverb

Sow a thought and you reap an action;
sow an act and you reap a habit;
sow a habit and you reap a character;
sow a character and you reap a destiny.
Among the many attributions found for this: Ralph Waldo Emerson, Andre Maurois, Charles Reade, Buddist Proverb, Samuel Smiles, James Allen, George D. Boardman, and Francis E. Willard
Anon.
attributed to various sources

An old Cherokee is teaching his grandson about life:
A fight is going on inside me, he said to the boy. It is a terrible fight and it is between two wolves. One is evil - he is anger, envy, sorrow, regret, greed, arrogance, self-pity, guilt, resentment, inferiority, lies, false pride, superiority, and ego. The other is good - he is joy, peace, love, hope, serenity, humility, kindness, benevolence, empathy, generosity, truth, compassion, and faith. This same fight is going on inside you - and inside every other person, too.
The grandson thought about it for a minute and then asked his grandfather,Which wolf will win?
The old Cherokee simply replied, The one you feed.
American Indian Proverb

If an ass goes traveling it will not come home a horse.
Proverb

One can easily judge the character of a person by the way they treat people who can do nothing for them.
Proverb

Some people are born hammers, others anvils.
Proverb

A rich man has no need of character.
Proverb

The highest qualities of character must be earned.
Lyman Abbott

the highest qualities of character must be earned.
Lyman Abbott

Guard against the prestige of great names; see that your judgments are your own; and do not shrink from disagreement; no trusting without testing.
Lord (John Emerich Edward Dalberg) Acton

Character is the salesperson
George M. Adams

It is in the character of very few men to honor without envy a friend who has prospered.
Aeschylus

Honor is the inner garment of the Soul; the first thing put on by it with the flesh, and the last it layeth down at its separation from it.
Akhenaton

Be thou incapable of change in that which is right, and men will rely upon thee. Establish unto thyself principles of action; and see that thou ever act according to them. First know that thy principles are just, and then be thou
Akhenaton

It is not what he had, or even what he does which expresses the worth of a man, but what he is.
Henri Frederic Amiel

Temperance is simply a disposition of the mind which binds the passion.
Thomas Aquinas

Character is that which reveals moral purpose, exposing the class of things a man chooses or avoids.
Aristotle

Dignity does not consist in possessing honors, but in deserving them.
Aristotle

My father told me that if you saw a man in a Rolls Royce you could be sure he was not a gentleman unless he was the chauffeur.
Earl of Arran

The hardest job kids face today is learning good manners without seeing any.
Fred Astaire

If you don't run your own life, somebody else will.
John Atkinson

Perfection of character consists in this; living each day as if it were the last, and spending each moment in peace.
Marcus Aurelius

When about to commit a base deed, respect thyself, though there is no witness.
Decimus Magnus Ausonius


Of what does not concern you say nothing good or bad.
Italian Proverb

From listening comes wisdom and from speaking, repentance.
Proverb

You people are telling me what you think I want to know. I want to know what is actually happening.
Creighton Abrams

For parlor use, the vague generality is a life saver.
George Ade

Pure truth cannot be assimilated by the crowd; it must be communicated by contagion.
Henri Frederic Amiel

It is not so much the content of what one says as the way in which one says it. However important the thing you say, what's the good of it if not heard or, being heard, not felt.
Sylvia Ashton-Warner

God, the illogic! The impossibility of communication in this house. The sheer operation alone of getting something through to somebody.
Sylvia Ashton-Warner

It pays to be obvious, especially if you have a reputation for subtlety.
Isaac Asimov

The worst thing about the miracle of modern communications is the Pavlovian pressure it places upon everyone to communicate whenever a bell rings.
Russell Baker
No Cause for Pain, "Times (London)", November 28, 1991

The marriage of reason and nightmare which has dominated the 20th century has given birth to an ever more ambiguous world. Across the communications landscape move the specters of sinister technologies and the dreams that money can buy.
J. G. Ballard
Introduction to the French edition of Crash, 1974

I've not got a first in philosophy without being able to muddy things pretty satisfactory.
John Banham

The ability to express an idea is well nigh as important as the idea itself.
Bernard Baruch

Ordinary people who know nothing of phonetics or elocution have difficulties in understanding slow speech composed of perfect sounds, while they have no difficulty in comprehending an imperfect gabble if only the accent and rhythm are natural.
Alexander Graham Bell
The Mechanisms of Speech, 1916

Drawing on my fine command of the English language, I said nothing.
Robert Benchley
As quoted in: With Truth as Our Sword (2005) by C E Sylvester, p. 205

You will get good attention and people will be more inclined to listen to you if you can make a statement whereby their response is, No Shit! or at least, No kidding!
Gael Boardman

It seemed rather incongruous that in a society of supersophisticated communication, we often suffer from a shortage of listeners.
Erma Bombeck
If Life Is a Bowl of Cherries..., 1971

Self-expression must pass into communication for its fulfillment.
Pearl Buck
The Writer's Book

For good or ill, your conversation is your advertisement. Every time you open your mouth you let men look into your mind. Do they see it well clothed, neat, businesswise?
Bruce Burton

That must be wonderful; I have no idea of what it means.
Albert Camus

There are four ways, and only four ways, in which we have contact with the world. We are evaluated and classified by these four contacts: what we do, how we look, what we say, and how we say it.
Dale Carnegie

The royal road to a man's heart is to talk to him about the things he treasures most.
Dale Carnegie

Do but take care to express yourself in a plain, easy Manner, in well-chosen, significant and decent Terms, and to give a harmonious and pleasing Turn to your Periods: study to explain your Thoughts, and set them in the truest Light, labouring as much as possible, not to leave them dark nor intricate, but clear and intelligible.
Miguel de Cervantes
Preface to Don Quixote

If you cry Forward you must be sure to make clear the direction in which to go. Don't you see that if you fail to do that and simply call out the word to a monk and a revolutionary, they will go in precisely opposite directions?
Anton Chekhov

No comment is a splendid expression. I am using it again and again.
Sir Winston Churchill

I have never accepted what many people have kindly said-namely that I inspired the nation. Their will was resolute and remorseless, and as it proved, unconquerable. It fell to me to express it.
Sir Winston Churchill



What goes up must come down. Ask any system administrator.
Anon.

Who's General Failure and why's he reading my disk?
Anon.

The Next Computer: The hardware makes it a PC, the software makes it a workstation, the unit sales makes it a mainframe.
Anon.

Whom computers would destroy, they must first drive mad.
Anon.

If you can't beat your computer at chess, try kickboxing.
Anon.

Intel has announced its next chip: the Repentium.
Anon.

Pentiums melt in your PC, not in your hand.
Anon.

All programmers are playwrights and all computers are lousy actors.
Anon.

Want to make your computer go really fast? Throw it out a window.
Anon.

If a trainstation is where the train stops, what's a workstation...?
Anon.

Where the ENIAC is equipped with 18,000 vacuum tubes and weighs 30 tons, computers in the future may have only 1,000 vacuum tubes and weigh only 1 1/2 tons.
Anon., "Popular Mechanics", March, 1949

At the dictation of a mathematician, it will solve in a matter of hours equations never before solved because of their intricacy and the enormous time and personnel which would be required to work them out on ordinary office calculators.
Anon.
New York Times, 1944

The idea that Bill Gates has appeared like a knight in shining armor to lead all customers out of a mire of technological chaos neatly ignores the fact that it was he who, by peddling second- rate technology, led them into it in the first place.
Douglas Adams

At the present time there exist problems beyond our ability to solve, not because of theoretical difficulties, but because of insufficient means of mechanical computation.
Howard Aiken
Proposed Automatic Calculating Machine, 1937

The desire to economize time and mental effort in arithmetical computations, and to eliminate human liability to error is probably as old as the science of arithmetic itself.
Howard Aiken

Part of the inhumanity of the computer is that, once it is competently programmed and working smoothly, it is completely honest.
Isaac Asimov

I do not fear computers. I fear lack of them.
Isaac Asimov

One of the most feared expressions in modern times is The computer is down
Norman Augustine

Electronic aids, particularly domestic computers, will help the inner migration, the opting out of reality. Reality is no longer going to be the stuff out there, but the stuff inside your head. It's going to be commercial and nasty at the same time.
J. G. Ballard

I am not the only person who uses his computer mainly for the purpose of diddling with his computer.
Dave Barry

The word user is the word used by the computer professional when they mean idiot.
Dave Barry

The sad thing about artificial intelligence is that it lacks artifice and therefore intelligence.
Jean Baudrillard

Computer science only indicates the retrospective omnipotence of our technologies. In other words, an infinite capacity to process data (but only data -- i.e. the already given) and in no sense a new vision. With that science, we are entering an era of exhaustivity, which is also an era of exhaustion.
Jean Baudrillard

The most likely way for the world to be destroyed, most experts agree, is by accident. That's where we come in; we're computer professionals. We cause accidents.
Nathaniel Borenstein

Silicon Valley is like a person running around in front of a steamroller. You can outrun the steamroller on any given day. But if you ever sit down you get squashed.
Bob Boschert


I will master something, then the creativity will come.
Japanese Proverb

If you
Scott Adams

	Creativity is allowing yourself to make mistakes. Art is knowing which ones to keep.
Scott Adams

The thing that makes a creative person is to be creative and that is all there is to it.
Edward Albee

Whatever creativity is, it is in part a solution to a problem.
Brian W. Aldiss

Had I been present at the creation of the world I would have proposed some improvements.
Alfonso X

The creative person wants to be a know -it -all. He wants to know about all kinds of things: ancient history, nineteenth -century mathematics, current manufacturing techniques, flower arranging, and hog futures. Because he never knows when these ideas might come together to form a new idea. It may happen six minutes later or six months, or six years down the road. But he has faith that it will happen.
Carl Ally

No one has ever written, painted, sculpted, modeled, built, or invented except literally to get out of hell.
Antonin Artaud

The lash may force men to physical labor, it cannot force them to spiritual creativity.
Sholem Asch

All works of art are commissioned in the sense that no artist can create one by a simple act of will but must wait until what he believes to be a good idea for a work comes to him.
W. H. Auden

	Originality is the essence of true scholarship. Creativity is the soul of the true scholar.
Nnamdi Azikiwe

An inventor is a man who looks upon the world and is not contented with things as they are. He wants to improve whatever he sees, he wants to benefit the world.
Alexander Graham Bell

Much ingenuity with a little money is vastly more profitable and amusing than much money without ingenuity.
Arnold Bennett

There are two ways of being creative. One can sing and dance. Or one can create an environment in which singers and dancers flourish.
Warren Bennis

I must create a system or be enslaved by another man s; I will not reason and compare: my business is to create.
William Blake

We are all cups, constantly and quietly being filled. The trick is, knowing how to tip ourselves over and let the beautiful stuff out.
Ray Bradbury

Make visible what, without you, might perhaps never have been seen.
Robert Bresson

I set out to show that there exists single creative activity,which is displayed alike in the arts and in the sciences.It is wrong to think of science as a mechanical record of facts, and it is wrong to think of the arts as remote and private fancies. What makes each human, what makes them universal, is the stamp of the creative mind.
Jacob Bronowski
Science and Human Values (Ch.2 - The Habit of Truth)

The good ideas are all hammered out in agony by individuals, not spewed out by groups.
Charles Browder

Creativity comes from trust. Trust your instincts. And never hope more than you work.
Rita Mae Brown

The truly creative mind in any field is no more than this: a human creature born abnormally, inhumanly sensitive. To him, a touch is a blow, a sound is a noise, a misfortune is a tragedy, a joy is an ecstasy, a friend is a lover, a lover is a god, and failure is death. Add to this cruelly delicate organism the overpowering necessity to create, create, create - so that without the creating of music or poetry or books or buildings or something of meaning, his very breath is cut off from him. He must create, must pour out creation. By some strange, unknown, inward urgency he is not really alive unless he is creating.
Pearl Buck

The human mind cannot create anything. It produces nothing until after having been fertilized by experience and meditation; its acquisitions are the gems of its production.
Georges-Louis Leclerc Buffon

It is better to create than to learn! Creating is the essence of life.
Julius Caesar

	A hunch is creativity trying to tell you something.
Frank Capra

Those who create are rare; those who cannot are numerous. Therefore, the latter are stronger.
Coco Chanel


Dignity consists not in possessing honors, but in the consciousness that we deserve them.
Aristotle

Dignity belongs to the conquered.
Kenneth Burke

Every man has his dignity. I'm willing to forget mine, but at my own discretion and not when someone else tells me to.
Denis Diderot

At night, when the curtains are drawn and the fire flickers, my books attain a collective dignity.
E. M. Forster

The ultimate end of all revolutionary social change is to establish the sanctity of human life, the dignity of man, the right of every human being to liberty and well-being.
Emma Goldman

Dignity is a mask we wear to hide our ignorance.
Elbert Hubbard

There is a healthful hardiness about real dignity that never dreads contact and communion with others however humble.
Washington Irving

Only man has dignity; only man, therefore, can be funny.
Ronald Knox

True dignity is never gained by place, and never lost when honors are withdrawn.
Philip Massinger

Human rights rest on human dignity. The dignity of man is an ideal worth fighting for and worth dying for.
Robert Maynard

If a man happens to find himself, he has a mansion which he can inhabit with dignity all the days of his life.
James A. Michener

Each of us, face to face with other men, is clothed with some sort of dignity, but we know only too well all the unspeakable things that go on in the heart.
Luigi Pirandello

Perhaps the only true dignity of man is his capacity to despise himself.
George Santayana

Our dignity is not in what we do, but what we understand.
George Santayana

Human Dignity has gleamed only now and then and here and there, in lonely splendor, throughout the ages, a hope of the better men, never an achievement of the majority.
James Thurber

Never step over one duty to perform another.
English Proverb

Duty is heavy as a mountain but Death is lighter than a feather.
Japanese Proverb

Rank imposes obligation.
Anon.

The most beautiful things in the universe are the starry heavens above us and the feeling of duty within us.
Proverb

The line of life is a ragged diagonal between duty and desire.
William R. Alger

Care not for time and success. Act out thy part, whether it be to fail or to prosper.
Ghose Aurobindo

How do you know if your mission in life is finished? If you're still alive, it isn't.
Richard Bach

He who is false to present duty breaks a thread in the loom, and will find the flaw when he may have forgotten its cause.
Henry Ward Beecher

Duty. That which sternly impels us in the direction of profit, along the line of desire.
Ambrose Bierce

Do the duty which lies nearest to you, the second duty will then become clearer.
Thomas Carlyle

Our duty, as men and women, is to proceed as if limits to our ability did not exist. We are collaborators in creation.
Pierre Teilhard de Chardin

When one has come to accept a certain course as duty he has a pleasant sense of relief and of lifted responsibility, even if the course involves pain and renunciation. It is like obedience to some external authority; any clear way, though it lead to death, is mentally preferable to the tangle of uncertainty.
Charles Horton Cooley

The right thing to do never requires any subterfuge, it is always simple and direct.
Calvin Coolidge

Do your duty and leave the rest to heaven.
Pierre Corneille

Sufficient to each day are the duties to be done and the trials to be endured. God never built a Christian strong enough to carry today's duties and tomorrow's anxieties piled on the top of them.
Theodore L. Cuyler

Duty cannot exist without faith.
Benjamin Disraeli

The reward of one's duty is the power to fulfill another.
George Eliot

Do that which is assigned to you and you cannot hope too much or dare too much.
Ralph Waldo Emerson

Oh! Duty is an icy shadow. It will freeze you. It cannot fill the heart's sanctuary.
Augusta Jane Evans

Duty largely consists of pretending that the trivial is critical.
John Fowles

Can you have more than one major MISSION pervading your life? NO. That would be like coming to a fork in the road and trying to go both ways by straddling it.
Charles A. Garfield

I sighed as a lover, I obeyed as a son.
Edward Gibbon

Make your life a mission-not an intermission.
Arnold Glasgow

How can we know ourselves? Never by reflection, but only through action. Begin at once to do your duty and immediately you will know what is inside you.
Johann von Goethe

Love can do much, but duty more.
Johann von Goethe



He who dies with the most toys is, nonetheless, still dead.
Anon.

Be happy while you're living, for you're a long time dead.
Scottish Proverb

Death was afraid of him because he had the heart of a lion.
Arabic Proverb

Life is a dream walking death is a going home.
Chinese Proverb

Death is a shadow that always follows the body.
English Proverb

Death always comes too early or too late.
English Proverb

Our last garment is made without pockets.
Italian Proverb

It's astonishing how important a man becomes when he dies.
Yiddish Proverb

Once the game is over, the king and the pawn go back in the same box.
Italian Proverb

Every man goes down to his death bearing in his hands only that which he has given away.
Proverb

There is a remedy for everything; it is called death.
Proverb

Good men must die, but death cannot kill their names.
Proverb

We come and cry and that is life, we cry and go and that is death.
Proverb

If your time ain't come not even a doctor can kill you.
Proverb

The cemeteries are filled with people who thought the world couldn't get along without them.
Proverb

The fear of death often proves mortal, and sets people on methods to save their Lives, which infallibly destroy them.
Joseph Addison

See in what peace a Christian can die.
Joseph Addison

Time is not what you think. Dying? Not the end of everything. We think it is. But what happens on earth is only the beginning.
Mitch Albom
The Five People You Meet in Heaven

I'm not afraid to die, I just don't want to be there when it happens.
Woody Allen

On the plus side, death is one of the few things that can be done just as easily as lying down.
Woody Allen

I don't believe in an after life, although I am bringing a change of underwear.
Woody Allen

There are three kinds of death in this world. There's heart death, there's brain death, and there's being off the network.
Guy Almes

A dying man needs to die, as a sleepy man needs to sleep, and there comes a time when it is wrong, as well as useless, to resist.
Steward Alsop




A common mistake that people make when trying to design something completely foolproof is to underestimate the ingenuity of complete fools.
Douglas Adams

Interior design is a travesty of the architectural process and a frightening condemnation of the credulity, helplessness and gullibility of the most formidable consumers
Stephen Bayley

Why kick the man downstream who can't put the parts together because the parts really weren't designed properly?
Philip Caldwell

Perhaps believing in good design is like believing in God, it makes you an optimist.
Sir Terence Conran

Retail is detail.
James Gulliver

Art has to move you and design does not, unless it's a good design for a bus.
David Hockney

Design is not just what it looks like. Design is how it works.
Steve Jobs

ARCHITECTURE, n: The art of how to waste space.
Philip Johnson

Design in art, is a recognition of the relation between various things, various elements in the creative flux. You can't invent a design. You recognize it, in the fourth dimension. That is, with your blood and your bones, as well as with your eyes.
D. H. (David Herbert) Lawrence

Design is not for philosophy -- it's for life.
Issey Miyake

Always design a thing by considering it in its next larger context -- a chair in a room, a room in a house, a house in an environment, an environment in a city plan.
Eliel Saarinen, "Time", July 2, 1956

Architecture in general is frozen music.
F.W.J. Schelling

Form follows function.
Louis Henri Sullivan, "Lippincott's Magazine", March, 1896

Less is more. see Browning
Mies Van der Rohe

Architecture is the will of an epoch translated into space.
Mies Van der Rohe

In architecture as in all other operative arts, the end must direct the operation. The end is to build well. Well building has three conditions: Commodity, Firmness and Delight.
Henry Watton

The complaint about modern steel furniture, modern glass houses, modern red bars and modern streamlined trains and cars is that all these objets modernize, while adequate and amusing in themselves, tend to make the people who use them look dated. It is an honest criticism. The human race has done nothing much about changing its own appearance to conform to the form and texture of its appurtenances.
E.B. (Elwyn Brooks) White

Noble life demands a noble architecture for noble uses of noble men. Lack of culture means what it has always meant: ignoble civilization and therefore imminent downfall.
Frank Lloyd Wright

Designs in connection with postage stamps and coinage may be described, I think, as the silent ambassadors on national taste.
William Butler Yeats


Glutton: one who digs his grave with his teeth.
Proverb

The most violent appetites in all creatures are lust and hunger; the first is a perpetual call upon them to propagate their kind, the latter to preserve themselves.
Joseph Addison

Outside every fat man there was an even fatter man trying to close in.
Kingsley Amis

Changing our diet is something we choose to do, not something we are forced to do. Instead of dreading it, try saying, Here's another thing I get to do to help myself. Great!
Greg Anderson

I don't weigh a pound over one hundred and eighty and, what's more, I never did.
Fatty Arbuckle

The obese is in a total delirium. For he is not only large, of a size opposed to normal morphology: he is larger than large. He no longer makes sense in some distinctive opposition, but in his excess, his redundancy.
Jean Baudrillard

Probably nothing in the world arouses more false hopes Than the first four hours of a diet.
Samuel Beckett

The miser and the glutton are two facetious buzzards: one hides his store, and the other stores his hide.
Josh Billings

Every day the fat woman dies a series of small deaths.
Shelley Bovey

I don't mind that I'm fat. You still get the same money.
Marlon Brando

Their kitchen is their shrine, the cook their priest, the table their altar, and their belly their god.
Charles Buck

Imprisoned in every fat man, a thin one is wildly signaling to be let out.
Cyril Connolly

'Tis a superstition to insist on a special diet. All is made at last of the same chemical atoms.
Ralph Waldo Emerson

One meal a day is enough for a lion, and it ought to be for a man.
George Fordyce

In general, mankind, since the improvement of cookery, eats twice as much as nature requires.
Benjamin Franklin

I have always wanted a mistress who was fat, and I have never found one. To make a fool of me, they are always pregnant.
Paul Gauguin

it's a sex object if you're pretty and no love or love and no sex if you're fat
Nikki Giovanni

Thin people are beautiful, but fat people are adorable.
Jackie Gleason

A poor man who eats too much, as contradistinguished from a gourmand, who is a rich man who lives well.
Elbert Hubbard

Who ever hears of fat men heading a riot, or herding together in turbulent mobs? No -- no, your lean, hungry men who are continually worrying society, and setting the whole community by the ears.
Washington Irving

When the stomach is full, it is easy to talk of fasting.
St. Jerome

They whose sole bliss is eating can give but that one brutish reason why they live.
Juvenal

Appetite is essentially insatiable, and where it operates as a criterion of both action and enjoyment (that is, everywhere in the Western world since the sixteenth century) it will infallibly discover congenial agencies (mechanical and political) of expression.
Marshall McLuhan

Some people are born to fatness. Others have to get there.
Les Murray

How easy for those who do not bulge to not overindulge!
Ogden Nash




I dreamed a thousand new paths. I woke and walked my old one.
Chinese Proverb

If you want your dreams to come true, don't over sleep.
Yiddish Proverb

If you have only two pennies left in the world, with the first penny, you should buy rice to feed your family. With the second penny, say the wise Japanese, you should buy a lily. The Japanese understand the importance of dreaming...
Japanese Proverb

When one of your dreams come true, you begin to look at the others more carefully.
Anon.

He felt that his whole life was some kind of dream and he sometimes wondered whose it was and whether they were enjoying it.
Douglas Adams

Our dreams drench us in senses, and senses steps us again in dreams.
Amos Bronson Alcott

He dreamed he was eating shredded wheat and woke up to find the mattress half gone.
Fred A. Allen

The vision that you glorify in your mind, the ideal that you enthrone in your heart - this you will build your life by, and this you will become.
James Allen

Dream lofty dreams, and as you dream, so you shall become. Your vision is the promise of what you shall one day be; your ideal is the prophecy of what you shall at last unveil.
James Allen

The greatest achievements were at first and for a time dreams. The oak sleeps in the acorn.
James Allen

What if nothing exists and we're all in somebody's dream? Or what's worse, what if only that fat guy in the third row exists?
Woody Allen

I have heard it said that the first ingredient of success -- the earliest spark in the dreaming youth -- if this; dream a great dream.
John A. Appleman

O reason, reason, abstract phantom of the waking state, I had already expelled you from my dreams, now I have reached a point where those dreams are about to become fused with apparent realities: now there is only room here for myself.
Louis Aragon

Because thou must not dream, thou need not despair.
Matthew Arnold

When asked what he would do if he only had six months to live: Type faster.
Isaac Asimov

A daydream is a meal at which images are eaten. Some of us are gourmets, some gourmands, and a good many take their images precooked out of a can and swallow them down whole, absent-mindedly and with little relish.
W. H. Auden

Reverie is not a mind vacuum. It is rather the gift of an hour which knows the plenitude of the soul.
Gaston Bachelard

Dreams have only the pigmentation of fact.
Djuna Barnes

Let sleep itself be an exercise in piety, for such as our life and conduct have been, so also of necessity will be our dreams.
St. Basil

For in the end it is Middle-Earth and its dwellers that we love, not Tolkien's considerable gifts in showing it to us. I said once that the world he charts was there long before him, and I still believe it. He is a great enough magician to tap our most common nightmares, daydreams and twilight fancies, but he never invented them either: he found them a place to live, a green alternative to each day's madness here in a poisoned world. We are raised to honor all the wrong explorers and discoverers - thieves planting flags, murderers carrying crosses. Let us at last praise the colonizers of dreams.
Peter S. Beagle

If there were dreams to sell, what would you buy?
Thomas Lovell Beddoes

A dream becomes a goal when action is taken toward its achievement.
Bo Bennett

Who so regardeth dreams is like him that catcheth at a shadow, and followeth after the wind. Ecclesiasticus 34:2
Bible

America has been a land of dreams. A land where the aspirations of people from countries cluttered with rich, cumbersome, aristocratic, ideological pasts can reach for what once seemed unattainable. Here they have tried to make dreams come true. Yet now... we are threatened by a new and particularly American menace. It is not the menace of class war, of ideology, of poverty, of disease, of illiteracy, or demagoguery, or of tyranny, though these now plague most of the world. It is the menace of unreality.
Daniel J. Boorstin



Efficiency is intelligent laziness. This quote had been associated with David Dunham, who has stated that he is not the originator.
Anon.

If a job's worth doing, it's worth doing well.
Proverb

One may go a long way after one is tired.
Proverb

Too aim is not enough, you must hit!
Proverb

I don't feel right unless I have a sport to play or at least a way to work up a sweat.
Hank Aaron

The human condition is such that pain and effort are not just symptoms which can be removed without changing life itself; they are the modes in which life itself, together with the necessity to which it is bound, makes itself felt. For mortals, the easy life of the gods would be a lifeless life.
Hannah Arendt

You are never given a wish without also being given the power to make it come true. You may have to work for it, however.
Richard Bach

There is no comparison between that which is lost by not succeeding and that which is lost by not trying.
Francis Bacon

If you want something done, ask a busy person to do it. The more things you do, the more you can do.
Lucille Ball

I've always tried to do my best on the ball field. I can't do any more than that. I always try to give one hundred percent; and if my team loses, I come back and give one hundred percent the next day.
Jesse Barfield

Slumps are like a soft bed. They're easy to get into and hard to get out of.
Johnny Bench

It is easier to go down a hill than up, but the view is from the top.
Arnold Bennett

Easy DOESN'T do it.
Al Bernstein

You have to give 100 percent in the first half of the game. If that isn't enough, in the second half, you have to give what is left.
Yogi Berra

The race is not to the swift, nor the battle to the strong, neither yet bread to the wise, nor yet riches to men of understanding, nor yet favor to men of skill; but time and chance happeneth to them all. Ecclesiastes 9:11
Bible

Push yourself again and again. Don't give an inch until the final buzzer sounds.
Larry Bird

I like to be against the odds. I'm not afraid to be lonely at the top. With me, it's just the satisfaction of the game. Just performance.
Barry Bonds

It's the constant and determined effort that breaks down resistance, sweeps away all obstacles.
Claude M. Bristol

Life doesn't require that we be the best, only that we try our best.
H. Jackson Brown, Jr.

Inscribe all human effort with one word, artistry's haunting curse, the Incomplete!
Robert Browning

The Buddhas do but tell the way; it is for you to swelter at the task.
Buddha

Continuous effort, not strength or intelligence is the key to unlocking our potential.
Liane Cardes

There's no taking trout with dry breeches.
Miguel de Cervantes

It is no use saying, 'We are doing our best.' You have got to succeed in doing what is necessary.
Sir Winston Churchill

World records are only borrowed.
Sebastian Coe



They know enough who know how to learn.
Henry Adams

There are two educations. One should teach us how to make a living and the other how to live.
John Adams

America's future will be determined by the home and the school. The child becomes largely what he is taught; hence we must watch what we teach, and how we live.
Jane Addams

Education is a companion which no misfortune can depress, no crime can destroy, no enemy can alienate,no despotism can enslave. At home, a friend, abroad, an introduction, in solitude a solace and in society an ornament.It chastens vice, it guides virtue, it gives at once grace and government to genius. Without it, what is man? A splendid slave, a reasoning savage.
Joseph Addison

What sculpture is to a block of marble, education is to an human soul.
Joseph Addison

Life is my college. May I graduate well, and earn some honors.
Louisa May Alcott

Education helps one case cease being intimidated by strange situations.
Maya Angelou

The quality of strength lined with tenderness is an unbeatable combination, as are intelligence and necessity when unblunted by formal education.
Maya Angelou

If all the rich and all of the church people should send their children to the public schools they would feel bound to concentrate their money on improving these schools until they met the highest ideals.
Susan B. Anthony

Repeticio est mater studiorum.
Thomas Aquinas

I was allowed to ring the bell for five minutes until everyone was in assembly. It was the beginning of power.
Jeffrey Archer

To be sure, nothing is more important to the integrity of the universities than a rigorously enforced divorce from war-oriented research and all connected enterprises.
Hannah Arendt

Education is the best provision for old age.
Aristotle

The educated differ from the uneducated as much as the living from the dead.
Aristotle

Those who educate children well are more to be honored than they who produce them; for these only gave them life, those the art of living well.
Aristotle

Education is an ornament in prosperity and a refuge in adversity.
Aristotle

The roots of education are bitter, but the fruit is sweet.
Aristotle

Home of lost causes, and forsaken beliefs, and unpopular names, and impossible loyalties!
Matthew Arnold

What we must look for here is, firstly, religious and moral principles; secondly, gentlemanly conduct; thirdly, intellectual ability.
Thomas Arnold

The race of prophets is extinct. Europe is becoming set in its ways, slowly embalming itself beneath the wrappings of its borders, its factories, its law-courts and its universities. The frozen Mind cracks between the mineral staves which close upon it. The fault lies with your moldy systems, your logic of 2 + 2 = 4. The fault lies with you, Chancellors, caught in the net of syllogisms. You manufacture engineers, magistrates, doctors, who know nothing of the true mysteries of the body or the cosmic laws of existence. False scholars blind outside this world, philosophers who pretend to reconstruct the mind. The least act of spontaneous creation is a more complex and revealing world than any metaphysics.
Antonin Artaud

Essentialists hope that when students leave school, they will possess not only basic skills and an extensive body of knowledge, but also disciplined, practical minds, capable of applying schoolhouse lessons in the real world.
William C. Bagley

The paradox of education is precisely this -- that as one begins to become conscious one begins to examine the society in which he is being educated.
James Baldwin

It is very nearly impossible... to become an educated person in a country so distrustful of the independent mind.
James Baldwin

A child cannot be taught by anyone who despises him, and a child cannot afford to be fooled.
James Baldwin

Education is the knowledge of how to use the whole of oneself. Many men use but one or two faculties out of the score with which they are endowed. A man is educated who knows how to make a tool of every faculty--how to open it, how to keep it sharp, and how to apply it to all practical purposes.
Henry Ward Beecher



A man is not rightly conditioned until he is a happy, healthy, and prosperous being; and happiness, health, and prosperity are the result of a harmonious adjustment of the inner with the outer of the man with his surroundings.
James Allen

The first step toward success is taken when you refuse to be a captive of the environment in which you first find yourself.
Mark Caine

People blame their environment. There is only one person to blame -- and only one -- themselves.
Robert Collier

Man shapes himself through decision that shape his environment.
Ren

Every man is like the company he is wont to keep.
Euripides

When we become a part of anything, it becomes a part of us.
David Harold Fink

We are on the precipice of climate system tipping points beyond which there is no redemption.
James Hansen

We begin to see, therefore, the importance of selecting our environment with the greatest of care, because environment is the mental feeding ground out of which the food that goes into our minds is extracted.
Napoleon Hill

A person is either the effect of his environment or is able to have an effect upon his environment.
L. Ron Hubbard

A strong, successful man is not the victim of his environment. He creates favorable conditions. His own inherent force and energy compel things to turn out as he desires.
Orison Swett Marden

Every experience in life, everything with which we have come in contact in life, is a chisel which has been cutting away at our life statue, molding, modifying, shaping it. We are part of all we have met. Everything we have seen, heard, felt or thought has had its hand in molding us, shaping us.
Orison Swett Marden

We make the world we live in and shape our own environment.
Orison Swett Marden

Your outlook upon life, your estimate of yourself, your estimate of your value are largely colored by your environment. Your whole career will be modified, shaped, molded by your surroundings, by the character of the people with whom you come in contact every day...
Orison Swett Marden

Our environment, the world in which we live and work, is a mirror of our attitudes and expectations.
Earl Nightingale

We are the environment.
Charles Panati

We live in a web of ideas, a fabric of our own making.
Joseph Chilton Pearce

We are shaped by each other. We adjust not to the reality of a world, but to the reality of other thinkers.
Joseph Chilton Pearce

We found that the most exciting environments, that treated people very well, are also tough as nails. There is no bureaucratic mumbo-jumbo... excellent companies provide two things simultaneously: tough environments and very supportive environments.
Thomas J. Peters

It isn't pollution that's harming the environment. It's the impurities in our air and water that are doing it.
Dan Quayle

You are a product of your environment. So choose the environment that will best develop you toward your objective. Analyze your life in terms of its environment. Are the things around you helping you toward success -- or are they holding you back?
W. Clement Stone




Perfect love cannot be without equality.
Scottish Proverb

Choose your friends by their character and your socks by their color. Choosing your socks by their character makes no sense, and choosing your friends by their color is unthinkable.
Anon.

Six feet of earth make all men equal.
Proverb

You cannot have all chiefs; you gotta have Indians too.
Proverb

A friend to everybody and to nobody is the same thing.
Proverb

Divine Justice demands that the rights of both sexes should be equally respected since neither is superior to the other in the eyes of Heaven. Dignity before God depends, not on sex, but on purity and luminosity of heart. Human virtues belong equally to all!
Abdu'l-Baha Paris Talks

Women have been trained to speak softly and carry a lipstick. Those days are over.
Bella Abzug

The test for whether or not you can hold a job should not be the arrangement of your chromosomes.
Bella Abzug

I began wearing hats as a young lawyer because it helped me to establish my professional identity. Before that, whenever I was at a meeting, someone would ask me to get coffee...
Bella Abzug

The rich man in his castle, the poor man at his gate, God made them, high or lowly, and ordered their estate.
Cecil Frances Alexander

The true republic
Susan B. Anthony



By nature all men are equal in liberty, but not in other endowments.
Thomas Aquinas

The beginning of reform is not so much to equalize property as to train the noble sort of natures not to desire more, and to prevent the lower from getting more.
Aristotle

Equality consists in the same treatment of similar persons.
Aristotle

The worst form of inequality is to try to make unequal things equal.
Aristotle

When Adam delved and Eve span, who was then the gentleman?
John Ball

Equality may perhaps be a right, but no power on earth can ever turn it into a fact.
Honore de Balzac

The most mediocre of males feels himself a demigod as compared with women.
Simone de Beauvoir

We've got a generation now who were born with semi equality. They don't know how it was before, so they think, this isn't too bad. We're working. We have our attache cases and our three piece suits. I get very disgusted with the younger generation of women. We had a torch to pass, and they are just sitting there. They don't realize it can be taken away. Things are going to have to get worse before they join in fighting the battle.
Erma Bombeck

There has to be positive action that allows the most disadvantaged people to get their fair share of job opportunities.
Paul Burton

We accept and welcome... as conditions to which we must accommodate ourselves, great inequality of environment; the concentration of business, industrial and commercial, in the hands of a few; and the law of competition between these, as being not only beneficial, but essential for the future progress of the race.
Andrew Carnegie

My grandma (rest her soul) used to say, There were but two families in the world, have-much and have-little.
Miguel de Cervantes

Engrave this Quote
Miguel de Cervantes

Equal opportunity is good, but special privilege is better.
Anna Chennault



If a man deceives me once, shame on him; if he deceives me twice, shame on me.
Italian Proverb

Experience is a comb which nature gives to men when they are bald.
Chinese Proverb

A burnt child dreads the fire.
English Proverb

I know by my own pot how the others boil.
Proverb

He who has been bitten by a snake fears a piece of string.
Proverb

Every creator painfully experiences the chasm between his inner vision and its ultimate expression.
Cleveland Amory

Experience is a good teacher, but she sends in terrific bills.
Minna Antrim

Experience is a private, and a very largely speechless affair.
James Baldwin

Experience that destroys innocents also leads one back to it.
James Baldwin

You should make a point of trying every experience once, excepting incest and folk dancing.
Arnold Bax

Our days are a kaleidoscope. Every instant a change takes place in the contents. New harmonies, new contrasts, new combinations of every sort. Nothing ever happens twice alike. The most familiar people stand each moment in some new relation to each other, to their work, to surrounding objects. The most tranquil house, with the most serene inhabitants, living upon the utmost regularity of system, is yet exemplifying infinite diversities.
Henry Ward Beecher

Experience is determined by yourself -- not the circumstances of your life.
Gita Bellin

Only he who can view his own past as an abortion sprung from compulsion and need can use it to full advantage in the present. For what one has lived is at best comparable to a beautiful statue which has had all its limbs knocked off in transit, and now yields nothing but the precious block out of which the image of one's future must be hewn.
Walter Benjamin

Bad experience is a school that only fools keep going to.
Ezra Taft Benson

Experience is a revelation in the light of which we renounce our errors of youth for those of age.
Ambrose Bierce

Experience. The wisdom that enables us to recognize in an undesirable old acquaintance the folly that we have already embraced.
Ambrose Bierce

Experience is a school where a man learns what a big fool he has been.
Josh Billings

Experience increases our wisdom but doesn't reduce our follies.
Josh Billings

There is nothing so easy to learn as experience and nothing so hard to apply.
Josh Billings

Few people even scratch the surface, much less exhaust the contemplation of their own experience.
Randolph Silliman Bourne

Experience isn't interesting until it begins to repeat itself. In fact, till it does that, it hardly is experience.
Elizabeth Bowen

Experience should teach us to be most on our guard to protect liberty when the Government's purposes are beneficent. Men born to freedom are naturally alert to repel invasion of their liberty by evil minded rulers. The greatest dangers to liberty lurk in insidious encroachment by men of zeal well meaning but without understanding.
Louis D. Brandeis

Experience, like a pale musician, holds a dulcimer of patience in his hand.
Elizabeth Barrett Browning

I do not accept any absolute formulas for living. No preconceived code can see ahead to everything that can happen in a man's life. As we live, we grow and our beliefs change. They must change. So I think we should live with this constant discovery. We should be open to this adventure in heightened awareness of living. We should stake our whole existence on our willingness to explore and experience.
Martin Buber

I reached in experience the nirvana which is unborn, unrivalled, secure from attachment, undecaying and unstained. This condition is indeed reached by me which is deep, difficult to see, difficult to understand, tranquil, excellent, beyond the reach of mere logic, subtle, and to be realized only by the wise.
Buddha




Do not look where you fell, but where you slipped.
African Proverb

Everyone pushes a falling fence.
Chinese Proverb

The great question is not whether you have failed, but whether you are content with failure.
Chinese Proverb

When someone is going downhill everyone likes to give them a kick.
Proverb

Who has never tasted what is bitter does not know what is sweet.
Proverb

No matter how far you have gone on a wrong road, turn back.
Proverb

I have always felt that although someone may defeat me, and I strike out in a ball game, the pitcher on the particular day was the best player. But I know when I see him again, I'm going to be ready for his curve ball. Failure is a part of success. There is no such thing as a bed of roses all your life. But failure will never stand in the way of success if you learn from it.
Hank Aaron

The typical human life seems to be quite unplanned, undirected, unlived, and unsavored. Only those who consciously think about the adventure of living as a matter of making choices among options, which they have found for themselves, ever establish real self-control and live their lives fully.
Karl Albrecht

They fail, and they alone, who have not striven.
Thomas Bailey Aldrich

There are few things more dreadful than dealing with a man who knows he is going under, in his own eyes, and in the eyes of others. Nothing can help that man. What is left of that man flees from what is left of human attention.
James Baldwin

We are all failures -- at least, all the best of us are.
James Barrie

If you don't stand for something, you'll fall for anything.
Steve Bartkowski

We pay just as dearly for our triumphs as we do for our defeats. Go ahead and fail. But fail with wit, fail with grace, fail with style. A mediocre failure is as insufferable as a mediocre success. Embrace failure! Seek it out. Learn to love it. That may be the only way any of us will ever be free. Tom Robbins Before you give up hope, turn back and read the attacks that were made on Lincoln.
Bruce Barton

I wasn't afraid to fail. Something good always comes out of failure.
Anne Baxter

It's best to have failure happen early in life. It wakes up the Phoenix bird in you so you rise from the ashes.
Anne Baxter

Ever tried. Ever failed. No matter. Try Again. Fail again. Fail better.
Samuel Beckett

On this path effort never goes to waste, and there is no failure. Even a little effort toward spiritual awareness will protect you from the greatest fear.
Bhagavad Gita

A failure will not appear until a unit has passed final inspection.
Arthur Bloch

My downfall raises me to infinite heights.
Napoleon Bonaparte

No one ever won a chess game by betting on each move. Sometimes you have to move backward to get a step forward.
Amar Gopal Bose

Nothing fails like success because we don't learn from it. We learn only from failure.
Kenneth Ewart Boulding

A failure establishes only this, that our determination to succeed was not strong enough.
Christian Nevell Bovee

To win you've got to stay in the game.
Claude M. Bristol

You must think of failure and defeat as the springboards to new achievements or to the next level of accomplishment.
Les Brown

Failure is an event, never a person.
William D. Brown


The mark of your ignorance is the depth of your belief in injustice and tragedy. What the caterpillar calls the end of the world, the master calls a butterfly.
Anon.

Weave in faith and God will find the thread.
Proverb

A person consists of his faith. Whatever is his faith, even so is he.
Proverb

Faith is a continuation of reason.
William Adams

In faith and hope the world will disagree, But all mankind's concern is charity.
Alexander The Great

Where faith is there is courage, there is fortitude, there is steadfastness and strength... Faith bestows that sublime courage that rises superior to the troubles and disappointments of life, that acknowledges no defeat except as a step to victory; that is strong to endure, patient to wait, and energetic to struggle... Light up, then, the lamp of faith in your heart... It will lead you safely through the mists of doubt and the black darkness of despair; along the narrow, thorny ways of sickness and sorrow, and over the treacherous places of temptation and uncertainty.
James Allen

Faith has to do with things that are not seen, and hope with things that are not in hand.
Thomas Aquinas

If we become completely whole-hearted we will have love for all people and will seek in each person what is most holy, what God has inspired in him or her. And only then will there be no danger of softening or twisting our witness. Why? Because the capacity of our faith will no longer be narrow. If we are not broadhearted, we have not yet grasped the meaning of faith. We must always be ready to be newly led in our faith, even through the tiniest atom of godliness we find in others. It is that which leads us to the kingdom of God. We affirm that there is something of God in all people -- something of the light. It may only gleam now, but it will eventually lead to complete illumination.
Eberhard Arnold

May it not be that, just as we have to have faith in Him, God has to have faith in us and, considering the history of the human race so far, may it not be that faith is even more difficult for Him than it is for us?
W. H. Auden

In order to be a realist you must believe in miracles.
Henry Christopher Bailey

Faith is a higher faculty than reason.
Henry Christopher Bailey

You don't decide to build a church because you have money in the bank. You build because God says this is what I should do. Faith is the supplier of things hoped for and the evidence of things not seen.
Jim Bakker

The ablest men in all walks of modern life are men of faith. Most of them have much more faith than they themselves realize.
Bruce Barton

Faith without works is like a bird without wings; though she may hop with her companions on earth, yet she will never fly with them to heaven.
Francis Beaumont

Our faith in the present dies out long before our faith in the future.
Ruth Benedict

Faith is not a thing which one loses, we merely cease to shape our lives by it.
Georges Bernanos

I believe though I do not comprehend, and I hold by faith what I cannot grasp with the mind.
St. Bernard

Now faith is the assurance of things hoped for, the conviction of things not seen. Hebrews 11:1
Bible

All things are possible to him who believes. Mark 9:23
Bible

According to your faith; be it done unto you.
Bible

And without faith it is impossible to please him, for he who comes to God must believe that he is, and that he is a rewarder of those who seek him. Hebrews 11:6
Bible

If thou canst believe, all things are possible to him that believeth. Mark 9:23
Bible

For verily I say unto you, that whosoever shall say unto this mountain, Be thou removed, and be thou cast into the sea; and shall not doubt in his heart, but shall believe that those things which he saith shall come to pass; he shall have whatsoever he saith.
Bible

Be ready always to give an answer to every man that asketh you a reason of the hope that is in you. Peter 3:15
Bible

For the invisible things of him from the creation of the world are clearly seen, being understood by the things that are made... Romans 1:20
Bible




None but a mule denies his family.
Arabic Proverb

All people are your relatives, therefore expect only trouble from them.
Chinese Proverb

Govern a family as you would cook a small fish -- very gently.
Chinese Proverb

In a broken nest there are few whole eggs.
Chinese Proverb

Man is the head of the family, woman the neck that turns the head.
Chinese Proverb

A small family is soon provided for.
English Proverb

Look for the good, not the evil, in the conduct of members of the family.
Yiddish Proverb

One of life's greatest mysteries is how the boy who wasn't good enough to marry your daughter can be the father of the smartest grandchild in the world.
Yiddish Proverb

When a father gives to his son, both laugh; when a son gives to his father, both cry.
Yiddish Proverb

A friend who is near and dear may in time become as useless as a relative.
George Ade

The family is the school of duties... founded on love.
Felix Adler

A farmer who had a quarrelsome family called his sons and told them to lay a bunch of sticks before him. Then, after laying the sticks parallel to one another and binding them, he challenged his sons, one after one, to pick up the bundle and break it. They all tried, but in vain. Then, untying the bundle, he gave them the sticks to break one by one. This they did with the greatest ease. Then said the father, Thus, my sons, as long as you remain united, you are a match for anything, but differ and separate, and you are undone.
Aesop

Our notion of the perfect society embraces the family as its center and ornament, and this paradise is not secure until children appear to animate and complete the picture.
Amos Bronson Alcott

Even as the cell is the unit of the organic body, so the family is the unit of society.
Ruth Nanda Anshen

Love, by reason of its passion, destroys the in-between which relates us to and separates us from others. As long as its spell lasts, the only in-between which can insert itself between two lovers is the child, love's own product. The child, this in-between to which the lovers now are related and which they hold in common, is representative of the world in that it also separates them; it is an indication that they will insert a new world into the existing world. Through the child, it is as though the lovers return to the world from which their love had expelled them. But this new worldliness, the possible result and the only possibly happy ending of a love affair, is, in a sense, the end of love, which must either overcome the partners anew or be transformed into another mode of belonging together.
Hannah Arendt

Cruel is the strife of brothers.
Aristotle

Rarely do members of the same family grow up under the same roof.
Richard Bach

He that hath wife and children hath given hostages to fortune; for they are impediments to great enterprises, either of virtue or mischief.
Francis Bacon

You leave home to seek your fortune and, when you get it, you go home and share it with your family.
Anita Baker

The babe at first feeds upon the mother's bosom, but it is always on her heart.
Henry Ward Beecher

There is no friendship, no love, like that of the parent for the child.
Henry Ward Beecher

Family jokes, though rightly cursed by strangers, are the bond that keeps most families alive.
Stella Benson

He followed in his father's footsteps, but his gait was somewhat erratic.
Nicolas Bentley

A brother offended is harder to be won than a strong city: and their contentions are like the bars of a castle. Proverbs 18:19
Bible

You hear a lot of dialogue on the death of the American family. Families aren't dying. They're merging into big conglomerates.
Erma Bombeck




A father is a banker provided by nature.
Proverb

Certain is it that there is no kind of affection so purely angelic as of a father to a daughter. In love to our wives there is desire; to our sons, ambition; but to our daughters there is something which there are no words to express.
Joseph Addison

That he delights in the misery of others no man will confess, and yet what other motive can make a father cruel?
Joseph Addison

Sir Walter, being strangely surprised and put out of his countenance at so great a table, gives his son a damned blow over the face. His son, as rude as he was, would not strike his father, but strikes over the face the gentleman that sat next to him and said Box about: twill come to my father anon.
John Aubrey

A father is always making his baby into a little woman. And when she is a woman he turns her back again.
Enid Bagnold

If the relationship of father to son could really be reduced to biology, the whole earth would blaze with the glory of fathers and sons.
James Baldwin

Call no man your father upon the earth, for one is your Father, which is in heaven.
Bible

Fathers do not exasperate your children; instead, bring them up in the training and instruction of the Lord. Ephesians 6:4
Bible

When God was creating fathers, He started with a tall frame. An angel nearby said, What kind of father is that? If you
Erma Bombeck

Those who have never had a father can at any rate never know the sweets of losing one. To most men the death of his father is a new lease of life.
Samuel Butler

As fathers commonly go, it is seldom a misfortune to be fatherless; and considering the general run of sons, as seldom a misfortune to be childless.
Lord Chesterfield

Blessed indeed is the man who hears many gentle voices call him father!
Lydia Maria Child

The father who does not teach his son his duties is equally guilty with the son who neglects them.
Confucius

Father...knows exactly what those boys at the mall have in their depraved little minds because he once owned such a depraved little mind himself. In fact, if he thinks enough about the plans that he used to have for young girls, the father not only will support his wife in keeping their daughter home but he might even run over to the mall and have a few of those boys arrested.
Bill Cosby

If the new American father feels bewildered and even defeated, let him take comfort from the fact that whatever he does in any fathering situation has a fifty percent chance of being right.
Bill Cosby

You know, fathers just have a way of putting everything together.
Erika Cosby

Be kind to thy father, for when thou were young, who loved thee so fondly as he? He caught the first accents that fell from thy tongue, and joined in thy innocent glee.
Margaret Courtney

In peace the sons bury their fathers, but in war the fathers bury their sons.
Croesus

I watched a small man with thick calluses on both hands work fifteen and sixteen hours a day. I saw him once literally bleed from the bottoms of his feet, a man who came here uneducated, alone, unable to speak the language, who taught me all I needed to know about faith and hard work by the simple eloquence of his example.
Mario Cuomo

What a dreadful thing it must be to have a dull father.
Mary Mapes Dodge

I believe that what we become depends on what our fathers teach us at odd moments, when they aren't trying to teach us.
Umberto Eco

Noble fathers have noble children.
Euripides

To a father growing old nothing is dearer than a daughter.
Euripides

I cannot think of any need in childhood as strong as the need for a father's protection.
Sigmund Freud

To be a successful father... there's one absolute rule: when you have a kid, don't look at it for the first two years.
Ernest Hemingway


Fear less, hope more; eat less, chew more; whine less breathe more; talk less, say more; hate less, love more; and all good things are yours.
Swedish Proverb

According to legend, one day a man was wandering in the desert when he met Fear and Plague. They said they were on their way to a large city where they were going to kill 10,000 people. The man asked Plague if he was going to do all the work. Plague smiled and said, No, I'll only take care of a few hundred. I'll let my friend Fear do the rest.
Anon.

He who fears to suffer, suffers from fear.
Proverb

That fear may reach all, punish but few.
Proverb

A scalded cat dreads cold water.
Proverb

People always make the wolf more formidable than he is.
Proverb

Fear the man who fears you.
Proverb

Fear only two: God, and the man who has no fear of God.
Proverb

As the ostrich when pursued hideth his head, but forgetteth his body; so the fears of a coward expose him to danger.
Akhenaton

People are only mean when they're threatened, and that's what our culture does. That's what our economy does.
Mitch Albom

It is not a matter of being fearless. The fear is sometimes constant, but it's about moving forward regardless of the fear. Courage means feeling the fear and doing it anyway.
Gillian Anderson

Fear is a disease that eats away at logic and makes man inhuman.
Marian Anderson

An ugly sight, a man who is afraid.
Jean Anouilh

Come to the edge, He said. They said, We are afraid. Come to the edge, He said. They came. He pushed them... and they flew.
Guillaume Apollinaire

Every time you win, it diminishes the fear a little bit. You never really cancel the fear of losing; you keep challenging it.
Arthur Ashe

It is not death that a man should fear, but he should fear never beginning to live.
Marcus Aurelius

You mistake me, my dear. I have a high respect for your nerves. They are my old friends. I have heard you mention them with consideration these twenty years at least.
Jane Austen

Men fear death as children fear to go in the dark; and as that natural fear in children is increased with tales, so is the other.
Francis Bacon

It is a miserable state of mind to have few things to desire and many things to fear.
Francis Bacon

At man's core there is a voice that wants him never to give in to fear. But if it is true that in general man cannot give in to fear, at the very least he postpones indefinitely the moment when he will have to confront himself with the object of his fear... when he will no longer have the assistance of reason as guaranteed by God, or when he will no longer have the assistance of God such as reason guaranteed. It is necessary to recoil, but it is necessary to leap, and perhaps one only recoils in order to leap better.
Georges Bataille

Fear is not a good teacher. The lessons of fear are quickly forgotten.
Mary Catherine Bateson

Terror is as much a part of the concept of truth as runniness is of the concept of jam. We wouldn't like jam if it didn't, by its very nature, ooze. We wouldn't like truth if it wasn't sticky, if, from time to time, it didn't ooze blood.
Jean Baudrillard

Fear secretes acids; but love and trust are sweet juices.
Henry Ward Beecher

Fear is met and destroyed with courage.
James F. Bell

Tell us your phobias, and we will tell you what you are afraid of.
Robert Benchley




He who eats alone chokes alone.
Arabic Proverb

Don't dig your grave with your knife and fork.
English Proverb

Hunger is the best sauce.
Italian Proverb

Coffee should be black as Hell, strong as death, and sweet as love.
Proverb

A good meal ought to begin with hunger.
Proverb

Appetite comes with eating; the more one has, the more one would have.
Proverb

He that eats till he is sick must fast till he is well.
Proverb

The most dangerous food to eat is a wedding cake.
Proverb

Seven's a banquet nine a brawl.
Proverb

Much meat, much disease.
Proverb

Hunger is a good cook.
Proverb

Gluttony kills more than the sword.
Proverb

I will not eat oysters. I want my food dead -- not sick, not wounded -- dead.
Woody Allen

We live in an age when pizza gets to your home before the police.
Jeff Arder

The first law of dietetics seems to be if it tastes good, its bad for you.
Isaac Asimov

Talk of joy: there may be things better than beef stew and baked potatoes and home-made bread -- there may be.
Ray Stannard Baker [David Grayson]

I would like to find a stew that will give me heartburn immediately, instead of at three o clock in the morning.
John Barrymore

Public and private food in America has become eatable, here and there extremely good. Only the fried potatoes go unchanged, as deadly as before.
Luigi Barzini

They eat the dainty food of famous chefs with the same pleasure with which they devour gross peasant dishes, mostly composed of garlic and tomatoes, or fisherman's octopus and shrimps, fried in heavily scented olive oil on a little deserted beach.
Luigi Barzini

Sadder than destitution, sadder than a beggar is the man who eats alone in public. Nothing more contradicts the laws of man or beast, for animals always do each other the honor of sharing or disputing each other's food.
Jean Baudrillard

A gourmet who thinks of calories is like a tart, who looks at her watch.
James Beard

Only the pure in heart can make a good soup.
Ludwig van Beethoven

Taking food alone tends to make one hard and coarse. Those accustomed to it must lead a Spartan life if they are not to go downhill. Hermits have observed, if for only this reason, a frugal diet. For it is only in company that eating is done justice; food must be divided and distributed if it is to be well received.
Walter Benjamin

Yogi ordered a pizza. The waitress asked How many pieces do you want your pie cut? Yogi responded, Four. I don't think I could eat eight.
Yogi Berra

Put a knife to thy throat, if you're a man given to appetite.
Bible






Repentance won't cure mischief.
Scottish Proverb

Forgiveness is love in its most noble form.
Anon.

Forgive and forget.
Proverb

Never repeat old grievances.
Proverb

A reconciled friend is a double enemy.
Proverb

Those that do you a very ill deed will never forgive you.
Proverb

If I die, I forgive you. If I live we shall see.
Proverb

Whoever approaches Me walking, I will come to him running; and he who meets Me with sins equivalent to the whole world, I will greet him with forgiveness equal to it.
Mishkat Al-masabih

In contrast to revenge, which is the natural, automatic reaction to transgression and which, because of the irreversibility of the action process can be expected and even calculated, the act of forgiving can never be predicted; it is the only reaction that acts in an unexpected way and thus retains, though being a reaction, something of the original character of action.
Hannah Arendt

Bad men are full of repentance.
Aristotle

Forgive many things in others; nothing in yourself.
Decimus Magnus Ausonius

They who forgive most shall be most forgiven.
Josiah Bailey

The best thing to give to your enemy is forgiveness; to an opponent, tolerance; to a friend, your heart; to your child, a good example; to a father, deference; to your mother, conduct that will make her proud of you; to yourself, respect; to all men, charity.
Arthur Balfour

I never forgive, but I always forget.
Arthur Balfour

Every man should keep a fair-sized cemetery in which to bury the faults of his friends.
Henry Ward Beecher

Giving The best thing to give to your enemy is forgiveness; to an opponent, tolerance; to a friend, your heart; to your child, a good example; to a father, deference; to your mother, conduct that will make her proud of you; to yourself, respect; to all men.
Henry Ward Beecher

God pardons like a mother, who kisses the offense into everlasting forgiveness.
Henry Ward Beecher

I can forgive, but I cannot forget, is only another way of saying, I will not forgive. Forgiveness ought to be like a canceled note -- torn in two, and burned up, so that it never can be shown against one.
Henry Ward Beecher

I can forgive, but I cannot forget, is only another way of saying, I cannot forgive.
Henry Ward Beecher

Repentance is another name for aspiration.
Henry Ward Beecher

Compassion will cure more sins than condemnation.
Willard Beecher

My transgression is sealed up in a bag, and thou sewest up mine iniquity. Job 14:17
Bible

In him we have redemption through his blood, the forgiveness of our trespasses, according to the riches of his grace. Ephesians 1:7
Bible

And be kind to one another, tender-hearted, forgiving each other, just as God in Christ also has forgiven you. Ephesians 4:32
Bible

To apologize is to lay the foundation for a future offense.
Ambrose Bierce




The saving man becomes the free man.
Chinese Proverb

Liberty, according to my metaphysics is a self-determining power in an intellectual agent. It implies thought and choice and power.
John Adams

Yesterday the greatest question was decided which ever was debated in America; and a greater perhaps never was, nor will be, decided among men. A resolution was passed without one dissenting colony, that these United Colonies are, and of right ought to be, free and independent States.
John Adams

When people talk of the freedom of writing, speaking or thinking I cannot choose but laugh. No such thing ever existed. No such thing now exists; but I hope it will exist. But it must be hundreds of years after you and I shall write and speak no more.
John Adams

Our Constitution was made only for a moral and religious people. It is wholly inadequate to the government of any other.
John Adams

If ye love wealth better than liberty, the tranquillity of servitude better than the animating contest of freedom, go home from us in peace. We ask not your counsels or arms. Crouch down and lick the hands which feed you. May your chains set lightly upon you, and may posterity forget that ye were our countrymen.
Samuel Adams, speech at the Philadelphia State House, August 1, 1776

Freedom is the emancipation from the arbitrary rule of other men.
Mortimer J. Adler

When we were told that by freedom we understood free enterprise, we did very little to dispel this monstrous falsehood. Wealth and economic well-being, we have asserted, are the fruits of freedom, while we should have been the first to know that this kind of happiness has been an unmixed blessing only in this country, and it is a minor blessing compared with the truly political freedoms, such as freedom of speech and thought, of assembly and association, even under the best conditions.
Hannah Arendt

Man cannot be free if he does not know that he is subject to necessity, because his freedom is always won in his never wholly successful attempts to liberate himself from necessity.
Hannah Arendt

Democracy arose from men's thinking that if they are equal in any respect, they are equal absolutely.
Aristotle

Within yourself deliverance must be searched for, because each man makes his own prison.
Sir Edwin Arnold

A nation which makes the final sacrifice for life and freedom does not get beaten.
Kemal Ataturk

The fly that touches honey cannot use it's wings; so too the soul that clings to spiritual sweetness ruins it's freedom and hinders contemplation.
Ghose Aurobindo

The most intellectual of men are moved quite as much by the circumstances which they are used to as by their own will. The active voluntary part of a man is very small, and if it were not economized by a sleepy kind of habit, its results would be null.
Walter Bagehot

Any honest examination of the national life proves how far we are from the standard of human freedom with which we began. The recovery of this standard demands of everyone who loves this country a hard look at himself, for the greatest achievements must begin somewhere, and they always begin with the person. If we are not capable of this examination, we may yet become one of the most distinguished and monumental failures in the history of nations.
James Baldwin

The oppression of any people for opinion's sake has rarely had any other effect than to fix those opinions deeper, and render them more important.
Hosea Ballou

Freedom all solace to man gives: He lives at ease that freely lives.
John Barbour

What a curious phenomenon it is that you can get men to die for the liberty of the world who will not make the little sacrifice that is needed to free themselves from their own individual bondage.
Bruce Barton

The greatest blessing of our democracy is freedom. But in the last analysis, our only freedom is the freedom to discipline ourselves.
Bernard Baruch

In the last analysis, our only freedom is the freedom to discipline ourselves.
Bernard Baruch

The liberated man is not the one who is freed in his ideal reality, his inner truth, or his transparency; he is the man who changes spaces, who circulates, who changes sex, clothes, and habits according to fashion, rather than morality, and who changes opinions not as his conscience dictates but in response to opinion polls.
Jean Baudrillard

As for freedom, it will soon cease to exist in any shape or form. Living will depend upon absolute obedience to a strict set of arrangements, which it will no longer be possible to transgress. The air traveler is not free. In the future, life's passengers will be even less so: they will travel through their lives fastened to their (corporate) seats.
Jean Baudrillard

You need only reflect that one of the best ways to get yourself a reputation as a dangerous citizen these days is to go about repeating the very phrases which our founding fathers used in the struggle for independence.
Charles Austin Beard

True obedience is true freedom.
Henry Ward Beecher

There are always risks in freedom. The only risk in bondage is breaking free.
Gita Bellin



The enemy of my enemy is my friend.
Arabic Proverb

A friend is known when needed.
Arabic Proverb

Do not tell a friend anything you would conceal from an enemy.
Arabic Proverb

With true friends... even water drunk together is sweet enough.
Chinese Proverb

No one is rich enough to do without a neighbor.
Danish proverb

Your friendship is your needs answered.
Danish proverb

You may poke a man's fire after you've known him for seven years.
English Proverb

Friends are like fiddle strings, they must not be screwed too tight.
English Proverb

One who looks for a friend without faults will have none.
Anon.

The good fellow to everyone is a good friend to no one.
Yiddish Proverb

A friend you have to buy; enemies you get for nothing.
Yiddish Proverb

When I find myself fading, I close my eyes and realize my friends are my energy.
Anon.

The road to a friend's house is never long.
Danish proverb

There
Anon.

Friendship is like a prism through which the many variations of beauty are revealed in our lives.
Anon.

A real friend is one who walks in when the rest of the world walks out.
Anon.

A memory lasts forever. Never does it die.True friends stay together.And never say goodbye.
Anon.

A man should choose a friend who is better than himself. There are plenty of acquaintances in the world; but very few real friends.
Chinese Proverb

To keep a new friend, never break with the old.
Proverb

Tell me who's your friend and I'll tell you who you are.
Proverb

An ounce of blood is worth more than a pound of friendship.
Proverb

Who seeks a faultless friend remains friendless.
Proverb

Who ceases to be a friend never was one.
Proverb

These can never be true friends: Hope, dice, a prostitute, a robber, a cheat, a goldsmith, a monkey, a doctor, a distiller.
Proverb

For the friendship of two, the patience of one is required.
Proverb


Those who foretell the future lies, even if he tells the truth.
Arabic Proverb

When men speak of the future, the Gods laugh.
Chinese Proverb

Tomorrow is often the busiest day of the week.
Proverb

Tomorrow never comes.
Proverb

The future comes one day at a time.
Dean Acheson

Never let the future disturb you. You will meet it, if you have to, with the same weapons of reason which today arm you against the present.
Marcus Aurelius

The future is... black.
James Baldwin

Pop artists deal with the lowly trivia of possessions and equipment that the present generation is lugging along with it on its safari into the future.
J. G. Ballard

I would sum up my fear about the future in one word: boring. And that's my one fear: that everything has happened; nothing exciting or new or interesting is ever going to happen again... the future is just going to be a vast, conforming suburb of the soul.
J. G. Ballard

It's tough to make predictions, especially about the future.
Yogi Berra

I have a Vision of the Future, chum. The workers flats in fields of soya beans tower up like silver pencils, score on score.
John Betjeman

Take no thought for tomorrow; for tomorrow shall take thought for the things of itself. Matthew 6:34
Bible

Future. That period of time in which our affairs prosper, our friends are true and our happiness is assured.
Ambrose Bierce

All futurity seems teeming with endless destruction never to be repelled; Desperate remorse swallows the present in a quenchless rage.
William Blake

The future destiny of the child is always the work of the mother.
Napoleon Bonaparte

In answer to your inquiry, I consider that the chief dangers which confront the coming century will be religion without the Holy Ghost, Christianity without Christ, forgiveness without repentance, salvation without regeneration, politics without God, and heaven without hell.
William Booth

When all else is lost, the future still remains.
Christian Nevell Bovee

I don't try to describe the future. I try to prevent it.
Ray Bradbury

Let
Mel Brooks

I look to the future because that's where I'm going to spend the rest of my life.
George Burns, At age 87; he lived to be 100

The future is as bright as the promises of God.
William Carey

By the street of by-and-by, one arrives at the house of never.
Miguel de Cervantes

Failure is unimportant. It takes courage to make a fool of yourself.
Charlie Chaplin

our day will come is another way of saying you get yours.
Merelene Cornish

It is my belief that whereas the twentieth century has been a century of war and untold suffering, the twenty-first century should be one of peace and dialogue. As the continued advances in information technology make our world a truly global village, I believe there will come a time when war and armed conflict will be considered an outdated and obsolete method of settling differences among nations and communities.
Dalai Lama


God will provide -- ah, if only He would till He does!
Yiddish Proverb

If God lived on earth, people would break his windows.
Yiddish Proverb

God is closest to those with broken hearts.
Yiddish Proverb

Forsake not God till you find a better master.
Scottish Proverb

Every man for himself and God for us all.
Proverb

What men usually ask for when they pray to God is, that two and two may not make four.
Proverb

Man does what he can, God does what he will.
Proverb

I find it interesting that the meanest life, the poorest existence, is attributed to God's will, but as human beings become more affluent, as their living standard and style begin to ascend the material scale, God descends the scale of responsibility at a commensurate speed.
Maya Angelou

With God, what is terrible is that one never knows whether it's not just a trick of the devil.
Jean Anouilh

God is Love, we are taught as children to believe. But when we first begin to get some inkling of how He loves us, we are repelled; it seems so cold, indeed, not love at all as we understand the word.
W. H. Auden

God brings men into deep waters not to drown them, but to cleanse them.
John H. Aughey

They that deny a God destroy man's nobility; for certainly man is of kin to the beasts by his body; and, if he be not of kin to God by his spirit, he is a base and ignoble creature.
Francis Bacon

God hangs the greatest weights upon the smallest wires.
Francis Bacon

I went to the root of things, and found nothing but Him alone.
Mira Bai

We know all their gods; they ignore ours. What they call our sins are our gods, and what they call their gods, we name otherwise.
Natalie Clifford Barney

To place oneself in the position of God is painful: being God is equivalent to being tortured. For being God means that one is in harmony with all that is, including the worst. The existence of the worst evils is unimaginable unless God willed them.
Georges Bataille

How can one better magnify the Almighty than by sniggering with him at his little jokes, particularly the poorer ones.
Samuel Beckett

The bastard! He doesn't exist!
Samuel Beckett

God's providence is on the side of clear heads.
Henry Ward Beecher

And now Israel, what does the Lord your God require from you, but to fear the Lord your God, to walk in all His ways and love Him, and to serve the Lord your God with all your heart and all your soul. Deuteronomy 10:12
Bible

But from there you will seek the Lord you God and you will find Him if you search for Him with all your heart and all your soul. Deuteronomy 4:29
Bible

For now we see through a glass darkly, but then face to face; now I know in part, but then shall I know even as also I am known. I Corinthians
Bible

God is not a man, that he should lie, nor a son of man, that he should repent; has he not said, and will he not do it? Or has he spoken, and will he not make it good? Numbers 23:19
Bible

Oh the depth of both the wisdom and riches of God! How unsearchable are his judgments, and his ways beyond understanding.
Bible

A god who let us prove his existence would be an idol.
Dietrich Bonhoeffer



In the councils of a state, the question is not so much, what ought to be done? As, what can be done?
Proverb

Office without pay makes thieves.
Proverb

You see, you all start with the premise that democracy is some good. I don't think it's worth a damn. I think Churchill is right, the only thing to be said for democracy is that there is nothing else that's any better, and therefore he used to say, Tyranny tempered by assassination, but lots of assassination. People say, If the Congress were more representative of the people it would be better. I say the Congress is too damn representative. It's just as stupid as the people are; just as uneducated, just as dumb, just as selfish. You know the Congress is a perfect example, and created to be a perfect example.
Dean Acheson

Controversial proposals, once accepted, soon become hallowed.
Dean Acheson, from a speech in Independence, Missouri, March 31, 1962

Fear is the foundation of most government.
John Adams

A government, for protecting business only, is but a carcass, and soon falls by its own corruption and decay.
Amos Bronson Alcott

Our Congress is the finest body of men money can buy.
Maury Amsterdam

It is often said that men are ruled by their imaginations; but it would be truer to say they are governed by the weakness of their imaginations.
Walter Bagehot

Being nice to governments doesn't work, they are such lying bastards.
Joy Baluch

Bureaucracy is a giant mechanism operated by pygmies.
Honore de Balzac

Government is the great fiction, through which everybody endeavors to live at the expense of everybody else.
Fr

We all have the republican spirit in our veins, like syphilis in our bones. We are democratized and venerealized.
Charles Baudelaire

Governing today means giving acceptable signs of credibility. It is like advertising and it is the same effect that is achieved -- commitment to a scenario.
Jean Baudrillard

Beaverbrook is so pleased to be in the government that he is like the town tart who finally married the Mayor.
Beverley Baxter

The worst thing in the world next to anarchy, is government.
Henry Ward Beecher

A Republican by principle and devotion, I will, until my death, oppose all Royalists and all enemies of my Government and the Republic.
Jean Baptiste Bernadotte

The object of government in peace and in war is not the glory of rulers or of races, but the happiness of the common man.
Baron William Henry Beveridge

Laws are like sausages, it is better not to see them being made.
Otto von Bismarck

A government must not waiver once it has chosen it's course. It must not look to the left or right but go forward.
Otto von Bismarck

The art of government is not to let me grow stale.
Napoleon Bonaparte

Public instruction should be the first object of government.
Napoleon Bonaparte

Large legislative bodies resolve themselves into coteries, and coteries into jealousies.
Napoleon Bonaparte

The government must always be a step ahead of the popular movement.
Count Boytzwnburg

Publicity is justly commended as a remedy for social and industrial diseases. Sunlight is said to be the best of disinfectants; electric light the most efficient policeman.
Louis D. Brandeis

But their determination to banish fools foundered ultimately in the installation of absolute idiots.
Basil Bunting




	If you cannot be grateful for what you have received, then be thankful for what you have been spared.
Yiddish Proverb

We count our miseries carefully, and accept our blessings without much thought.
Chinese Proverb

I would thank you from the bottom of my heart, but for you my heart has no bottom.
Anon.

I had the blues because I had no shoes until upon the street, I met a man who had no feet.
Anon.

Gratitude is the heart's memory.
Proverb

Nothing more detestable does the earth produce than an ungrateful man.
Decimus Magnus Ausonius

Gratitude unlocks the fullness of life. It turns what we have into enough, and more. It turns denial into acceptance, chaos to order, confusion to clarity. It can turn a meal into a feast, a house into a home, a stranger into a friend. Gratitude makes sense of our past, brings peace for today, and creates a vision for tomorrow.
Melody Beattie

	Remember God's bounty in the year. String the pearls of His favor. Hide the dark parts, except so far as they are breaking out in light! Give this one day to thanks, to joy, to gratitude!
Henry Ward Beecher

A proud man is seldom a grateful man, for he never thinks he gets as much as he deserves.
Henry Ward Beecher

Next to ingratitude the most painful thing to bear is gratitude.
Henry Ward Beecher

Gratitude is the fairest blossom which springs from the soul.
Henry Ward Beecher

Sometimes we need to remind ourselves that thankfulness is indeed a virtue.
William John Bennett

Whatever I am offered in devotion with a pure heart -- a leaf, a flower, fruit, or water -- I accept with joy.
Bhagavad Gita

Unto every one that hath shall be given, and he shall have abundance: but from him that hath not shall be taken away even that which he hath. Matthew
Bible

There is a calmness to a life lived in Gratitude, a quiet joy.
Ralph H. Blum

In ordinary life we hardly realize that we receive a great deal more than we give, and that it is only with gratitude that life becomes rich.
Dietrich Bonhoeffer

Let's choose today to quench our thirst for the good life we thinks others lead by acknowledging the good that already exists in our lives. We can then offer the universe the gift of our grateful hearts.
Sarah Ban Breathnach

Grace is available for each of us every day -- our spiritual daily bread -- but we've got to remember to ask for it with a grateful heart and not worry about whether there will be enough for tomorrow.
Sarah Ban Breathnach

Whatever we are waiting for -- peace of mind, contentment, grace, the inner awareness of simple abundance -- it will surely come to us, but only when we are ready to receive it with an open and grateful heart.
Sarah Ban Breathnach

Both abundance and lack exist simultaneously in our lives, as parallel realities. It is always our conscious choice which secret garden we will tend... when we choose not to focus on what is missing from our lives but are grateful for the abundance that's present -- love, health, family, friends, work, the joys of nature and personal pursuits that bring us pleasure -- the wasteland of illusion falls away and we experience Heaven on earth.
Sarah Ban Breathnach

This race is never grateful: from the first, One fills their cup at supper with pure wine, Which back they give at cross-time on a sponge, In bitter vinegar.
Elizabeth Barrett Browning

Let us rise up and be thankful, for if we didn't learn a lot today, at least we learned a little, and if we didn't learn a little, at least we didn't get sick, and if we got sick, at least we didn't die; so, let us all be thankful.
Buddha

Gratitude helps you to grow and expands; gratitude brings you and laughter into your life and into the lives of all those around you.
Eileen Caddy

I don't like it when people on the street say smile or cheer up. It's a real cheap line. I'm feeling good. I'm feeling real grateful for everything. It's a solid time in my life. When people say I look sad, they're wrong.
Nicolas Cage

Remember that not to be happy is not to be grateful.
Elizabeth Carter




The first step toward greatness is to be honest.
Proverb

Great men are true men, the men in whom nature has succeeded. They are not extraordinary -- they are in the true order. It is the other species of men who are not what they ought to be.
Henri Frederic Amiel

Greatness is a spiritual condition.
Matthew Arnold

The first element of greatness is fundamental humbleness (this should not be confused with servility); the second is freedom from self; the third is intrepid courage, which, taken in its widest interpretation, generally goes with truth; and the fourth --the power to love --although I have put it last, is the rarest.
Margot Asquith

We shall never resolve the enigma of the relation between the negative foundations of greatness and that greatness itself.
Jean Baudrillard

Because you are a great lord, you believe yourself to be a great genius. You took the trouble to be born, but no more.
Pierre De Beaumarchais

The dullard's envy of brilliant men is always assuaged by the suspicion that they will come to a bad end.
Max Beerbohm

Great men are not always wise.
Bible


The herd seek out the great, not for their sake but for their influence; and the great welcome them out of vanity or need.
Napoleon Bonaparte

Great people are meteors designed to burn so that the earth may be lighted.
Napoleon Bonaparte

Greatness be nothing unless it be lasting.
Napoleon Bonaparte

The greatness of a man's power is the measure of his surrender.
William Booth

All your youth you want to have your greatness taken for granted; when you find it taken for granted, you are unnerved.
Elizabeth Bowen

No one who has come to true greatness has not felt in some degree that his life belongs to the people, and what God has given them he gives it for mankind.
Phillips Brooks

False greatness is unsociable and remote: conscious of its own frailty, it hides, or at least averts its face, and reveals itself only enough to create an illusion and not be recognized as the meanness that it really is. True greatness is free, kind, familiar and popular; it lets itself be touched and handled, it loses nothing by being seen at close quarters; the better one knows it, the more one admires it.
Jean De La Bruyere

Difficulty, my brethren, is the nurse of greatness
William Cullen Bryant

The great must submit to the dominion of prudence and of virtue, or none will long submit to the dominion of the great.
Edmund Burke

Great men are the guideposts and landmarks in the state.
Edmund Burke

Sighing that Nature formed but one such man, and broke the die.
Lord (George Gordon) Byron

What millions died that Caesar might be great?
Joseph Campell

All great deeds and all great thoughts have a ridiculous beginning.
Albert Camus

The difference between Socrates and Jesus? The great conscious and the immeasurably great unconscious.
Thomas Carlyle

No great man lives in vain. The history of the world is but the biography of great men.
Thomas Carlyle

All great men are gifted with intuition. They know without reasoning or analysis, what they need to know.
Alexis Carrel





If you want happiness for an hour -- take a nap. If you want happiness for a day -- go fishing. If you want happiness for a month -- get married. If you want happiness for a year -- inherit a fortune. If you want happiness for a lifetime -- help someone else.
Chinese Proverb

Happiness is like a sunbeam, which the least shadow intercepts, while adversity is often as the rain of spring.
Chinese Proverb

If you want to be happy for a year, plant a garden; If you want to be happy for life, plant a tree.
English Proverb

Happiness is a choice that requires effort at times.
Anon.

Where one is wise two are happy.
Proverb

While we pursue happiness, we flee from contentment.
Proverb

He is rich who owes nothing.
Proverb

Happiness is not a horse, you cannot harness it.
Proverb

There is no happiness; there are only moments of happiness.
Proverb

Many persons have a wrong idea of what constitutes true happiness. It is not attained through self-gratification but through fidelity to a worthy purpose.
Joseph Addison

Three grand essentials to happiness in this life are something to do, something to love, and something to hope for.
Joseph Addison

Cheerfulness is the best promoter of health and is as friendly to the mind as to the body.
Joseph Addison

What sunshine is to flowers, smiles are to humanity. These are but trifles, to be sure; but, scattered along life's pathway, the good they do is inconceivable.
Joseph Addison

True happiness is of a retired nature, and an enemy to pomp and noise; it arises, in the first place, from the enjoyment of one's self, and in the next from the friendship and conversation of a few select companions.
Joseph Addison

Happiness is a positive cash flow.
Fred Adler

Call no man happy till he is dead.
Aeschylus

Happy is the son whose faith in his mother remains unchallenged.
Louisa May Alcott

It isn't necessary to be rich and famous to be happy. It's only necessary to be rich.
Alan Alda

To live we must conquer incessantly, we must have the courage to be happy.
Henri Frederic Amiel

Only one thing has to change for us to know happiness in our lives: where we focus our attention.
Greg Anderson

Most people would rather be certain they're miserable, than risk being happy.
Robert Anthony

Now and then it's good to pause in our pursuit of happiness and just be happy.
Guillaume Apollinaire

...happiness is the highest good, being a realization and perfect practice of virtue, which some can attain, while others have little or none of it...
Aristotle

If happiness is activity in accordance with excellence, it is reasonable that it should be in accordance with the highest excellence.
Aristotle

Happiness depends upon ourselves.
Aristotle



The feet are the gateway to 10,000 illnesses.
Japanese Proverb

We are usually the best men when in the worst health.
English Proverb

He who enjoys good health is rich, though he knows it not.
Italian Proverb

The healthy die first.
Italian Proverb

A man too busy to take care of his health is like a mechanic too busy to take care of his tools.
Proverb

Health is the thing that makes you feel that now is the best time of the year.
Franklin Pierce Adams

The people who say they don
Patricia Alexander

The concept of total wellness recognizes that our every thought, word, and behavior affects our greater health and well-being. And we, in turn, are affected not only emotionally but also physically and spiritually.
Greg Anderson

A healthy body is a guest chamber for the soul: a sick body is a prison.
Francis Bacon

To get rich never risk your health. For it is the truth that health is the wealth of wealth.
Richard Baker

The healthy, the strong individual, is the one who asks for help when he needs it. Whether he has an abscess on his knee or in his soul.
Rona Barrett

As a remedy against all ills; poverty, sickness, and melancholy only one thing is absolutely necessary; a liking for work.
Charles Baudelaire

From labor health, from health contentment springs.
Melody Beattie

It's not the work which kills people, it's the worry. It's not the revolution that destroys machinery it's the friction.
Henry Ward Beecher

There's lots of people who spend so much time watching their health, they haven't got time to enjoy it.
Josh Billings

If I'd known I was gonna live this long. I'd have taken better care of myself. Eubie Blake At Age 100
Eubie Blake

Energy is eternal delight.
William Blake

To become a thoroughly good man is the best prescription for keeping a sound mind and a sound body.
Francis Bowen

An ounce of prevention is worth a pound of cure. ancient proverb
Henry de Bracton

Health is the greatest gift, contentment the greatest wealth, faithfulness the best relationship.
Buddha

Refuse to be ill. Never tell people you are ill; never own it to yourself. Illness is one of those things which a man should resist on principle at the onset.
Edward George Bulwer-Lytton

Ill-health, of body or of mind, is defeat. Health alone is victory. Let all men, if they can manage it, contrive to be healthy!
Thomas Carlyle

Any idiot can face a crisis, it's the day to day living that wears you out.
Anton Chekhov

Never hurry. Take plenty of exercise. Always be cheerful. Take all the sleep you need. You may expect to be well.
James Freeman Clarke

Money is the most envied, but the least enjoyed. Health is the most enjoyed, but the least envied.
Charles Caleb Colton







Until the lions have their historians, tales of the hunt shall always glorify the hunter.
African Proverb

We are always doing, says he, something for posterity, but I would see posterity do something for us.
Joseph Addison

After being Turned Down by numerous Publishers, he had decided to write for Posterity.
George Ade

History is the sum total of the things that could have been avoided.
Konrad Adenauer

It is the true office of history to represent the events themselves, together with the counsels, and to leave the observations and conclusions thereupon to the liberty and faculty of every man's judgment.
Francis Bacon

Histories make men wise; poets, witty; the mathematics, subtle; natural philosophy, deep; moral, grave; logic and rhetoric, able to contend.
Francis Bacon

James Joyce is right about history being a nightmare-- but it may be that nightmare from which no one can awaken. People are trapped in history and history in trapped in them.
James Baldwin

History does not repeat itself. Historians repeat each other.
Arthur Balfour

Does history repeat itself, the first time as tragedy, the second time as farce? No, that
Julian Barnes

The lessons of history? There are four: The bee fertilizes the flower it robs; whom the gods would destroy they first make mad with power; the mills of God grind slowly, but they grind exceeding small; when it is dark enough, you can see the stars.
Charles Austin Beard

To give an accurate and exhaustive account of that period would need a far less brilliant pen than mine.
Max Beerbohm

What has been will be again. What has been done will be done again... Ecclesiastes 1:9
Bible

An account, mostly false, of events, mostly unimportant, which are brought about by rulers, mostly knaves, and soldiers, mostly fools.
Ambrose Bierce

Historian. A broad -- gauge gossip.
Ambrose Bierce

The main thing is to make history, not to write it.
Otto von Bismarck

It's my belief that history is a wheel. 'Inconstancy is my very essence,' says the wheel. Rise up on my spokes if you like but don't complain when you're cast back down into the depths. Good time pass away, but then so do the bad. Mutability is our tragedy, but it's also our hope. The worst of time, like the best, are always passing away.
Boethius (Anicius Manlius Severinus)

From the heights of these pyramids, forty centuries look down on us.
Napoleon Bonaparte

People will not look forward to posterity who will not look backward to their ancestors.
Edmund Burke

The Thames is liquid history.
John Burns

God cannot alter the past, but historians can.
Samuel Butler

History is the devil's scripture.
Lord (George Gordon) Byron

And having wisdom with each studious year, in meditation dwelt, with learning wrought, and shaped his weapon with an edge severe, sapping a solemn creed with solemn sneer.
Lord (George Gordon) Byron

In our wildest aberrations we dream of an equilibrium we have left behind and which we naively expect to find at the end of our errors. Childish presumption which justifies the fact that child-nations, inheriting our follies, are now directing our history.
Albert Camus

History is the distillation of rumor.
Thomas Carlyle

Stern accuracy in inquiring, bold imagination in describing, these are the cogs on which history soars or flutters and wobbles.
Thomas Carlyle





What is home?

Anon.

A hundred men may make an encampment, but it takes a woman to make a home.
Chinese Proverb

He makes his home where the living is best.
Proverb

It matters less to a person where they are born than where they can live.
Proverb

If I were asked to name the chief benefit of the house, I should say: the house shelters day-dreaming, the house protects the dreamer, the house allows one to dream in peace.
Gaston Bachelard

Houses are built to live in, and not to look on: therefore let use be preferred before uniformity.
Francis Bacon

The ideal of happiness has always taken material form in the house, whether cottage or castle; it stands for permanence and separation from the world.
Simone de Beauvoir

People's backyards are much more interesting than their front gardens, and houses that back on to railways are public benefactors.
John Betjeman

Be grateful for the home you have, knowing that at this moment, all you have is all you need.
Sarah Ban Breathnach

There are things you just can't do in life. You can't beat the phone company, you can't make a waiter see you until he's ready to see you, and you can't go home again.
Bill Bryson

The place is very well and quiet and the children only scream in a low voice.
Lord (George Gordon) Byron

Never weather-beaten sail more willing bent to shore.
Thomas Campion

You are a king by your own fireside, as much as any monarch in his throne.
Miguel de Cervantes

A man's home is his wife's castle.
Alexander Chase

The poorest man may in his cottage bid defiance to all the forces of the Crown. It may be frail -- its roof may shake -- the wind may blow through it -- the storm may enter -- the rain may enter -- but the King of England cannot enter! -- all his forces dare not cross the threshold of the ruined tenement!
William Pitt The Elder Chatham

The home is not the one tame place in the world of adventure. It is the one wild place in the world of rules and set tasks.
G. K. Chesterton

Home -- that blessed word, which opens to the human heart the most perfect glimpse of Heaven, and helps to carry it thither, as on an angel's wings.
Lydia Maria Child

We shape our dwellings, and afterwards our dwellings shape us.
Sir Winston Churchill

There is no place more delightful than one's own fireplace.
Marcus Tullius Cicero

In the matter of furnishing, I find a certain absence of ugliness far worse than ugliness.
Sidonie Gabrielle Colette

Going home must be like going to render an account.
Joseph Conrad

A house is a machine for living in.
Le Corbusier

Nothing annoys a woman more than to have company drop in unexpectedly and find the house looking as it usually does.
Frank Dane

Home is a name, a word, it is a strong one; stronger than magician ever spoke, or spirit ever answered to, in the strongest conjuration.
Charles Dickens

Drab Habitation of Whom? Tabernacle or Tomb -- or Dome of Worm -- or Porch of Gnome -- or some Elf's Catacomb?
Emily Dickinson

He who has health, has hope. And he who has hope, has everything.
Arabic Proverb

Hope for the best, but prepare for the worst.
English Proverb

He gains a great deal who loses a vain hope.
Italian Proverb

Hope is the last to abandon the unhappy.
Italian Proverb

Were it not for hope the heart would break.
Scottish Proverb

May every sunrise hold more promise, every moonrise hold more peace.
Anon.

He that waits for a dead man's shoes may long go barefoot.
Proverb

Hope is the dream of a soul awake.
Proverb

Quit not certainty for hope.
Proverb

A misty morning does not signify a cloudy day.
Proverb

If we hope for what we are not likely to possess, we act and think in vain, and make life a greater dream and shadow than it really is.
Joseph Addison

Hope calculates its scenes for a long and durable life; presses forward to imaginary points of bliss; and grasps at impossibilities; and consequently very often ensnares men into beggary, ruin and dishonor.
Joseph Addison

My great hope is to laugh as much as I cry; to get my work done and try to love somebody and have the courage to accept the love in return.
Maya Angelou

Hope is the expectation that something outside of ourselves, something or someone external, is going to come to our rescue and we will live happily ever after.
Dr. Robert Anthony

Hope is a waking dream.
Aristotle

Hope is the dream of a waking man.
Aristotle

You have perhaps waited for years to be freed from some need. For a long, long time you have looked out from the darkness in search of the light, and have had a difficult problem in life that you have not been able to solve in spite of great efforts. And then, when the time was fulfilled and God
Eberhard Arnold

Still bent to make some port he knows not where, still standing for some false impossible shore.
Matthew Arnold

Aerodynamically, the bumble bee shouldn't be able to fly, but the bumble bee doesn't know it so it goes on flying anyway.
Mary Kay Ash

Hope is a good breakfast but a bad supper.
Francis Bacon

Hope is the parent of faith.
Cyrus A. Bartol

Before you give up hope, turn back and read the attacks that were made on Lincoln.
Bruce Barton

Where's the hope that can abate The grief of hearts thus desolate That can Youth's keenest pangs assuage, And mitigate the gloom of Age? Religion bids the tempest cease, And, leads her to a port of peace; And on, the lonely pilot steers Through the lapse of future years.
Thomas Haynes Bayly, "New Monthly Magazine"

There is hope for all of us. Well, anyway, if you don't die you live through it, day in, day out.
May L. Becker

No winter lasts forever; no spring skips it's turn.
Hal Borland





One never needs their humor as much a when they argue with a fool. 
Chinese Proverb

Many a true word is spoken in jest. 
English Proverb

A poor joke must invent its own laughter. 
Proverb

If I have not seen as far as others, it is because there were giants standing on my shoulders. 
Harold Abelson

I have a fine sense of the ridiculous, but no sense of humor. 
Edward Albee

My life has been one great big joke, a dance that's walked a song that's spoke, I laugh so hard I almost choke when I think about myself. 
Maya Angelou

The secret to humor is surprise. 
Aristotle

Melancholy men are of all others the most witty. 
Aristotle

Among those whom I like or admire, I can find no common denominator, but among those whom I love, I can: all of them make me laugh. 
W. H. Auden

Imagination was given man to compensate for what he is not, and a sense of humor to console him for what he is. 
Francis Bacon

A person without a sense of humor is like a wagon without springs-jolted by every pebble in the road. 
Henry Ward Beecher

Witticism. A sharp and clever remark, usually quoted and seldom noted; what the Philistine is pleased to call a joke. 
Ambrose Bierce

Wit. The salt with which the American humorist spoils his intellectual cookery by leaving it out. 
Ambrose Bierce

We never respect those who amuse us, however we may smile at their comic powers. 
Marguerite Blessington

Humor is a spontaneous, wonderful bit of an outburst that just comes. It's unbridled, its unplanned, it's full of suprises. 
Erma Bombeck

We must laugh at man to avoid crying for him. 
Napoleon Bonaparte

Humor is something that thrives between man's aspirations and his limitations. There is more logic in humor than in anything else. Because, you see, humor is truth. 
Victor Borge

For my own part I think no innocent species of wit or pleasantry should be suppressed: and that a good pun may be admitted among the smaller excellencies of lively conversation. 
James Boswell

Being a funny person does an awful lot of things to you. You feel that you mustn't get serious with people. They don't expect it from you, and they don't want to see it. You're not entitled to be serious, you're a clown, and they only want you to make them laugh. 
Fanny Brice

A rich man's joke is always funny. 
Thomas Edward Brown

All my humor is based upon destruction and despair. If the whole world were tranquil, without disease and violence, I'd be standing on the breadline right in back of J. Edgar Hoover. 
Lenny Bruce

The role of a comedian is to make the audience laugh, at a minimum of once every fifteen seconds. 
Lenny Bruce

Jesting is often only indigence of intellect. 
Jean De La Bruyere

To appreciate nonsense requires a serious interest in life. 
Gelett Burgess

Comedy is a tragedy plus time. 
Carol Burnett




Reality can be beaten with enough imagination.
Anon.

When you stop having dreams and ideals -- well, you might as well stop altogether.
Marian Anderson

Act as if you have already achieved your goal and it is yours.
Dr. Robert Anthony

Your imagination, my dear fellow, is worth more than you imagine.
Louis Aragon

Imagination is the highest kite one can fly.
Lauren Bacall

We think, sometimes, there's not a dragon left. Not one brave knight, not a single princess gliding through secret forests, enchanting deer and butterflies with her smile.What a pleasure to be wrong. Princesses, knights, enchantments and dragons, mystery and adventure ...not only are they here-and-now, they're all that ever lived on earth!Our century, they've changed clothes, of course. Dragons wear government-costumes, today, and failure-suits and disaster-outfits. Society's demons screech, whirl down on us should we lift our eyes from the ground, dare we turn right at corners we've been told to turn left. So crafty have appearances become that princesses and knights can be hidden from each other, can be hidden from themselves.
Richard Bach

To fly as fast as thought, to anywhere that is. He said, you must begin by knowing that you have already arrived.
Richard Bach

Man is an imagining being.
Gaston Bachelard

Images also help me find and realise ideas. I look at hundreds of very different, contrasting images and I pinch details from them, rather like people who eat from other people
Francis Bacon

Imagination is the air of mind.
Philip James Bailey

The Christian tradition was passed on to me as a great rich mixture, a bouillabaisse of human imagination and wonder brewed from the richness of individual lives.
Mary Catherine Bateson

The soul without imagination is what an observatory would be without a telescope.
Henry Ward Beecher

Sentiment is the ripened fruit of fantasy.
Madame Belazy

Nevertheless, the consuming hunger of the uncritical mind for what it imagines to be certainty or finality impels it to feast upon shadows in the prevailing famine of substance.
E. T. Bell

The human imagination...has great difficulty in living strictly within the confines of a materialist practice or philosophy. It dreams, like a dog in its basket, of hares in the open.
John Berger

If you close your eyes, you could just as well imagine me to be vintage Ali MacGraw, circa 1968.
Sandra Bernhard

The way we imagine ourselves to appear to another person is an essential element in our conception of ourselves. In other words, I am not what I think I am, and I am not what you think I am. I am what I think you think I am.
Robert Bierstedt

To me this world is all one continued vision of fancy or imagination, and I feel flattered when I am told so. What is it sets Homer, Virgil and Milton in so high a rank of art? Why is the Bible more entertaining and instructive than any other book? Is it not because they are addressed to the imagination, which is spiritual sensation, and but immediately to the understanding or reason?
William Blake

What is now proved was only once imagined.
William Blake

To see a world in a grain of sand,And a heaven in a wild flower,Hold infinity in the palm of your hand,And eternity in an hour.
William Blake

The human race is governed by its imagination.
Napoleon Bonaparte

Imagination rules the world.
Napoleon Bonaparte

By going over your day in imagination before you begin it, you can begin acting successfully at any moment.
Dorothea Brande

To reduce the imagination to a state of slavery --even though it would mean the elimination of what is commonly called happiness --is to betray all sense of absolute justice within oneself. Imagination alone offers me some intimation of what can be.
Andre Breton

When I was a kid, I used to imagine animals running under my bed. I told my dad, and he solved the problem quickly. He cut the legs off the bed.
Lou Brock





God helps them that help themselves.
Proverb

God loves to help him who strives to help himself.
Aeschylus

The highest manifestation of life consists in this: that a being governs its own actions. A thing which is always subject to the direction of another is somewhat of a dead thing.
Thomas Aquinas

To be one's own master is to be the slave of self.
Natalie Clifford Barney

The best way to get yourself a reputation as a dangerous citizen is to go about repeating the very phrases which our founding fathers used in the struggle for independence.
Charles Austin Beard

Without moral and intellectual independence, there is no anchor for national independence.
David Ben-Gurion

We carry our homes within us which enables us to fly.
John Milton Cage

No one can build his security upon the nobleness of another person.
Willa Cather

Nature never said to me: Do not be poor; still less did she say: Be rich; her cry to me was always: Be independent.
Sebastian Roch Nicolas Chamfort

No man who is not willing to help himself has any right to apply to his friends, or to the gods.
Demosthenes

Be your own palace, or the world is your jail.
John Donne

The ship of heaven guides itself and will not accept a wooden rudder.
Ralph Waldo Emerson

This gives force to the strong -- that the multitude have no habit of self-reliance or original action.
Ralph Waldo Emerson

The best lightning rod for your protection is your own spine.
Ralph Waldo Emerson

No one can cheat you out of ultimate success but yourself.
Ralph Waldo Emerson

Self-reliance is its aversion. It loves not realities and creators, but names and customs.
Ralph Waldo Emerson

There is no one subsists by himself alone.
Owen Felltham

I am lord of myself, accountable to none.
Benjamin Franklin

There is no dependence that can be sure but a dependence upon one's self.
John Gay

In the word of no master am I bound to believe.
Horace

The strongest man in the world is he who stands alone.
Henrik Ibsen

It's easy to be independent when you've got money. But to be independent when you haven't got a thing -- that's the Lord's test.
Mahalia Jackson

If it is to be, it is up to me.
William H. Johnsen

Self-determination has to mean that the leader is your individual gut, and heart, and mind or we're talking about power, again, and its rather well-known impurities. Who is really going to care whether you live or die and who is going to know the most intimate motivation for your laughter and your tears is the only person to be trusted to speak for you and to decide what you will or will not do.
June Jordan

I equally dislike the favor of the public with the love of a woman -- they are both a cloying treacle to the wings of independence.
John Keats



Inspiration is wonderful when it happens, but the writer must develop an approach for the rest of the time
Leonard Bernstein

The inspiration of the almighty gives man understanding.
Bible

Wisdom is supreme; therefore make a full effort to get wisdom. Esteem her and she will exalt you; embrace her and she will honor you.
Bible

When you do not know what you are doing and what you are doing is the best -- that is inspiration.
Robert Bresson

Stung by the splendor of a sudden thought.
Robert Browning

Out of the closets and into the museums, libraries, architectural monuments, concert halls, bookstores, recording studios and film studios of the world. Everything belongs to the inspired and dedicated thief... Words, colors, light, sounds, stone, wood, bronze belong to the living artist. They belong to anyone who can use them. Loot the Louver! A bas l Originality, the sterile and assertive ego that imprisons us as it creates. Vive le sol -- pure, shameless, total. We are not responsible. Steal anything in sight.
William S. Burroughs

There never was a great soul that did not have some divine inspiration.
Marcus Tullius Cicero

Invention flags, his brain goes muddy, and black despair succeeds brown study.
William Congreve

Inspiration may be a form of super-consciousness, or perhaps of subconsciousness -- I wouldn't know. But I am sure it is the antithesis of self-consciousness.
Aaron Copland

The greatest inspiration is often born of desperation.
Comer Cotrell

Had it not been for you, I should have remained what I was when we first met, a prejudiced, narrow-minded being, with contracted sympathies and false knowledge, wasting my life on obsolete trifles, and utterly insensible to the privilege of living in this wondrous age of change and progress.
Benjamin Disraeli

Most of us who turn to any subject we love remember some morning or evening hour when we got on a high stool to reach down an untried volume, or sat with parted lips listening to a new talker, or for very lack of books began to listen to the voices within, as the first traceable beginning of our love.
George Eliot

The torpid artist seeks inspiration at any cost, by virtue or by vice, by friend or by fiend, by prayer or by wine.
Ralph Waldo Emerson

None of us will ever accomplish anything excellent or commanding except when he listens to this whisper which is heard by him alone.
Ralph Waldo Emerson

Here is the secret of inspiration: Tell yourself that thousands and tens of thousands of people, not very intelligent and certainly no more intelligent than the rest of us, have mastered problems as difficult as those that now baffle you.
William Feather


Without inspiration the best powers of the mind remain dormant, they is a fuel in us which needs to be ignited with sparks.
Johann Gottfried Von Herder

Prepare your mind to receive the best that life has to offer.
Ernest Holmes

The supreme prayer of my heart is not to be learned, rich, famous, powerful, or good, but simply to be radiant. I desire to radiate health, cheerfulness, calm courage, and good will. I wish to live without hate, whim, jealousy, envy, fear. I wish to be simple, honest, frank, natural, clean in mind and clean in body, unaffected - as ready to say I do not know, if it be so, and to meet all men on an absolute equality - to face any obstacle and meet every difficulty unabashed and unafraid.I wish others to live their lives, too - up to their highest, fullest, and best. To that end I pray that I may never meddle, interfere, dictate, give advice that is not wanted, or assist when my services are not needed. If I can help people, I'll do it by giving them a chance to help themselves; and if I can uplift or inspire, let it be by example, inference, and suggestion, rather than by injunction and dictation. That is to say, I desire to be radiant - to radiate life.
Elbert Hubbard

I want to put a ding in the universe.
Steve Jobs

What this country needs is more people to inspire others with confidence, and fewer people to discourage any initiative in the right direction more to get into the thick of things, fewer to sit on the sidelines, merely finding fault more to point out what's right with the world, and fewer to keep harping on what's wrong with it and more who are interested in lighting candles, and fewer who blow them out.
Father James Keller

Quotes are nothing but inspiration for the uninspired.
Richard Kemph

People are like stained-glass windows. They sparkle and shine when the sun is out,but when the darkness sets in,their true beauty is revealed only if there is a light from within.
Elisabeth Kubler-Ross

Never allow anyone to rain on your parade and thus cast a pall of gloom and defeat on the entire day. Remember that no talent, no self-denial, no brains, no character, are required to set up in the fault-finding business. Nothing external can have any power over you unless you permit it. Your time is too precious to be sacrificed in wasted days combating the menial forces of hate, jealously, and envy. Guard your fragile life carefully. Only God can shape a flower, but any foolish child can pull it to pieces.
Og Mandino

I didn't have to think up so much as a comma or a semicolon; it was all given, straight from the celestial recording room. Weary, I would beg for a break, an intermission, time enough, let's say, to go to the toilet or take a breath of fresh air on the balcony. Nothing doing!
Henry Miller

You beat your Pate, and fancy Wit will come: Knock as you please, there's no body at home.
Alexander Pope

My sole inspiration is a telephone call from a director.
Cole Porter

The glow of inspiration warms us; it is a holy rapture.
Publius Ovidius NasoOvid


The trouble with so many of us is that we underestimate the power of simplicity. We have a tendency it seems to over complicate our lives and forget what's important and what's not. We tend to mistake movement for achievement. We tend to focus on activities instead of results. And as the pace of life continues to race along in the outside world, we forget that we have the power to control our lives regardless of what's going on outside.
Robert Stuberg

Write while the heat is in you. The writer who postpones the recording of his thoughts uses an iron which has cooled to burn a hole with. He cannot inflame the minds of his audience.
Henry David Thoreau

An idea ran back and forward in his head like a blind man, knocking over the solid furniture.
Source Unknown

the best way to get something done is to begin.
Source Unknown

Respect human talent, respond to genius, recognize reality, admire truth and beauty, realize the meaning of the rare flower Reason.
Peter Nivio Zarlenga





You don't need intelligence to have luck, but you do need luck to have intelligence. 
Yiddish Proverb

It's good to be clever, but not to show it. 
Proverb

She was short on intellect, but long on shape. 
George Ade

Intelligence: I was asked tonight why I refuse to have truck with intellectuals after business hours. But of course I won t. 1. I am not an intellectual. Two minutes talk with Aldous Huxley, William Glock, or any of the New Statesman crowd would expose me utterly. 2. I am too tired after my day's work to man the intellectual palisade. 3. When my work is finished I want to eat, drink, smoke, and relax. 4. I don't know very much, but what I do know I know better than anybody, and I don't want to argue about it. I know what I think about an actor or an actress, and am not interested in what anybody else thinks. My mind is not a bed to be made and re-made. 
James Agate

I've never been an intellectual but I have this look. 
Woody Allen

Clever people will recognize and tolerate nothing but cleverness. 
Henri Frederic Amiel

Cleverness is serviceable for everything, sufficient for nothing. 
Henri Frederic Amiel

People generally treat me like I'm very intelligent and really, I'm much less intelligent than she is. Scully is insanely intelligent. 
Gillian Anderson

It is the mark of an educated mind to be able to entertain a thought without accepting it. 
Aristotle

Wit is educated insolence. 
Aristotle

To the man-in-the-street, who, I'm sorry to say, is a keen observer of life. The word Intellectual suggests straight away. A man who's untrue to his wife. 
W. H. Auden

God has placed no limits to the exercise of the intellect he has given us, on this side of the grave. 
Francis Bacon

I've been called many things, but never an intellectual. 
Tallulah Bankhead

Mother is far too clever to understand anything she does not like. 
Arnold Bennett

The weak in courage is strong in cunning. 
William Blake

The intellectual is a middle-class product; if he is not born into the class he must soon insert himself into it, in order to exist. He is the fine nervous flower of the bourgeoisie. 
Louise Bogan

If we listened to our intellect, we'd never have a love affair. We'd never have a friendship. We'd never go into business, because we'd be cynical. Well, that's nonsense. You've got to jump off cliffs all the time and build your wings on the way down. 
Ray Bradbury

To me, being an intellectual doesn't mean knowing about intellectual issues; it means taking pleasure in them. 
Jacob Bronowski

The cynic never grows up, but commits intellectual suicide. 
Charles R. Brown

Clever men are good, but they are not the best. 
Thomas Carlyle

To label me an intellectual is a misunderstanding of what that is. 
Dick Cavett

A person of intellect without energy added to it, is a failure. 
Sebastian Roch Nicolas Chamfort

Merely having an open mind is nothing; the object of opening the mind, as of opening the mouth, is to shut it again on something solid. 
G. K. Chesterton

A large section of the intelligentsia seems wholly devoid of intelligence. 
G. K. Chesterton

The doctrine of human equality reposes on this: that there is no man really clever who has not found that he is stupid. 
G. K. Chesterton





One joy scatters a hundred grieves.
Chinese Proverb

In this world, full often, our joys are only the tender shadows which our sorrows cast.
Henry Ward Beecher

I have no greater joy then to hear that my children walk in truth. John 4
Bible

Rejoice in the Lord always; again I will say, rejoice! Philippians 4:4
Bible

He who binds to himself a joy doth the winged life destroy. But he who kisses the joy as it flies lives in Eternity's sunrise.
William Blake

Tranquil pleasures last the longest; we are not fitted to bear the burden of great joys.
Christian Nevell Bovee

When you were born, you cried and everybody else was happy. The only question that matters is this: When you die, will YOU be happy when everybody else is crying?
Tony Campolo

Joy is the feeling of grinning on the inside.
Dr. Melba Colgrove

Real joy comes not from ease or riches or from the praise of men, but from doing something worthwhile.
Pierre Coneille

With coarse rice to eat, with water to drink, and my bent arm for a pillow -- I have still joy in the midst of all these things.
Confucius

Uncertainty and expectation are the joys of life.
William Congreve

We ask God to forgive us for our evil thoughts and evil temper, but rarely, if ever ask Him to forgive us for our sadness.
R. W. Dale

'Tis so much joy! 'Tis so much joy! If I should fail, what poverty! And yet, as poor as I Have ventured all upon a throw; Have gained! Yes! Hesitated so this side the victory!
Emily Dickinson

For present joys are more to flesh and blood than a dull prospect of a distant good.
John Dryden

All human joys are swift of wing, For heaven doth so allot it; That when you get an easy thing, You find you haven't got it.
Eugene Field

Unexplained joy is always so keen that... it seems to hold enough to reconcile one to the inevitable.
Jessie B. Fremont

Joys divided are increased.
Josiah Gilbert Holland

One can endure sorrow alone, but it takes two to be glad.
Elbert Hubbard

Occasionally in life there are those moments of unutterable fulfillment which cannot be completely explained by those symbols called words. Their meanings can only be articulated by the inaudible language of the heart.
Martin Luther King, Jr.

I sometimes wander whether all pleasures are not substitutes for joy.
C.S. Lewis

Joy, rather than happiness, is the goal of life, for joy is the emotion which accompanies our fulfilling our natures as human beings. It is based on the experience of one's identity as a being of worth and dignity.
Rollo May

The most profound joy has more of gravity than of gaiety in it.
Michel de Montaigne

Happy is the person who not only sings, but feels God's eye is on the sparrow, and knows He watches over me. To be simply ensconced in God is true joy.
Alfred A. Montapert

Joy is a net of love by which you can catch souls. A joyful heart is the inevitable result of a heart burning with love
Mother Theresa

A leaf fluttered in through the window this morning, as if supported by the rays of the sun, a bird settled on the fire escape, joy in the task of coffee, joy accompanied me as I walked
Anais Nin



When you cease to strive to understand, then you will know without understanding. 
Chinese Proverb

He who knows little quickly tells it. 
Italian Proverb

He who does not know one thing knows another 
African Proverb

You don't know how much you know until you know how much you don't know. 
Anon.

Only the spoon knows what is stirring in the pot. 
Sicilian Proverb

Who knows most believes least. 
Proverb

No wonder lasts over three days. 
Proverb

It is nothing for one to know something unless another knows you know it. 
Proverb

Men can acquire knowledge, but not wisdom. Some of the greatest fools ever known were learned men. 
Proverb

How do you know so much about everything? was asked of a very wise and intelligent man; and the answer was By never being afraid or ashamed to ask questions as to anything of which I was ignorant. 
John Abbott

I find that a great part of the information I have, was acquired by looking up something and finding something else on the way. 
Franklin Pierce Adams

Knowledge is that which, next to virtue, truly raises one person above another. 
Joseph Addison

Man knows more than he understands. 
Alfred Adler

It was through the feeling of wonder that men now and at first began to philosophize. 
Aristotle

Real knowledge, like everything else of value, is not to be obtained easily. It must be worked for, studied for, thought for, and, more that all, must be prayed for. 
Thomas Arnold

In the life of a man, his time is but a moment, his being an incessant flux, his senses a dim rushlight, his body a prey of worms, his soul an unquiet eddy, his fortune dark, and his fame doubtful. In short, all that is of the body is as coursing waters, all that is of the soul as dreams and vapours; life a warfare, a brief sojourning in an alien land; and after repute, oblivion. Where, then, can man find the power to guide and guard his steps? In one thing and one alone: the love of knowledge. 
Marcus Aurelius

Be curious always! For knowledge will not acquire you: you must acquire it. 
Sudie Back

For knowledge itself is power.  always seen as Knowledge is power and appears inscribed on the wall of the north lobby of The Library of Congress (The Thomas Jefferson Building) 
Francis Bacon

Knowledge and human power are synonymous. 
Francis Bacon

Knowledge is power, but enthusiasm pulls the switch. 
Ivern Ball

I think knowing what you cannot do is more important than knowing what you can. 
Lucille Ball

Knowledge is the best eraser in the world for disharmony, distrust, despair, and the endless physical deficiencies of man. 
Orlando A. Battista

I have tried to know absolutely nothing about a great many things, and I have succeeded fairly well. 
Robert Benchley

We have more information now than we can use, and less knowledge and understanding than we need. Indeed, we seem to collect information because we have the ability to do so, but we are so busy collecting it that we haven't devised a means of using it. The true measure of any society is not what it knows but what it does with what it knows. 
Warren Bennis

It is not good to know more unless we do more with what we already know. 
R. K. Bergethon




A kind word can warm three months of winter.
Japanese Proverb

Sometimes you must be cruel to be kind.
English Proverb

Kindness is the only service that will stand the storm of life and not wash out. It will wear well and be remembered long after the prism of politeness or the complexion of courtesy has faded away. When I am gone, I hope it can be said of me that I plucked a thistle and planted a flower wherever I thought a flower would grow.
Anon.

Kindness begets kindness.
Proverb

One can pay back the loan of gold, but one lies forever in debt to those who are kind.
Proverb

Kind words are worth much and they cost little.
Proverb

There is no sickness worse for me than words that to be kind must lie.
Aeschylus

No Act of Kindness, no matter how small, is ever wasted.
Aesop

The flower of kindness will grow. Maybe not now, but it will some day. And in kind that kindness will flow, For kindness grows in this way.
Robert Alan

The good deed you do today For a brother or sister in need Will come back to you some day For humanity's a circle in deed.
Robert Alan

It is... axiomatic that we should all think of ourselves as being more sensitive than other people because, when we are insensitive in our dealings with others, we cannot be aware of it at the time: conscious insensitivity is a self-contradiction.
W. H. Auden

Kindness is wisdom.
Philip James Bailey

Shall we make a new rule of life from tonight: always to try to be a little kinder than is necessary? Often paraphrased as: Always be a little kinder than necessary.
James Barrie

In necessary things, unity; in doubtful things, liberty; in all things, charity.
Anne Baxter

A kind and compassionate act is often its own reward.
William John Bennett

Compassion has no place in the natural order of the world which operates on the basis of necessity. Compassion opposes this order and is therefore best thought of as being in some way supernatural.
John Berger

I know the compassion of others is a relief at first. I don't despise it. But it can't quench pain, it slips through your soul as through a sieve. And when our suffering has been dragged from one pity to another, as from one mouth to another, we can no longer respect or love it.
Georges Bernanos

Out of compassion I destroy the darkness of their ignorance. From within them I light the lamp of wisdom and dispel all darkness from their lives.
Bhagavad Gita

Be ye kind one to another, tenderhearted, forgiving one another, even as God for Christ's sake hath forgiven you. Ephesians
Bible

Kindness is a language the dumb can speak and the deaf can hear and understand.
Christian Nevell Bovee

Compassion is sometimes the fatal capacity for feeling what it is like to live inside somebody else's skin. It is the knowledge that there can never really be any peace and joy for me until there is peace and joy finally for you too.
Frederick Buechner

How wretched is the person who hangs on by the favors of the powerful.
Robert Burns

The heart and benevolent and kind the most resembles God.
Robert Burns

Have you had a kindness shown? Pass it on; 'twas not given for thee alone, Pass it on; Let it travel down the years, Let it wipe another's tears, Till in Heaven the deed appears, Pass it on.
Henry Burton

The dew of compassion is a tear.
Lord (George Gordon) Byron


The person who lives with cripples will soon learn to limp.
Italian Proverb

The right man comes at the right time.
Italian Proverb

Never do that by proxy which you can do yourself.
Italian Proverb

A real leader faces the music, even when he doesn't like the tune.
Anon.

If you get too far in front of your troops, you start looking like the enemy.
Anon.

Among the blind the one eyed is king.
Proverb

An army of deer would be more formidable commanded by a lion, than a an army of lions commanded by a stag.
Proverb

Those who sleep with dogs gets up with fleas.
Proverb

When a blind man bears the standard, pity those who follow.
Proverb

What little Jack does not learn, big John will never.
Proverb

Those that rule must hear and be deaf, must see and be blind.
Proverb

Power lasts ten years; influence not more than a hundred.
Proverb

The first requirement of a statesman is that he be dull. This is not always easy to achieve.
Dean Acheson

The chief executive who knows his strengths and weaknesses as a leader is likely to be far more effective than the one who remains blind to them. He also is on the road to humility -- that priceless attitude of openness to life that can help a manager absorb mistakes, failures, or personal shortcomings.
John Adair

A leader knows what's best to do; a manager knows merely how best to do it.
Ken Adelman

Every ruler is harsh whose laws is new.
Aeschylus

The leadership instinct you are born with is the backbone. You develop the funny bone and the wishbone that go with it.
Elaine Agather

Skill in the art of communication is crucial to a leader's success. He can accomplish nothing unless he can communicate effectively.
Norman Allen

Every life is a profession of faith, and exercises an inevitable and silent influence.
Henri Frederic Amiel

The minute a person whose word means a great deal to others dare to take the open-hearted and courageous way, many others follow.
Marian Anderson

All poets adore explosions, thunderstorms, tornadoes, conflagrations, ruins, scenes of spectacular carnage. The poetic imagination is therefore not at all a desirable quality in a chief of state.
W. H. Auden

If you have fear of those that command you, spare those that obey you.
Rabbi Ben Azai

A leader is a person you will follow to a place you wouldn't go by yourself.
Joel A. Barker

The first task of a leader is to keep hope alive.
Joe Batten

He is greatest whose strength carries up the most hearts by the attraction of his own.
Henry Ward Beecher



Listen or thy tongue will keep thee deaf.
American Indian Proverb

Learning is a treasure that will follow its owner everywhere.
Chinese Proverb

Those who do not study are only cattle dressed up in men's clothes.
Chinese Proverb

Learning makes a man fit company for himself as well as for others.
English Proverb

Who God does not teach, man cannot.
Scottish Proverb

One thousand days to learn; ten thousand days to refine.
Japanese Proverb

We learn by teaching.
Proverb

By learning you will teach, by teaching you will learn.
Proverb

Learning is not attained by chance. It must be sought for with ardor and attended to with diligence.
Abigail Adams

Human beings, who are almost unique in having the ability to learn from the experience of others, are also remarkable for their apparent disinclination to do so.
Douglas Adams
Last Chance to See

Our delight in any particular study, art, or science rises and improves in proportion to the application which we bestow upon it. Thus, what was at first an exercise becomes at length an entertainment.
Joseph Addison

The purpose of learning is growth, and our minds, unlike our bodies, can continue growing as we continue to live.
Mortimer J. Adler

It is always in season for old men to learn.
Aeschylus

A true teacher defends his students against his own personal influences.
Amos Bronson Alcott

My father taught in the wise way which unfolds what lies in the child
Louisa May Alcott

Engrave this Quote
Louisa May Alcott

I figured that if I said it enough, I would convince the world that I really was the greatest.
Muhammad Ali

I hope everyone that is reading this is having a really good day. And if you are not, just know that in every new minute that passes you have an opportunity to change that.
Gillian Anderson

The ceaseless, senseless demand for original scholarship in a number of fields, where only erudition is now possible, has led either to sheer irrelevancy, the famous knowing of more and more about less and less...
Hannah Arendt
Crises of the Republic, On Violence, 1972

That's what learning is, after all; not whether we lose the game, but how we lose and how we've changed because of it and what we take away from it that we never had before, to apply to other games. Losing, in a curious way, is winning.
Richard Bach

Studies perfect nature and are perfected still by experience.
Francis Bacon

Studies serve for delight, for ornaments, and for ability.
Francis Bacon

I would live to study, and not study to live.
Francis Bacon

If I were seriously ill and in desperate need of a physician, and if by some miracle I could secure either Hippocrates, the Father of Medicine, or a young doctor fresh from the Johns Hopkins School of Medicine, with his equipment comprising the latest developments in the technologies and techniques of medicine, I should, of course, take the young doctor. On the other hand, if I were commissioned to find a teacher for a group of adolescent boys and if, by some miracle, I could secure either Socrates or the latest Ph.D. from Teachers College, with his equipment of the latest technologies and techniques of teaching, with all due respect to the College that employs me and to my students, I am fairly certain that I would jump at the chance to get Socrates.
William C. Bagley

The man who graduates today and stops learning tomorrow is uneducated the day after.
Newton D. Baker



Listen or thy tongue will keep thee deaf.
American Indian Proverb

Learning is a treasure that will follow its owner everywhere.
Chinese Proverb

Those who do not study are only cattle dressed up in men's clothes.
Chinese Proverb

Learning makes a man fit company for himself as well as for others.
English Proverb

Who God does not teach, man cannot.
Scottish Proverb

One thousand days to learn; ten thousand days to refine.
Japanese Proverb

We learn by teaching.
Proverb

By learning you will teach, by teaching you will learn.
Proverb

Learning is not attained by chance. It must be sought for with ardor and attended to with diligence.
Abigail Adams

Human beings, who are almost unique in having the ability to learn from the experience of others, are also remarkable for their apparent disinclination to do so.
Douglas Adams

Our delight in any particular study, art, or science rises and improves in proportion to the application which we bestow upon it. Thus, what was at first an exercise becomes at length an entertainment.
Joseph Addison

The purpose of learning is growth, and our minds, unlike our bodies, can continue growing as we continue to live.
Mortimer J. Adler

It is always in season for old men to learn.
Aeschylus

A true teacher defends his students against his own personal influences.
Amos Bronson Alcott

My father taught in the wise way which unfolds what lies in the child
Louisa May Alcott

Engrave this Quote
Louisa May Alcott

I figured that if I said it enough, I would convince the world that I really was the greatest.
Muhammad Ali

I hope everyone that is reading this is having a really good day. And if you are not, just know that in every new minute that passes you have an opportunity to change that.
Gillian Anderson

The ceaseless, senseless demand for original scholarship in a number of fields, where only erudition is now possible, has led either to sheer irrelevancy, the famous knowing of more and more about less and less...
Hannah Arendt

That's what learning is, after all; not whether we lose the game, but how we lose and how we've changed because of it and what we take away from it that we never had before, to apply to other games. Losing, in a curious way, is winning.
Richard Bach

Studies perfect nature and are perfected still by experience.
Francis Bacon

Studies serve for delight, for ornaments, and for ability.
Francis Bacon

I would live to study, and not study to live.
Francis Bacon

If I were seriously ill and in desperate need of a physician, and if by some miracle I could secure either Hippocrates, the Father of Medicine, or a young doctor fresh from the Johns Hopkins School of Medicine, with his equipment comprising the latest developments in the technologies and techniques of medicine, I should, of course, take the young doctor. On the other hand, if I were commissioned to find a teacher for a group of adolescent boys and if, by some miracle, I could secure either Socrates or the latest Ph.D. from Teachers College, with his equipment of the latest technologies and techniques of teaching, with all due respect to the College that employs me and to my students, I am fairly certain that I would jump at the chance to get Socrates.
William C. Bagley

The man who graduates today and stops learning tomorrow is uneducated the day after.
Newton D. Baker





Time is a companion that goes with us on a journey. It reminds us to cherish each moment, because it will never come again. What we leave behind is not as important as how we have lived.
Anon.

This is the beginning of a new day.You have been given this day to use as you will.You can waste it or use it for good.What you do today is important because you are exchanging a day of your life for it.When tomorrow comes, this day will be gone forever;in its place is something that you have left behind...let it be something good.
Anon.

My name is `Abdu'l-Bah [literally, Servant of Baha]. My qualification is `Abdu'l-Bah. My reality is `Abdu'l-Bah. My praise is `Abdu'l-Bah. Thraldom to the Blessed Perfection [Bah'u'llh] is my glorious and refulgent diadem, and servitude to all the human race my perpetual religion... No name, no title, no mention, no commendation have I, nor will ever have, except `Abdu'l-Bah. This is my longing. This is my greatest yearning. This is my eternal life. This is my everlasting glory.
Abdu'l-Baha

If I have done any deed worthy of remembrance, that deed will be my monument. If not, no monument can preserve my memory.
Agesilaus II

I
Louisa May Alcott

The only thing you take with you when you're gone is what you leave behind.
John Allston

Biography is one of the new terrors of death.
John Arbuthnot

Every autobiography is concerned with two characters, a Don Quixote, the Ego, and a Sancho Panza, the Self.
W. H. Auden

Biography should be written by an acute enemy.
Arthur Balfour

Every man
P. T. (Phineas Taylor) Barnum

Anyone who attempts to relate his life loses himself in the immediate. One can only speak of another.
Augusto Roa Bastos

Just as there is nothing between the admirable omelet and the intolerable, so with autobiography.
Hilaire Belloc

Reminiscences, even extensive ones, do not always amount to an autobiography. For autobiography has to do with time, with sequence and what makes up the continuous flow of life. Here, I am talking of a space, of moments and discontinuities. For even if months and years appear here, it is in the form they have in the moment of recollection. This strange form -- it may be called fleeting or eternal -- is in neither case the stuff that life is made of.
Walter Benjamin

Autobiography begins with a sense of being alone. It is an orphan form.
John Berger

In writing biography, fact and fiction shouldn't be mixed. And if they are, the fictional points should be printed in red ink, the facts printed in black ink.
Catherine Drinker Bowen

Everyone must leave something behind when he dies, my grandfather said. A child or a book or a painting or a house or a wall built or a pair of shoes made. Or a garden planted. Something your hand touched some way so your soul has somewhere to go when you die, and when people look at that tree or that flower you planted, you're there. It doesn't matter what you do, he said, so long as you change something from the way it was before you touched it into something that's like you after you take your hands away. The difference between the man who just cuts lawns and a real gardener is in the touching, he said. The lawn-cutter might just as well not have been there at all; the gardener will be there a lifetime.
Ray Bradbury

A man's memory is bound to be a distortion of his past in accordance with his present interests, and the most faithful autobiography is likely to mirror less what a man was than what he has become.
Fawn M. Brodie

Biographical data, even those recorded in the public registers, are the most private things one has, and to declare them openly is rather like facing a psychoanalyst.
Italo Calvino

When you write down your life, every page should contain something no one has ever heard about.
Elias Canetti

Such reproductions may not interest the reader; but after all, this is my autobiography, not his; he is under no obligation to read further in it; he was under none to begin. A modest or inhibited autobiography is written without entertainment to the writer and read with distrust by the reader.
Neville Cardus

A well-written life is almost as rare as a well-spent one.
Thomas Carlyle

History is the essence of innumerable biographies.
Thomas Carlyle

If those gentlemen would let me alone I should be much obliged to them. I would say, as Shakespeare would say... Sweet Friend, for Jesus sake forbear.
Thomas Carlyle

No sooner does a great man depart, and leave his character as public property, than a crowd of little men rushes towards it. There they are gathered together, blinking up to it with such vision as they have, scanning it from afar, hovering round it this way and that, each cunningly endeavoring, by all arts, to catch some reflex of it in the little mirror of himself.
Thomas Carlyle

There are people who can write their memoirs with a reasonable amount of honesty, and there are people who simply cannot take themselves seriously enough. I think I might be the first to admit that the sort of reticence which prevents a man from exploiting his own personality is really an inverted sort of egotism.
Raymond Chandler







Life is a bed of water filling from many springs and we seem not to know when one gushing flow will oe'r flood the banks only to be succeeded by a drought.
Anon., December 21, 1925



Life is not a journey to the grave with the intention of arriving safely in a pretty and well preserved body, but rather to skid in broadside, thoroughly used up, totally worn out, and loudly proclaiming
Anon.

May God bless you to live as long as you want to; and want to as long as you live!
Scottish Proverb



Learn from yesterday, live for today, hope for tomorrow.
Anon.

Some people weave burlap into the fabric of our lives, and some weave gold thread. Both contribute to make the whole picture beautiful and unique.
Anon.

Enjoy life. There's plenty of time to be dead.
Anon.

He who allows his day to pass by without practicing generosity and enjoying life's pleasures is like a blacksmith's bellows. He breathes, but does not live.
Proverb

A light heart lives long.
Proverb

Live today for tomorrow it will all be history.
Proverb

Young people talk of what they are doing; old people of what they have done; and fools of what they have a mind to do.
Proverb

Life is an onion and one cries while peeling it.
Proverb

In the morning of life, work; in the mid day give council; in the evening, pray.
Proverb

Life is a bridge. Cross over it, but build no house on it.
Proverb

There are four things every person has more of than they know; sins, debt, years, and foes.
Proverb

To live with the conscious knowledge of the shadow of uncertainty, with the knowledge that disaster or tragedy could strike at any time; to be afraid and to know and acknowledge your fear, and still to live creatively and with unstinting love: that is to live with grace.
Peter Henry Abrahams

I do not want to get to the end of my life and find that I just lived the length of it. I want to have lived the width of it as well.
Diane Ackerman, "quoted in Newsweek", September 22, 1986

Life...is like a grapefruit. It's orange and squishy , and has a few pips in it, and some folks have half a one for breakfast.
Douglas Adams



Life is wasted on the living.
Douglas Adams

	We make provisions for this life as if it were never to have an end, and for the other life as though it were never to have a beginning.
Joseph Addison

The less routine the more life.
Amos Bronson Alcott





He who is not impatient is not in love.
Italian Proverb

Who travels for love finds a thousand miles not longer than one.
Japanese Proverb

A man in love mistakes a pimple for a dimple.
Japanese Proverb

It is easier to guard a sack full of fleas than a girl in love.
Yiddish Proverb

He that plants trees loves others besides himself.
English Proverb

You don't love a woman because she is beautiful, but she is beautiful because you love her.
Anon.

If you love somebody, let them go. If they return, they were always yours. If they don't, they never were.
Anon.

Love has nothing to do with what you are expecting to get, it's what you are expected to give -- which is everything.
Anon.

In love, there is always one who kisses and one who offers the cheek.
Proverb

A heart that loves is always young.
Proverb

It is easy to halve the potato where there is love.
Proverb

Love laughs at locksmiths.
Proverb

Love rules his kingdom without a sword.
Proverb

Follow love and it will flee, flee love and it will follow.
Proverb

Love can neither be bought or sold, its only price is love.
Proverb

Blue eyes say, Love me or I die; black eyes say, Love me or I kill thee.
Proverb

All my life I have had a choice of hate and love. I chose love and I am here.
A.R. Rahman

Everyone admits that love is wonderful and necessary, yet no one agrees on just what it is.
Diane Ackerman

There is a law that man should love his neighbor as himself. In a few hundred years it should be as natural to mankind as breathing or the upright gait; but if he does not learn it he must perish.
Alfred Adler

And, oh, how blessed is it thus to meet! To feel that vanished years have not estranged us,distance has not diminished love, that we are to each other even as we parted; to feel again the fond kiss, to hear once more the accents of a voice which to us has been for years so still,--a voice that brings with it the gush of memory! Past days flit before us; feelings, thoughts, hopes, we deemed were dead, all rise again, summoned by that secret witchery, the well-remembered though long silent voice. Let years, long, lingering, saddening years drag on their chain, let youth have given place to manhood, manhood to age, still will it be the same--the voice we once have loved, and deemed to us for ever still--oh, time, and grief, and blighted hope will be forgotten, and youth, in its undimmed and joyous beauty, its glow of generous feelings, its bright anticipations, all, all again be ours.
Grace Aguilar

Are you ready to cut off your head and place your foot on it? If so, come; Love awaits you! Love is not grown in a garden, nor sold in the marketplace; whether you are a king or a servant, the price is your head, and nothing less. Yes, the cost of the elixir of love is your head! Do you hesitate? 0 miser, It is cheap at that price!
Abu Hamid Al-Ghazzali

Love is a great beautifier.
Louisa May Alcott

The Impossible Generalized Man today is the critic who believes in loving those unworthy of love as well as those worthy --yet believes this only insofar as no personal risk is entailed. Meaning he loves no one, worthy or no. This is what makes him impossible.
Nelson Algren

I was nauseous and tingly all over. I was either in love or I had smallpox.
Woody Allen

Sex alleviates tension. Love causes it.
Woody Allen

Where love is concerned, too much is not even enough.
Pierre De Beaumarchais

When we understand that man is the only animal who must create meaning, who must open a wedge into neutral nature, we already understand the essence of love. Love is the problem of an animal who must find life, create a dialogue with nature in order to experience his own being.
Ernest Becker

Young love is a flame; very pretty, often very hot and fierce, but still only light and flickering. The love of the older and disciplined heart is as coals, deep-burning, unquenchable.
Henry Ward Beecher

Love is the river of life in the world.
Henry Ward Beecher

I never knew how to worship until I knew how to love.
Henry Ward Beecher

Love ceases to be a pleasure, when it ceases to be a secret.
Aphra Behn

Honor the ocean of love.
George De Benneville

The opposite of love is not to hate but to separate. If love and hate have something in common it is because, in both cases, their energy is that of bringing and holding together
John Berger

Love seeks no cause beyond itself and no fruit; it is its own fruit, its own enjoyment. I love because I love; I love in order that I may love.
St. Bernard

Let no one believe that he has received the divine kiss, if he knows the truth without loving it or loves it without understanding it. But blessed is that kiss whereby not only is God recognized but also the Father is loved; for there is never full knowledge without perfect love.
St. Bernard

All the pictures that hung in my memory before I knew you have faded and given place to our radient moments together. Now I cannot live apart from you...Your words are my food, your breath my wine. You are everything to me.
Sarah Bernhardt

Set your affection on things above, not on things on the earth. Colossians 3:2
Bible

We know that we have passed from death into life, because we love... 1 John 3:14
Bible

And this I pray, that your love may abound still more and more in real knowledge and all discernment. Philippians 1:9
Bible

For where your treasure is, there your heart will be also.
Bible

This is my commandment, that ye love one another. Jesus, In John 15:12
Bible

By this all men will know that you are my disciples, if you have love for one another. John 13:35
Bible

Thou shalt love thy neighbor as thyself. Roman 13:9
Bible

He that loveth not knoweth not God; for God is love. I John
Bible

Keep me as the apple of the eye, hide me under the shadow of thy wings.
Bible

Love is patient and kind; love is not jealous or boastful; it is not arrogant or rude. I Corinthians
Bible

Love is the fulfilling of the Law.
Bible

Stay me with flagons, comfort me with apples: for I am sick of love. The Song Of Solomon 2:5
Bible

There is no fear in love; but perfect love casts out fear.
Bible

And you are to love those who are your aliens for you yourselves were aliens in Egypt. Deuteronomy 10:19
Bible


The cure for all ills and wrongs, the cares, the sorrows and the crimes of humanity, all lie in the one word 'love.' It is the divine vitality that everywhere produces and restores life. 
Lydia Maria Child

Do not keep the alabaster boxes of your love and tenderness sealed up until your friends are dead. Fill their lives with sweetness, speak cheering words while their ears can hear, and while their hearts can be thrilled and made happier by them. George 
Williams Childs

Every day I live I am more convinced that the waste of life lies in the love we have not given, the powers we have not used, the selfish prudence that will risk nothing and which, shirking pain, misses happiness as well. 
Mary Cholmondeley

Love is the word used to label the sexual excitement of the young, the habituation of the middle-aged, and the mutual dependence of the old. 
John Ciardi

You can't put a price tag on love, but you can on all its accessories. 
Melanie Clark

	One is loved because one is loved. No reason is needed for loving. 
Paulo Coelho

All thoughts, all passions, all delightsWhatever stirs this mortal frameAll are but ministers of LoveAnd feed His sacred flame. 
Samuel Taylor Coleridge

Sympathy constitutes friendship; but in love there is a sort of antipathy, or opposing passion. Each strives to be the other, and both together make up one whole. 
Samuel Taylor Coleridge

Friendship often ends in love; but love in friendship - never. 
Charles Caleb Colton

If you cannot inspire a woman with love of you, fill her above the brim with love of herself; all that runs over will be yours. 
Charles Caleb Colton

Love is an alliance of friendship and animalism; if the former predominates it is passion exalted and refined; if the latter, gross and sensual. 
Charles Caleb Colton

To love a thing means wanting it to live. 
Confucius

Can there be a love which does not make demands on its object? 
Confucius

If there's delight in love, 'Tis when I see that heart, which others bleed for, bleed for me. 
William Congreve

We love but once, for once only are we perfectly equipped for loving. 
Cyril Connolly

There is no pain equal to that which two lovers can inflict on one another. This should be made clear to all who contemplate such a union. The avoidance of this pain is the beginning of wisdom, for it is strong enough to contaminate the rest of our lives. 
Cyril Connolly

Woe to the man whose heart has not learned while young to hope, to love - and to put its trust in life. 
Joseph Conrad

Love is a tyrant sparing none. 
Pierre Corneille

Love is a friendship set to music. 
E. Joseph Cossman

Love - THE FEELING - is a fruit of love, the verb. 
Stephen Covey

Love is a fire. But whether it is going to warm your hearth or burn down your house, you can never tell. 
Joan Crawford

Love touched her heart, and lo! It beats high, and burns with such brave hearts. 
Richard Crawshaw

Love is the extra effort we make in our dealings with those whom we do not like and once you understand that, you understand all. This idea that love overtakes you is nonsense. This is but a polite manifestation of sex. To love another you have to undertake some fragment of their destiny. 
Quentin Crisp

I love you, not for what you are, but for what I am when I am with you. 
Roy Croft

Men and women are not free to love decently until they have analyzed themselves completely and swept away every mystery from sex; and this means the acquisition of a profound philosophical theory based on wide reading of anthropology and enlightened practice. 
Aleister Crowley




He who marries for money earns it.
Yiddish Proverb

Marriage is like a besieged castle; those who are on the outside wish to get in; and those who are on the inside wish to get out.
Arabic Proverb

The calmest husbands make the stormiest wives.
English Proverb

A good husband is healthy and absent.
Japanese Proverb

It's a sad house where the hen crows louder than the cock.
Scottish Proverb

Never marry for money. Ye'll borrow it cheaper.
Scottish Proverb

I will remember always that marriage, like life, is a journey - not a destination - and that its treasures are found not just at the end but all along the way.
Anon.

The day you marry, it is either kill or cure.
Proverb

Marriage is the sunset of love.
Proverb

Weeping bride, laughing wife, laughing bride, weeping wife.
Proverb

Marry a mountain girl and you marry the whole mountain.
Proverb

Do not choose your wife at a dance, but in the field among the harvesters.
Proverb

Choose your wife as you wish your children to be.
Proverb

Those that marry for money sell their liberty.
Proverb

Three things drive a man outdoors; smoke, a leaking roof and a scolding wife.
Proverb

You'll repent if you marry, and repent if you don't.
Proverb

Marrying is easy, it's housework that's hard.
Proverb

A good wife and health is a mans best wealth.
Proverb

A woman seldom asks advice before she has bought her wedding clothes.
Joseph Addison

When a match has equal partners then I fear not.
Aeschylus

Marriage is more than four bare legs in a bed.
Hoshang N. Akhtar

When two people marry they become in the eyes of the law one person, and that one person is the husband!
Shana Alexander

If a man works like a horse for his money, there are a lot of girls anxious to take him down the bridal path.
Marty Allen

The lion and the calf will lay down together, but the calf won't get much sleep..
Woody Allen

Marriage is the death of hope.
Woody Allen


He who lives by medical prescriptions lives miserably.
Proverb

Quackery has no friend like gullibility.
Proverb

Desperate maladies require desperate remedies.
Proverb

I am dying from the treatment of too many physicians.
Alexander The Great

Excessive reservations and paralyzing despondency have not helped the sciences to advance nor are they helping them to advance, but a healthy optimism that cheerfully searches for new ways to understand, as it is convinced that it will be possible to find them.
Alois Alzheimer

To array a man's will against his sickness is the supreme art of medicine.
Henry Ward Beecher

For every prohibition you create you also create an underground.
Jello Biafra

The Lord hath created medicines out of the earth: and he that is wise will not abhor them. Was not the water made sweet with wood, that the virtue thereof might be known? Ecclesiasticus 38:4-5
Bible

Before undergoing a surgical operation, arrange your temporal affairs. You may live.
Ambrose Bierce

The best medicine I know for rheumatism is to thank the Lord it ain't the gout.
Josh Billings

The best cure for the body is a quiet mind.
Napoleon Bonaparte

Water, air, and cleanness are the chief articles in my pharmacy.
Napoleon Bonaparte

Medicines are only fit for old people.
Napoleon Bonaparte

Medicine is a collection of uncertain prescriptions, the results of which, taken collectively, are more fatal than useful to mankind.
Napoleon Bonaparte

A good night's sleep, or a ten-minute brawl, or a pint of chocolate ice cream, or all three together, is good medicine.
Ray Bradbury

Medicine, the only profession that labors incessantly to destroy the reason for its own existance.
James Bryce

What can't be cured must be endured.
Robert Burton

Vaccination is the medical sacrament corresponding to baptism.
Samuel Butler

Well, now there's a remedy for everything except death.
Miguel de Cervantes

The whole imposing edifice of modern medicine is like the celebrated tower of Pisa --slightly off balance.
Prince Of Wales Charles

When a lot of remedies are suggested for a disease, that means it can't be cured.
Anton Chekhov

Medicine is my lawful wife and literature my mistress; when I get tired of one, I spend the night with the other.
Anton Chekhov

He is the best physician who is the most ingenious inspirer of hope.
Samuel Taylor Coleridge

Like a celestial chaperon, the placebo leads us through the uncharted passageways of mind and gives us a greater sense of infinity than if we were to spend all our days with our eyes hypnotically glued to the giant telescope at Mt. Palomar. What we see ultimately is that the placebo isn't really necessary and that the mind can carry out its difficult and wondrous missions unprompted by little pills. The placebo is only a tangible object made essential in an age that feels uncomfortable with intangibles, an age that prefers to think that every inner effect must have an outer cause. Since it has size and shape and can be hand-held, the placebo satisfies the contemporary craving for visible mechanisms and visible answers . The placebo, then, is an emissary between the will to live and the body.
Norman Cousins

Today's medicine is at the end of its road. It can no longer be transformed, modified, readjusted. That's been tried too often. Today's medicine must DIE in order to be reborn. We must prepare its complete renovation.
Maurice Delort


The palest ink lasts longer than the most retentive memory.
Chinese Proverb

When you are right no one remembers; when you are wrong no one forgets.
Proverb

The best memory is that which forgets nothing, but injuries. Write kindness in marble and write injuries in the dust.
Proverb

One lives in the world's memory only by what they have done in the world's behalf.
Proverb

Memory is the mother of all wisdom.
Aeschylus

Lost love is still love. It takes a different form, that
Mitch Albom

I always have trouble remembering three things: faces, names, and -- I can't remember what the third thing is.
Fred A. Allen

Memory is the scribe of the soul.
Aristotle

But each day brings its petty dust our soon-choked souls to fill, and we forget because we must, and not because we will.
Matthew Arnold

Not the power to remember, but its very opposite, the power to forget, is a necessary condition for our existence.
Sholem Asch

Memory is the greatest of artists, and effaces from your mind what is unnecessary.
Maurice Baring

People tend to remember my performances, not me.
Ellen Barkin

God gave us memories that we might have roses in December.
John M. Barrie

Never forget what you need to remember.
Garrett Bartley

Memory is the cabinet of the imagination, the treasury of reason, the registry of conscience, and, the council chamber of thought.
Basile

Friends depart, and memory takes them
To her caverns, pure and deep.
Thomas Haynes Bayly

Nothing is more responsible for the good old days than a bad memory.
Robert Benchley

Memory is not an instrument for exploring the past but its theatre. It is the medium of past experience, as the ground is the medium in which dead cities lie interred.
Walter Benjamin

Like ultraviolet rays memory shows to each man in the book of life a script that invisibly and prophetically glosses the text.
Walter Benjamin

I cannot walk through the suburbs in the solitude of the night without thinking that the night pleases us because it suppresses idle details, just as our memory does.
Jorge Luis Borges

The charm, one might say the genius of memory, is that it is choosy, chancy, and temperamental: it rejects the edifying cathedral and indelibly photographs the small boy outside, chewing a hunk of melon in the dust.
Elizabeth Bowen

As with most fine things, chocolate has its season. There is a simple memory aid that you can use to determine whether it is the correct time to order chocolate dishes: any month whose name contains the letter A, E, or U is the proper time for chocolate.
Sandra Boynton

There is not any memory with less satisfaction than the memory of some temptation we resisted.
James Branch Cabell

One of the keys to happiness is a bad memory.
Rita Mae Brown

They may forget what you said, but they will never forget how you made them feel.
Carl W. Buechner




Silent men like still waters, are deep and dangerous.
Proverb

Prudent men woo thrifty women.
Proverb

A beard signifies lice, not brains.
Proverb

A bachelor is a man who comes to work each morning from a different direction.
Sholom Aleichem

Poor little men, poor little cocks! As soon as they're old enough, they swell their plumage to be conquerors. If they only knew that it's enough to be just a little bit wounded and sad in order to obtain everything without fighting for it.
Jean Anouilh

Bald as the bare mountain tops are bald, with a baldness full of grandeur.
Matthew Arnold

Men are not to be told anything they might find too painful; the secret depths of human nature, the sordid physicalities, might overwhelm or damage them. For instance, men often faint at the sight of their own blood, to which they are not accustomed. For this reason you should never stand behind one in the line at the Red Cross donor clinic.
Margaret Atwood

Left to itself the masculine imagination has very little appreciation for the here and now; it prefers to dwell on what is absent, on what has been or may be. If men are more punctual than women, it is because they know that, without the external discipline of clock time, they would never get anything done.
W. H. Auden

The masculine imagination lives in a state of perpetual revolt against the limitations of human life. In theological terms, one might say that all men, left to themselves, become gnostics. They may swagger like peacocks, but in their heart of hearts they all think sex an indignity and wish they could beget themselves on themselves. Hence the aggressive hostility toward women so manifest in most club-car stories.
W. H. Auden

Certainly the best works, and of greatest merit for the public, have proceeded from the unmarried, or childless men.
Francis Bacon

Men's private self-worlds are rather like our geographical world's seasons, storm, and sun, deserts, oases, mountains and abysses, the endless-seeming plateaus, darkness and light, and always the sowing and the reaping.
Faith Baldwin

Men's second childhood begins when a woman gets a hold of him.
James Barrie

The question arises as to whether it is possible not to live in the world of men and still to live in the world.
Louise Bernikow

A true man hates no one.
Napoleon Bonaparte

A cat is a regency gentleman--elegant of pose, exquisite of manner, with spotless linen and an enthusiasm for bare knuckle fights, rampaging love affairs, duels by moonlight and the singing of glees. He expects immaculate service from his domestic staff, and possesses a range of invective that would make a navy blanch.
Pam Brown



A bachelor's life is a fine breakfast, a flat lunch, and a miserable dinner.
Jean De La Bruyere

Some men are like nails, very easily drawn; others however are more like rivets never drawn at all.
John Burroughs

The one serious conviction that a man should have is that nothing is to be taken too seriously.
Nicholas Murray Butler

Men in general are quick to believe that which they wish to be true.
Julius Caesar

Men aren't necessities. They're luxuries.
Cher

Men always talk about the most important things to perfect strangers. In the perfect stranger we perceive man himself; the image of a God is not disguised by resemblances to an uncle or doubts of wisdom of a mustache.
G. K. Chesterton

There is always a period when a man with a beard shaves it off. This period does not last. He returns headlong to his beard.
Jean Cocteau

Bloody men are like bloody buses -- you wait for about a year and as soon as one approaches your stop two or three others appear.
Wendy Cope

I would be married, but I'd have no wife, I would be married to a single life.
Richard Crashaw



He that would the daughter win must with the mother first begin.
English Proverb

A mother understands what a child does not say.
Yiddish Proverb

God couldn't be everywhere, so he created mothers
Yiddish Proverb

God could not be everywhere and therefore he made mothers
Anon.

Original Poems for Infant Minds My MotherWho ran to help me when I fell,And would some pretty story tell,Or kiss the place to make it well?My Mother.
Anon.

For a mother is the only person on earth Who can divide her love among ten children And each child still have all her love.
Anon.

Heaven is at the feet of Mothers.
Arabic Proverb

A busy mother makes slothful daughters.
Proverb

An ounce of mother is worth a pound of clergy.
Proverb

A mother's heart is always with her children.
Proverb

Where there is a mother in the home, matters go well.
Amos Bronson Alcott

What do girls do who haven't any mothers to help them through their troubles?
Louisa May Alcott

A mother who is really a mother is never free.
Honore de Balzac

The heart of a mother is a deep abyss at the bottom of which you will always find forgiveness.
Honore de Balzac

The mother's heart is the child's schoolroom.
Henry Ward Beecher

Her children arise up, and call her blessed.
Bible

The best thing that could happen to motherhood already has. Fewer women are going into it.
Victoria Billings

When a woman is twenty, a child deforms her; when she is thirty, he preserves her; and when forty, he makes her young again.
Leon Blum

Let France have good mothers, and she will have good sons.
Napoleon Bonaparte

Women know the way to rear up children (to be just). They know a simple, merry, tender knack of tying sashes, fitting baby-shoes, and stringing pretty words that make no sense. And kissing full sense into empty words.
Elizabeth Barrett Browning



Motherhood: All love begins and ends there.
Robert Browning

Some are kissing mothers and some are scolding mothers, but it is love just the same -- and most mothers kiss and scold together.
Pearl Buck

A mother is she who can take the place of all others but whose place no one else can take.
Cardinal Mermillod

Never does one feel oneself so utterly helpless as in trying to speak comfort for great bereavement. I will not try it. Time is the only comforter for the loss of a mother.
Jane Welsh Carlyle

Money talks...but all mine ever says is good-bye.
Anon.

Only when the last tree has been cut down; Only when the last river has been poisoned; Only when the last fish has been caught; Only then will you find that money cannot be eaten.
American Indian Proverb

If you are poor, though you dwell in the busy marketplace, no one will inquire about you; if you are rich, though you dwell in the heart of the mountains, you will have distant relatives.
Chinese Proverb

Where gold speaks every tongue is silent.
Italian Proverb

Money begets money.
Italian Proverb

Getting money is like digging with a needle, spending it is like water soaking into sand.
Japanese Proverb

If you have money, men think you are wise, handsome, and able to sing like a bird.
Yiddish Proverb

Money is flat and meant to be piled up.
Scottish Proverb

If you want to know what God thinks of money, look at the people he gives it to.
Yiddish Proverb



When money speaks the truth is silent.
Proverb

Penny wise is often pound foolish.
Proverb

First secure an independent income, then practice virtue.
Proverb

Marry for money, my little sonny, a rich man's joke is always funny.
Proverb

When money is taken freedom is forsaken.
Proverb

The poor man's budget is full of schemes.
Proverb

Bankruptcy is a legal proceeding in which you put your money in your pants pocket and give your coat to your creditors.
Joey Adams

Money is a needful and precious thing,
Louisa May Alcott

The best way to make happy money is to make money your hobby and not your god.
Scott Alexander

Making money is a hobby that will complement any other hobbies you have, beautifully.
Scott Alexander

Money is better than poverty, if only for financial reasons.
Woody Allen

Money doesn't mind if we say it's evil, it goes from strength to strength. It's a fiction, an addiction, and a tacit conspiracy.
Martin Amis

It sounds extraordinary but it?s a fact that balance sheets can make fascinating reading.
Mary Archer

Capital can do nothing without brains to direct it.
J. Ogden Armour

Money is something you got to make in case you don't die.
Max Asnas



Offenders never pardon.
Proverb

It is easy to condemn, it is better to pity.
Lyman Abbott

The merciful shall obtain mercy.
Bible

Blessed are the merciful; for they shall obtain mercy. Mathew
Bible

A merciful person is merciful to their animals.
Bible

We shall show mercy, but we shall not ask for it.
Sir Winston Churchill, speech in the House of Commons, July 14, 1940

Religion and education are no match for evil without the grace of God.
B. R. Hayden

In peace we can make many of them ignore good and evil entirely; in danger, the issue is forced upon them in a guise to which even we cannot blind them. There is here a cruel dilemma before us. If we promoted justice and charity among men, we should be playing directly into the Enemy's hands; but if we guide them to the opposite behaviour, this sooner or later produces (for He permits it to produce) a war or a revolution, and the undisguisable issue of cowardice or courage awakes thousands of men from moral stupor.This, indeed, is probably one of the Enemy's motives for creating a dangerous world-a world in which moral issues really come to the point. He sees as well as you do that courage is not simply one of the virtues, but the form of every virtue at the testing point, which means, at the point of highest reality. A chastity or honesty, or mercy, which yieldsto danger will be chaste or honest or merciful only on conditions. Pilate was merciful till it became risky.
C.S. Lewis

I have always found that mercy bears richer fruits than strict justice.
Abraham Lincoln, speech in Washington D.C., 1865

Teach me to feel another's woe. To hide the fault I see: That the mercy I show to others; that mercy also show to me.
Alexander Pope

There are three things in the world that deserve no mercy, hypocrisy, fraud, and tyranny.
Frederick William Robertson

Clemency is one of the brightest diamonds in the crown of majesty.
W. Secker



In case of doubt we should always lean on the side of mercy.
Source Unknown

Lenience will operate with greater force, in some instances than rigor. It is therefore my first wish to have all of my conduct distinguished by it.
George Washington



Our lives are not determined by what happens to us but by how we react to what happens, not by what life brings to us, but by the attitude we bring to life. A positive attitude causes a chain reaction of positive thoughts, events, and outcomes. It is a catalyst, a spark that creates extraordinary results.
Anon.

All your life you are told the things you cannot do. All your life they will say you're not good enough or strong enough or talented enough; they will say you're the wrong height or the wrong weight or the wrong type to play this or be this or achieve this. THEY WILL TELL YOU NO, a thousand times no, until all the no's become meaningless. All your life they will tell you no, quite firmly and very quickly.AND YOU WILL TELL THEM YES.
Anon.

Don't spur a willing horse.
Proverb

It is not the horse that draws the cart, but the oats.
Proverb

Men are more accountable for their motives, than for anything else; and primarily, morality consists in the motives, that is in the affections.
Archibald Alexander

Aerodynamically, the bumble bee shouldn't be able to fly, but the bumble bee doesn't know it so it goes on flying anyway.
Mary Kay Ash

God made man to go by motives, and he will not go without them, any more than a boat without steam or a balloon without gas.
Henry Ward Beecher

Avoiding the phrase
Bo Bennett

You cannot raise a man up by calling him down.
William J. H. Boetcker

There are two levers for moving men -- interest and fear.
Napoleon Bonaparte

Striving for excellence motivates you; striving for perfection is demoralizing.
Harriet Braiker



Life takes on meaning when you become motivated, set goals and charge after them in an unstoppable manner.
Les Brown

Make no little plans; they have no magic to stir men's blood and probably themselves will not be realized. Make big plans; aim high in hope and work, remembering that a noble, logical diagram once recorded will not die, but long after we are gone be a living thing, asserting itself with ever-growing insistence.
Daniel Hudson Burnham

The ultimate inspiration is the deadline.
Nolan Bushnell

Nobody motivates today's workers. If it doesn't come from within, it doesn't come. Fun helps remove the barriers that allow people to motivate themselves.
Herman Cain

If you do not wish a man to do a thing, you had better get him to talk about it; for the more men talk, the more likely they are to do nothing else.
Thomas Carlyle

There is only one way... to get anybody to do anything. And that is by making the other person want to do it.
Dale Carnegie

Whatever touches the nerves of motive, whatever shifts man's moral position, is mightier than steam, or calorie, or lightening.
Edwin Hubbell Chapin

If I would be happy, I would be a bad ballplayer. With me, when I get mad, it puts energy in my body.
Roberto Clemente

Without a compelling cause, our employees are just putting in time. Their minds might be engaged, but their hearts are not. Meaning precedes motivation.
Lee J. Colan

What comes from the heart, goes to the heart.
Samuel Taylor Coleridge

No one does anything from a single motive.
Samuel Taylor Coleridge

I want you to be everything that's you, deep at the center of your being.
Confucius

The most important thing in the Olympic Games is not to win but to take part, just as the most important thing in life is not the triumph but the struggle. The essential thing is not to have conquered but to have fought well.
Pierre de Coubertin


Motivation is like food for the brain. You cannot get enough in one sitting. It needs continual and regular top up s.
Peter Davies



The ones who want to achieve and win championships motivate themselves.
Mike Ditka

We know nothing about motivation. All we can do is write books about it.
Peter Drucker

Comfort the afflicted, and afflict the comfortable.
Finley Peter Dunne

Recognition is the greatest motivator.
Gerard C. Eakedale

Motivation is the art of getting people to do what you want them to do because they want to do it.
Dwight D Eisenhower

The best morale exist when you never hear the word mentioned. When you hear a lot of talk about it, it's usually lousy.
Dwight D Eisenhower

If you would lift me up you must be on higher ground.
Ralph Waldo Emerson



Five minutes of today are worth as much to me, as five minutes in the next millennium.Let us be poised, and wise, and our own, today.
Ralph Waldo Emerson

You don't have to do anything you don't want to do.
David Harold Fink

One of the strongest characteristics of genius is the power of lighting its own fire.
John W. Foster

The mechanics of industry is easy. The real engine is the people : Their motivation and direction.
Ken Gilbert

Make sure you visualize what you really want, not what someone else wants for you.
Jerry Gillies

Instruction does much, but encouragement does everything.
Johann von Goethe

It is in human nature to relax, when not compelled by personal advantage or disadvantage.
Johann von Goethe

Who is sure of their own motives can in confidence advance or retreat.
Johann von Goethe

A message prepared in the mind reaches a mind; a message prepared in a life reaches a life.
Bill Gothard

A wife encourages her husband's egoism in order to encourage her own.
Russell Green

Some of us are like wheelbarrows, only useful when pushed and easily upset.
Jack Herbert

When the leader passes over all alike, not making a distinction, then the endeavors of those who are capable of exertion are entirely lost.
Hitopadesa

The inner thought coming from the heart represents the real motives and desires. These are the cause of action.
Raymond Holliwell

It's not my job to motivate players. They bring extraordinary motivation to our program. It's my job not to de-motivate them.
Lou Holtz

Motivation is simple. You eliminate those who are not motivated.
Lou Holtz


Motivation is everything. You can do the work of two people, but you can't be two people. Instead, you have to inspire the next guy down the line and get him to inspire his people.
Lee Iacocca

Though a good motive cannot sanction a bad action, a bad motive will always vitiate a good action. In common and trivial matters we may act without motives, but in momentous ones the most careful deliberation is wisdom.
W. M. L. Jay

Stay hungry, stay foolish.
Steve Jobs

When the administrator feels himself to be the sole driving agency, and finds himself chiefly engaged in arousing those who apathetic and coercing those who are antagonistic, there is something vitally wrong with the administration. An executive should find himself engaged chiefly in directing the energies which create themselves naturally in all parts of the business, and in finding the proper outlet for the eager upward striving of the ranks below.
E.E. Jones

To handle yourself, use your head; to handle others, use your heart.
Donald Laird

A year from now you may wish you had started today.
Karen Lamb

We talk on principal, but act on motivation.
Walter Savage Landor

Any change, any loss, does not make us victims. Others can shake you, surprise you, disappoint you, but they can't prevent you from acting, from taking the situation you're presented with and moving on. No matter where you are in life, no matter what your situation, you can always do something. You always have a choice and the choice can be power.
Blaine Lee

What we see depends mainly on what we look for.
Sir John Lubbock

I usually need a can of beer to prime me.
Norman Mailer

One of the reasons it has seemed so difficult for a person to change his habits, his personality, or his way of life, has been that heretofore nearly all efforts at change have been directed to the circumference of the self, so to speak, rather than to the center.
Maxwell Maltz



I will act now. I will act now. I will act now. Henceforth, I will repeat these words each hour, each day, everyday, until the words become as much a habit as my breathing, and the action which follows becomes as instinctive as the blinking of my eyelids. With these words I can condition my mind to perform every action necessary for my success. I will act now. I will repeat these words again and again and again. I will walk where failures fear to walk. I will work when failures seek rest. I will act now for now is all I have. Tomorrow is the day reserved for the labor of the lazy. I am not lazy. Tomorrow is the day when the failure will succeed. I am not a failure. I will act now. Success will not wait. If I delay, success will become wed to another and lost to me forever. This is the time. This is the place. I am the person.
Og Mandino

The master in the art of living makes little distinction between his work and his play, his labor and his leisure, his mind and his body, his information and his recreation, his love and his religion. He hardly knows which is which. He simply pursues his vision of excellence at whatever he does, leaving others to decide whether he is working or playing. To him he's always doing both.
James A. Michener

Am I motivated by what I really want out of life -- or am I mass-motivated?
Earl Nightingale

I've always felt it was not up to anyone else to make me give my best.
Akeem Olajuwon

The only way to get people to like working hard is to motivate them. Today, people must understand why they're working hard. Every individual in an organization is motivated by something different.
Rick Pitino

Two purposes in human nature rule. Self-love to urge, and reason to restrain.
Alexander Pope

All right, they're on our left, they're on our right, they're in front of us, they're behind us... they can't get away this time. When Surrounded By 8 Enemy Divisions During WW2
Chesty Puller

You are what you think. You are what you go for. You are what you do!
Bob Richards

It is simpler and easier to flatter people than to praise them.
Jean Paul Richter

A champion needs a motivation above and beyond winning.
Pat Riley

There's always the motivation of wanting to win. Everybody has that. But a champion needs, in his attitude, a motivation above and beyond winning.
Pat Riley

I never criticize a player until they are first convinced of my unconditional confidence in their abilities.
John Robinson

We promise according to our hopes and perform according to our fears.
Francois de la Rochefoucauld

	We would frequently be ashamed of our good deeds if people saw all of the motives that produced them.
Francois de la Rochefoucauld

You gain strength, courage, and confidence by every experience in which you really stop to look fear in the face. You are able to say to yourself, I have lived through this horror. I can take the next thing that comes along. . . . You must do the thing you think you cannot do.
Eleanor Roosevelt

I cannot believe that the purpose of life is to be happy. I think the purpose of life is to be useful, to be responsible, to be compassionate. It is, above all to matter, to count, to stand for something, to have made some difference that you lived at all.
Leo Rosten

We should not teach children the sciences; but give them a taste for them.
Jean Jacques Rousseau

Motivation is what gets you started. Habit is what keeps you going.
Jim Ryun

The world is not respectable; it is mortal, tormented, confused, deluded forever; but it is shot through with beauty, with love, with glints of courage and laughter; and in these, the spirit blooms timidly, and struggles to the light amid the thorns.
George Santayana

Why did I want to win? because I didn't want to lose!
Max Schmelling

We may think there is willpower involved, but more likely change is due to want power. Wanting the new addiction more than the old one. Wanting the new me in preference to the person I am now.
George Sheehan

The most important thing about motivation is goal setting. You should always have a goal.
Francie Larrieu Smith

Whatever you are from nature, keep to it; never desert your own line of talent...Be what Nature intended you for, and you will succeed; be anything else, and you will be ten thousand times worse than nothing.
Sydney Smith

You make the world a better place by making yourself a better person.
Scott Sorrell

I still feel like I gotta prove something. There are a lot of people hoping I fail. But I like that. I need to be hated.
Howard Stern

When you come to the end of all the light you know, and it's time to step into the darkness of the unknown, faith is knowing that one of two things shall happen: Either you will be given something solid to stand on or you will be taught to fly.
Edward Teller

Next to excellence, comes the appreciation of it.
William Makepeace Thackeray

Look at a day when you are supremely satisfied at the end. It's not a day when you lounge around doing nothing; its when you had everything to do, and you've done it.
Margaret Thatcher

Help people become more motivated by guiding them to the source of their own power.
Paul G. Thomas

The most important thing about a man is what he believes in the depth of his being. This is the thing that makes him what he is, The thing that organizes him and feeds him; the thing that keeps him going in the face of untoward circumstances; the thing that gives him resistance.
Hugh Stevenson Tigner

We must treasure the achievers of our land because it's they who raise the sights of all the others.
Source Unknown

There is nothing that fear and hope does not permit men to do.
Marquis De Vauvenargues

You must rouse into people's consciousness their own prudence and strength, if you want to raise their character.
Marquis De Vauvenargues

I set myself on fire and people come to watch me burn.
John Wesley

I have always been pushed by the negative. The apparent failure of a play sends me back to my typewriter that very night, before the reviews are out. I am more compelled to get back to work than if I had a success.
Tennessee (Thomas Lanier) Williams

People often say that motivation doesn't last. Well, neither does bathing-that's why we recommend it daily.
Zig Ziglar



Morality is a private and costly luxury.
Henry Adams

The hottest places in hell are reserved for those who, in times of great moral crisis, maintain their neutrality.
Dante Alighieri

The only immorality is not to do what one has to do when one has to do it.
Jean Anouilh

Moral excellence comes about as a result of habit. We become just by doing just acts, temperate by doing temperate acts, brave by doing brave acts.
Aristotle

The moral virtues, then, are produced in us neither by nature nor against nature. Nature, indeed, prepares in us the ground for their reception, but their complete formation is the product of habit.
Aristotle

Ah! How neatly tied, in these people, is the umbilical cord of morality! Since they left their mothers they have never sinned, have they? They are apostles, they are the descendants of priests; one can only wonder from what source they draw their indignation, and above all how much they have pocketed to do this, and in any case what it has done for them.
Antonin Artaud

Never let your sense of morals get in the way of doing what's right.
Isaac Asimov

While moral rules may be propounded by authority the fact that these were so propounded would not validate them.
Sir Alfred Jules Ayer

I'm as pure as the driven slush.
Tallulah Bankhead

The essence of morality is a questioning about morality; and the decisive move of human life is to use ceaselessly all light to look for the origin of the opposition between good and evil.
Georges Bataille

Morality is character and conduct such as is required by the circle or community in which the man's life happens to be placed. It shows how much good men require of us.
Henry Ward Beecher

I have never regarded politics as the arena of morals. It is the arena of interest.
Aneurin Bevan

Bad company ruins good morals.
Bible

There is a perennial and unobtrusive view that morality consists in such things as telling the truth, paying one's debts, respecting one's parents and doing no voluntary harm to anyone. Those are all things easy to say and hard to do; they do not attract much attention, and win little honor in the world.
Allan Bloom

Morality's not practical. Morality's a gesture. A complicated gesture learnt from books.
Robert Bolt

Compound for sins they are inclined to by damning those they have no mind to.
Samuel Butler

Though sages may pour out their wisdom's treasure, there is no sterner moralist than pleasure.
Lord (George Gordon) Byron

For the superior morality, of which we hear so much, we too would desire to be thankful: at the same time, it were but blindness to deny that this superior morality is properly rather an inferior criminality, produced not by greater love of Virtue, but by greater perfection of Police; and of that far subtler and stronger Police, called Public Opinion.
Thomas Carlyle

Everything's got a moral, if only you can find it.
Lewis Carroll

It is far easier for a woman to lead a blameless life than it is for a man; all she has to do is to avoid sexual intercourse like the plague.
Angela Carter

The person is always happy who is in the presence of something they cannot know in full. A person as advanced far in the study of morals who has mastered the difference between pride and vanity.
Sebastian Roch Nicolas Chamfort

Conscience, the sense of right, the power of perceiving moral distinctions, the power of discerning between justice and injustice, excellence and baseness, is the highest faculty given us by God, the whole foundation of our responsibility, and our sole capacity for religion. ...God, in giving us conscience, has implanted a principle within us which forbids us to prostrate ourselves before mere power, or to offer praise where we do not discover worth.
William Ellery Channing

What is light without dark? Right without left? What is goodness without the option to be evil?
Harrison Christian

I cannot believe that this country cannot come together around some values what these kids need is a moral life... the issue is not ideas, it is conduct. The real question is how we reach these young people morally, and what do we bring to them.
Robert Coles

Corruption is like a ball of snow, once it's set a rolling it must increase.
Charles Caleb Colton



Music, the greatest good that mortals know, And all of heaven we have below.
Joseph Addison

Nothing is capable of being well set to music that is not nonsense.
Joseph Addison

Mozart has the classic purity of light and the blue ocean; Beethoven the romantic grandeur which belongs to the storms of air and sea, and while the soul of Mozart seems to dwell on the ethereal peaks of Olympus, that of Beethoven climbs shuddering the storm-beaten sides of a Sinai. Blessed be they both! Each represents a moment of the ideal life, each does us good. Our love is due to both.
Henri Frederic Amiel

Where words fail, music speaks.
Hans Christian Andersen

A lot of pop music is about stealing pocket money from children.
Ian Anderson

Music is the universal language: it is the same anywhere you go in the world.
Anonymous

What we play is life.
Louis Armstrong

There is two kinds of music the good and bad. I play the good kind.
Louis Armstrong

Today, music heralds... the establishment of a society of repetition in which nothing will happen anymore.
Jacques Attali

A verbal art like poetry is reflective; it stops to think. Music is immediate, it goes on to become.
W. H. Auden

Music washes away from the soul the dust of everyday life.
Berthold Auerbach

I wish Frank Sinatra would just shut up and sing.
Lauren Bacall

I have always kept one end in view, namely . . . to conduct a well-regulated church music to the honour of God.
Johann Sebastian Bach

Music is an agreeable harmony for the honor of God and the permissible delights of the soul.
Johann Sebastian Bach

There are two golden rules for an orchestra: start together and finish together. The public doesn't give a damn what goes on in between.
Sir Thomas Beecham

The English may not like music, but they absolutely love the noise it makes.
Sir Thomas Beecham

Great music is that which penetrates the ear with facility and leaves the memory with difficulty. Magical music never leaves the memory.
Sir Thomas Beecham

A musicologist is a man who can read music but cannot hear it.
Sir Thomas Beecham

This world is not a platform where you will hear Thalberg-piano-playing. It is a piano manufactory, where are dust and shavings and boards, and saws and files and rasps and sandpapers. The perfect instrument and the music will be hereafter.
Henry Ward Beecher

She was one of those people who said I don't know anything about music, but I know what I like.
Max Beerbohm

Beethoven can write music, thank God, but he can do nothing else on earth.
Ludwig van Beethoven

Music is the mediator between the spiritual and the sensual life.
Ludwig van Beethoven

Music should strike fire from the heart of man, and bring tears form the eyes of woman.
Ludwig van Beethoven

What will be the judgment a century hence concerning the lorded works of our favorite composers today? Inasmuch as nearly everything is subject to the changes of time, and - more's the pity- the fashions of time, only that which is good and true will endure like a rock and no wanton hand will ever venture to defile it. Then, let every man do that which is right, strive with all his might towards the goal which can never be obtained, develop to the last breath the gifts with which the gracious Creator has endowed him, and never cease to learn. For life is short, art eternal.
Ludwig van Beethoven

I think it is time we learned the lesson of our century: that the progress of the human spirit must keep pace with technological and scientific progress, or that spirit will die. It is incumbent on our educators to remember this; and music is at the top of the spiritual must list. When the study of the arts leads to the adoration of the formula (heaven forbid), we shall be lost. But as long as we insist on maintaining artistic vitality, we are able to hope in man
Leonard Bernstein



<Change>24
<Character>25
<Communication>25
<Computers>25
<Creativity>25
 "Dignity\n" +25
"Duty\n" +25
"Death\n" +23
"Design\n" +25
"Diet\n" +25
"Dreams\n" +24
 "Effort\n" +25
"Education\n" +25
"Environmental\n" +25
"Equality\n" +24
"Experience\n" +25

"Failure\n" +25
"Faith\n" +25
"Family\n" +25
"Father\n" +25
"Fear\n" +25
"Food\n" +25
"Forgiveness\n" +25
"Freedom\n" +25
"Friendship \n" +25
"Future\n" +25

"Good\n" +25
"Government\n" +25
"Gratitude\n" +25
"Great\n" +24
 "Happiness\n" +25
"Health\n" +25
"History\n" +25
"Home\n" +25
"Hope\n" +25
"Humor\n" +25
"Imagination\n" +25
"Independence\n" +25
"Inspirational\n" +32
"Intelligence\n" +25
 "Joy\n" +25
"Knowledge\n" +25
"Kindness\n" +25
"Leadership\n" +25
"Learning\n" +25
"Legacy\n" +25
"Life Favorite\n" +20
"Love Favorite\n" +75

"Marriage\n" +25
"Medical\n" +25
"Memory\n" +25
"Men\n" +24
"Mom\n" +24
"Money\n" +24
"Mercy\n" +14
"Motivational\n" +96
"Morals\n" +25
"Music\n" +

